Read article contents
icon
Increase size
icon
This website is operated by FC Bayern München AG (
„FCB“
or
„we“
). The protection of your personal data is very important to us. In this privacy policy, you will find information about the handling of your personal data when you visit the FC Bayern Munich website.
1. Controller and data protection officer
The party responsible for the processing of personal data on this website (the controller) is:
FC Bayern München AG, Säbener Straße 51-57, D-81547 Munich, Germany
Phone: +49 89 699 31-0
Email:
service@fcbayern.com
If you have any questions regarding data protection, you can also contact our data protection officer at
datenschutz@fcbayern.com
at any time.
2. Collection and use of non-personal data when using the website
If you use this website without transmitting data to us in any other way (e.g. by registration), we only collect technically necessary data that is automatically transmitted to our server by your browser (e.g. browser type/version, operating system used, referrer URL, pages accessed, length of visit, IP address, date and time of request) or that is required by technically necessary or functional cookies.
As far as personal data is concerned, we process this on the basis of our legitimate interest in providing you with a functioning, secure website (Art. 6(1)(f) GDPR). There is no merging of data with other data sources, unless we explicitly describe this elsewhere. We reserve the right to check this data retrospectively if we become aware of specific indications of illegal use.
More information about cookies and similar technologies can be found
here
.
3. Collection and use of personal data
a. Registration (myFCB)
When you register on myFCB, we process the following personal data relating to you: Place of residence, language of communication, email, password for your login and other information that you voluntarily provide to us, e.g. name, date of birth, information about your favourite player and newsletter preferences.
When you use myFCB, we also process the following information, which you make available to us in the registered area at myFCB or which arises during your use. This includes, for example, information about your address, telephone numbers or account or credit card information, licence plate (parking permission), information about your membership with FC Bayern München eV, the Kids Club, the Fan Club, the purchase of tickets or products in the Fan Shop, subscriptions to FC Bayern.tv as well as top-ups of your ArenaCard. You can always view and change the specific data at myFCB.
We process this data in order to offer you the myFCB area, in particular to provide you with exclusive and personalised content, easy participation in competitions and easy access to offers and services (Art. 6(1)(b) GDPR).
We process your personal data until you have deleted your myFCB account and as long as it is necessary for the performance of mutual obligations in connection with myFCB. In addition, we store your personal data only for the assertion of or defence against legal claims or as long as legal obligations to store exist.
For IT security purposes, we also process technical information regarding your use of myFCB, such as your IP address and the time you logged on to myFCB. We process this information on the basis of our legitimate interest. Our legitimate interest is to provide you with a secure website (Art. 6(1)(f) GDPR). We delete this information 18 months after the respective registration on myFCB.
b. Ticket/fan article purchase and other contractual relationships
We only process personal data (e.g. name, delivery and billing address, date of birth, email, content of an order, price) if you have provided it to us in the context of a registration, order of products, and services or enquiries, and only insofar as this is necessary for the establishment, execution or termination of the legal relationship.
We process health data that you provide to us (e.g. your certificate of disability) only with your express consent (Art. 9(2)(a) GDPR) and only for the purposes stated in your respective consent declaration (e.g. provision of discounts when purchasing tickets). We will provide you with further information when we obtain this consent from you. To purchase certain tickets (e.g. arena tours) you will be redirected to the offers of our partners. Please also note the corresponding data protection information of these partner websites.
We process your personal data only as long as it is necessary for the performance of the contract and for the performance of mutual obligations. In addition, we store your personal data only for the assertion of or defence against legal claims or as long as legal obligations to store exist.
c. Sale of merchandise to customers outside the EU/EEA
Without myFCB login: If you have added merchandise in our Global Store shopping cart for delivery to an address outside the European Economic Area (EEA) and wish to complete the order, the FCB will redirect you to the checkout page of our e-commerce partner Global-e NL B.V., Krijn Taconiskade 430, 1087 HW Amsterdam, Netherlands. Global-e will then be your contracting party. FCB transmits data to Global-e regarding the products you wish to order (products in the shopping cart, quantity, price). FCB transfers this data to Global-e on the basis of Art. 6(1)(b) GDPR (necessity for the implementation of pre-contractual measures with Global-e). Global-e is an independent controller for the processing of the personal data that you provide for the purpose of the order. For more information about Global-e's processing of personal data, please refer to Global-e's privacy policy, available at
https://www.global-e.com/consumer-privacy-policy
.
With myFCB login: If you have placed fan articles in our Global Store shopping cart, wish to complete the order and are logged into your myFCB account, FCB also transfers your name, email address and billing adress and delivery address, which are stored in your myFCB account, to Global-e so that Global-e can already fill out the order form on the Global-e order page with this data. FCB transfers this data to Global-e on the basis of a legitimate interest in simplifying the conclusion of the contract with Global-e (Art. 6(1)(f) GDPR). If you do not want FCB to transfer this data to Global-e, you must log out of myFCB during your purchase and purchase as a guest.
After you have completed the order of the fan articles on the Global-e order page, FCB processes the data in connection with your order (name, delivery address, email address, telephone number, ordered products and quantity, price of the ordered products, order number and time of the order) so that the FCB can transfer the ordered products to Global-e and Global-e can deliver the ordered products to you. If you return an item to the FCB, we will notify Global-e of the return so that Global-e can refund you the price. The legal basis for the processing is Art. 6(1)(b) GDPR (contract performance).
We only process your personal data for as long as necessary for the aforementioned purposes. Beyond that, we only store personal data for the purpose of asserting or defending against legal claims or as long as there are legal obligations to store it.
d. Displaying content on the website
We use various service providers and technologies to be able to display the website as well as its essential content such as videos, images or social media posts to you in your internet browser. We may process some of your personal data for this purpose in individual cases. We do this to deliver content to your device, to thank you for your participation in a survey or to find hashtags from social media posts by fans about FC Bayern on the internet and to display the respective posts on the website. The legal basis for the processing is Art. 6(1) (b) GDPR (performance of a contract). In this context, your personal data will only be processed as long as it is necessary to display the content. In addition, we store your personal data only for the assertion of or defence against legal claims or as long as legal obligations to store exist.
Picture / graphic delivery
If necessary, we process information about your browser, operating system, and the URL you previously visited in order to deliver images and graphics optimally to your end device and to ensure the website’s stability. The legal basis for the processing is Art. 6(1)(b) GDPR (performance of a contract). Images or graphics could otherwise not be displayed on the website. We process your personal data for this purpose only as long as it is necessary to deliver the images and graphics to you. In addition, we store your personal data only for the assertion of or defence against legal claims or as long as legal obligations to store exist.
Social media hashtags
We process certain social media posts posted by you with an "FC Bayern Munich" hashtag (e.g. #fcb) on the basis of our legitimate interest (Art. 6(1)(f) GDPR). Our legitimate interest is to display and share posts from fans with an FC Bayern Munich hashtag on our website with other fans.
If you or other persons are depicted in your posts, we process the posts only with your prior consent (Art. 6(1)(a) GDPR), which you give by posting with a corresponding hashtag. You can revoke your consent at any time with effect for the future by sending us a message to
datenschutz@fcbayern.com
. The legality of the data processing carried out by us before revocation remains unaffected.
We process your personal data only until the above-mentioned purposes are fulfilled.  In addition, we store your personal data only for the assertion of or defence against legal claims or as long as legal obligations to store exist.
Further information on the processing of your personal data in this context, in particular also by social networks, can be found below in section 5.
Cookies
Information on the cookies and similar technologies used by us on the website can be found under section 4 below and
here
.
e. Newsletter Service
Newsletter Receipt
At your request, we process your personal data to send you regular newsletters and marketing information you have selected by email, providing information about current events as well as about attractive offers from FC Bayern München (FC Bayern München AG, FC Bayern München Merchandising AG & Co. KG, FC Bayern München Service AG & Co. KG, FC Bayern Munich LLC, FC Bayern Munich Shanghai Co. Ltd, FC Bayern Tours GmbH, Allianz Arena München Stadion GmbH, FC Bayern München e.V., FC Bayern München Basketball GmbH) and its official partners, which you can find
here ('
Newsletter
“).
If you subscribe to Newsletters, we process your email address and information on the newsletter delivery as well as optional details provided by you like country, language, salutation, name, date of birth and favourite player. To document your consent, we process the following data: the selected newsletter type, time of registration and technical data of the double opt-in procedure (‘
Newsletter Subscription Data’
).
A subscription to a Newsletter is only possible with your consent. The legal basis for the processing is Art. 6(1)(a) GDPR. You may unsubscribe from a Newsletter at any time, with effect for the future, via the link at the end of the newsletter, by email to
feedback-newsletter@fcbayern.com
or directly via your user profile in myFCB.
Observation of your interest in the newsletter
The Newsletter contains so-called "pixels". This allows us to observe whether or not you have opened or clicked on the Newsletter.
If we detect that you have not opened the Newsletter for a considerable period of time, we will assume that you are no longer interested in the Newsletter and will remove you from the distribution list. In this way, we do not process your data for an unnecessarily long period and we have an up-to-date distribution list at all times.
We process your data for this purpose on the basis of our legitimate to maintain a user-friendly and secure newsletter system that meets the users’ expectations (Art. 6(1)(f) GDPR).
Newsletter tracking
The Newsletter contains so-called "pixels". When you open the Newsletter, technical information such as information about the browser and your system as well as your IP address, the time of delivery of the Newsletter and your interactions with the Newsletter (opening, clicks on content and links; together: ’
Newsletter Usage Data
’) is processed by us. For the processing of your subsequent activities on our website or in our app, the information described in our cookie banner applies.
We process your Newsletter Usage Data to improve our Newsletter technically, to learn about our subscribers’ reading habits and to adapt the content to their preferences.
We process your Newsletter Usage Data  based on the consent you give us together with the Newsletter registration. The legal basis for the processing is Art. 6(1) (a) GDPR. You may withdraw your consent for the processing of your Newsletter Usage Data together with your consent for the Newsletter receipt at any time with effect for the future via the link at the end of the newsletter, by email to
feedback-newsletter@fcbayern.com
or directly via your user profile in myFCB.
Processing period
We process your personal data for these purposes (i) until you withdraw your consent with effect for the future or (ii) as long as you show interest in our newsletters. Furthermore, we store personal data only for the assertion of or defence against legal claims or as long as legal obligations for retention exist.
f. Personalisation of messages and content
If you have consented in particular in the cookie banner (personalization cookie) and when registering for the Newsletter/app and have not revoked or changed your consent, we will provide you with personalized Newsletters or push notifications as well as personalized content on our website, our apps and digital offers.
Personalization of messages and content
We personalize messages and content for you based on your interests, your behaviour and your input on our website, in Newsletters, in the apps and other digital offers of FC Bayern (in particular of us and of FC Bayern München Basketball GmbH). In particular, we process data stored by personalization cookies when you visit our website or our apps, Newsletter Usage Data and Newsletter Subscription Data (including email address), data on activities on the website or in the app when you are logged in (e.g. shopping cart, abandoned shopping cart, purchases made, shopping cart, abandoned shopping cart, purchases made, goods ordered and prices, date of purchase, returns, tickets, parking tickets), basic data and usage data from your myFCB registration (e.g. user ID, e-mail address, account data, membership number, preferred payment method, membership, interests) as well as data from other services, such as Bayern TV Plus subscriptions, Smart TV app and or the FC Bayern apps, in order to learn about your interests and to address you in a personalized manner.
Personalized messages by our FC Bayern Munich partners
You will also receive personalized messages from FC Bayern München partners (‘
Partners
’). For this purpose, we pass on suitable information about your interests as well as your e-mail address to our Partners. You can find a detailed list of our current Partners
here
.
Legal basis, revocation, adjustment
The legal basis for the personalization of messages and content as well as the sharing of your data with our Partners is your consent (Art. 6(1)(a) GDPR), which you give us in the cookie banner and when registering for the Newsletter. You can revoke or withdraw your consent at any time with effect for the future via the link in the newsletter, in the
Preference Center
in myFCB or via Email. You can also prevent or interrupt the merging of your data by logging out of your myFCB account and/or regularly deleting your personalization cookies. The legality of the data processing carried out by us prior to revocation remains unaffected.
We process your personal data for these purposes until you withdraw your consent with effect for the future. Beyond this, we only store personal data for the assertion of or defense against legal claims or as long as there are legal obligations to store it.
g. Product recommendations by email
Product recommendations for customers
As a customer of our online offer, you regularly receive product recommendations from us by email. You will receive these product recommendations from us irrespective of whether you have subscribed to a newsletter or not. We use the email address you provided as part of a purchase to promote our own goods and/or services that are similar to those, you have purchased from us based on an order you have placed.
The processing of your personal data for this purpose is based on our legitimate interest in direct marketing to existing customers (Art. 6(1) (f) GDPR). You may object to these product recommendations at any time, with effect for the future, by written notification to FC Bayern München AG, Säbener Str. 51-57 in 81547 Munich, using the link provided at the end of the recommendation email or by sending a message to
datenschutz@fcbayern.com
.
Newsletter and product recommendations for business partners
As the point of contact for our business partners, we regularly provide you with information by email about contract-related news, new or related offers that could be relevant for your company, and other information that could be important for the performance of our business relationship. We use the email address provided by you or your company as part of the commercial business relationship for this purpose.
The processing of your personal data for this purpose is based on our legitimate interest in keeping the contact persons of business customers informed about matters relevant to the contract and offers (Art. 6(1)(f) GDPR). You can object to receiving this email at any time with future effect by sending written notification to FC Bayern München AG, Säbener Str. 51-57 in 81547 Munich or at
datenschutz@fcbayern.com
. You can also let us know whether we should send this email to another email address of your company.
Detection of interest in the recommendation emails
The recommendation emails contain so-called "pixels". This allows us to determine whether or not you have opened or clicked on the recommendation emails.
If we detect that you have not opened the recommendation emails for a considerable period of time, we will assume that you are no longer interested in them and will remove you from the distribution list. In this way, we do not process your data for an unnecessarily long period and we have an up-to-date distribution list at any time.
We process your data for this purpose on the basis of our legitimate interest in the use of a user-friendly and secure “newsletter system” that meets the users’ expectations (Art. 6(1) (f) GDPR).
We will process your personal data for this purpose as long as you indicate an interest in our products or until you object to receiving product recommendations. In addition, we store your personal data only for the assertion of or defence against legal claims or as long as legal obligations to store exist.
h. Flyers, catalogues and all advertising delivered by post
We process your name, your address data and your interest in FC Bayern for marketing purposes if we are convinced that we have attractive offers ready for you.
The processing of your personal data for this purpose takes place on the basis of our legitimate interest in advertising by post (Art. 6(1)(f) GDPR).
You can object to the receipt of such direct advertising at any time by sending a written message to FC Bayern München AG, Säbener Str. 51-57, 81547 Munich or by email to
service@fcbayern.com
.
Upon receipt of your objection, we will immediately cease sending you marketing information and will not pass the data on to third parties for marketing purposes.
We process your personal data for this purpose as long as you show an interest in our products or until you object to receiving product recommendations. In addition, we store your personal data only for the assertion of or defence against legal claims or as long as legal obligations to store exist.
i. Contact
Contact form
On our website, you can enter personal data via a contact form. If you use the contact form, we process the data you enter in the input mask (e.g. surname, first name, street, street number, town, postcode, email address, message, time of request and server log data).
The legal basis for the processing is Art. 6(1)(b) GDPR (performance of a contract).
We use the data exclusively in order to process and answer your query.
We process the personal data you provide us to contact you only until we have conclusively answered your enquiry. In addition, we store your personal data only for the assertion of or defence against legal claims or as long as legal obligations to store exist.
Chatfunctionality
You can also use a chatbot on our website to get in touch (‘
Chat Functionality
’). The Chat Functionality is a customer support service that is initially based on the use of artificial intelligence (‘
AI
’) and then – depending on the content – hands over the conversation to one of our service employees. The chatbot runs on our instance, i.e. the data is not shared with third parties.
To provide the Chat Functionality, we store a chat ID, a random user ID, a session ID and the chat history in the local storage of your device. You can find more information about this in our cookie settings.
When you use the Chat Functionality, we process the chat history (e.g. last name, first name, address, email address and other data that you or the service employee enters into the chat) as well as technically required connection data and background information (e.g. URL, random user ID, session ID, user language). We process this data for the purpose of providing the Chat functionality. We also use the chat content (after removing any personal references) to analyse and optimise our Chat Functionality.
The legal basis for the processing is Art. 6 (1) (b) GDPR (performance of the contract to provide the Chat Functionality).
We process your connection data and background information until we have finally answered your chat request. We store chat content for up to 30 days. Beyond that, we only store personal data for the purpose of asserting or defending against legal claims or as long as there are legal obligations to store it.
j. Special promotions with partners
From time to time, we conduct special promotions together with certain business partners, during which you can also take advantage of attractive offers from our partners ("
special promotions
"). In order to carry out these special promotions, it may be necessary for us to process your personal data and pass it on to our partners. We will inform you about the details, in particular the identity of the respective partner and the processed personal data (e.g. name, address, email address), in each case in connection with your participation in the special promotion.
The processing of your personal data, including the transmission of your personal data to the respective partner, will only take place with your consent. The legal basis for the processing is Art. 6(1)(a) GDPR (consent). Our partners then process your personal data on receipt at their own responsibility. Therefore, please also note the corresponding data protection information of our partners.
We will only process the personal data you provide to us in connection with special promotions as long as this is necessary to enable you to participate in the special promotion. In addition, we store your personal data only for the assertion of or defence against legal claims or as long as legal obligations to store exist.
k. Accreditations
We process personal data in connection with the creation and use of authorization passes (
"Accreditations"
) for specially authorized visitors with a specific work assignment to FCB events (e.g. matches in the Allianz Arena) or appointments (
"Accredited Persons"
). Registration for an Accreditation can be made by the Accredited Person or by someone else on her/his behalf (e.g. the employer). Our data processing in connection with Accreditations also includes verifying the legitimate use of the Accreditation in accordance with the applicable terms and conditions as well as supplementary guidelines, processing reports of loss of the Accreditation and checking Accreditations in and out.
We process the following data for the above-mentioned purposes, each as required in the individual case: surname, first name, photo, company, position/title, department, address, license plate number, registration data such as email address and password, type of event/appointment and date, barcode on the Accreditation, check-in and check-out times, information on the loss of Accreditations (place, time, circumstances) as well as violations of the applicable terms and related guidelines. If Accredited Persons are authorized to bring along additional persons, we will process the full name, address, type of event/appointment and date of these persons.
The legal basis for the processing of such data is Art. 6(1)(b) GDPR (performance of a contract).
We process the personal data received from you or from authorized third parties for Accreditations only as long as this is necessary for your Accreditation. In addition, we store your personal data only for the assertion of or defence against legal claims or as long as legal obligations to store exist.
We reserve the right to conduct a background check via competent authorities as part of the Accreditation process if there are specific indications that such a check is necessary (e.g. relevant past misconduct). We conduct such procedure and transfer the corresponding data to the authority on the basis of our legitimate interests in ensuring that our events run smoothly and safely (Art. 6(1)(f) GDPR). Should we, in individual cases, be legally obliged to carry out such a background check (Art. 6(1)(c) GDPR), we will inform you in advance about such legal obligation, unless prohibited by law.
For further data processing in connection with your visit to the stadium, the following also apply:
Privacy Policy
of FCB on General Ticket Purchases and Stadium Visits, in particular for data processing in connection with video surveillance and image recording in the stadium and stadium bans; and
(if the Allianz Arena app is used) the
data protection information
for the Allianz Arena app that you can find in the Allianz Arena app menu under “Datenschutz”/”Data Privacy”..
l. Whistleblower System
Information on how FCB processes personal data in connection with the
Whistleblower System
that can be accessed via this website can be found under "
Privacy policy
" on the Whistleblower System page.
4. Cookies and similar technologies
a. What are cookies and similar technologies?
Some of our online services require that we use cookies or similar technologies such as pixels (collectively: "
cookies
"). Cookies, in this sense, are small files or other technologies that allow us to learn how you use the website.
b. What cookies are used on this site and how do I manage them with the cookie opt-in solution?
You can find a list of the cookies we use, descriptions of the purposes of the cookies and further information on the respective cookies
here
in our cookie consent solution.
On your first visit to our website and then at any time in our cookie opt-in solution, you can accept or decline individual cookies or all cookies separately by placing a green tick next to the cookie or removing it and then clicking on "Save settings".
The settings you make in the cookie opt-in solution are stored on your computer or mobile device. You will therefore need to do this again if you delete your browser history or use another device or internet browser.
The descriptions of cookies in this Section 4 also apply to other FC Bayern websites for which FC Bayern München AG is listed as controller in the cookie banner, e.g. https://fcbayern.com/basketball.
5. Integration of social plugins and social embeds
a. Social Plugins
We provide social plugins of the social networks Facebook (operated by Meta Platforms) and Twitter on our website. These are offers from the companies Meta Platforms Ireland Ltd. (4 Grand Canal Square, Grand Canal Harbour, Dublin 2, Ireland) and Twitter International Company (1 Cumberland St S, Fenian St, Dublin 2, D02 AX07, Ireland; Meta Platforms and Twitter together referred to as
"network operators"
). You can recognise these plugins by the respective Facebook and Twitter logos. You can use these plugins to like or to share or to otherwise be active directly on the relevant network.
Before you click on the Facebook "Share" and the Twitter "Tweet" button, only our server address will be transferred to Meta Platforms and to Twitter instead of your IP address and other data. We can achieve this by using a privacy-friendly alternative (Shariff button). You will remain invisible to the respective network operator for as long as you do not click on the social plugin to share content.
We use this privacy-friendly alternative (Shariff button) to prevent social networks from tracking and storing internet behaviour without the user’s active contribution. For more information on the solution used, please visit the following link:
http://www.heise.de/ct/ausgabe/2014-26-Social-Media-Buttons-datenschutzkonform-nutzen-2463330.html
By using the social plugin, you agree to the collection of your personal data by the respective network operator. The network operator will be responsible for the collection and processing of personal data, which subsequently takes place, including processing based on their use of cookies and similar technologies. Specifically, information about which of our websites you have visited and your IP address will then be transferred to the network operator, even if you do not have a profile with the respective social network or are not currently logged in to the network. If you are logged in to the social networks as a member, the network operator will attach the information to your personal user account.
We therefore recommend that you read the privacy policy of the relevant network before using the social plugin:
You will find more information about how your personal data is processed by
Meta Platforms
in the Meta Platforms privacy policy for Facebook at:
https://www.facebook.com/privacy/policy/
You will find more information about how your personal data is processed by
X
in the X  privacy policy at:
https://x.com/en/privacy
.
b. Social Embeds
We provide you with social embeds of the social networks Facebook, Instagram, X, YouTube and LinkedIn on our website. Social embeds are content from social networks that we integrate on our website so that it is not necessary to leave our website. This is called embedding. This involves the integration of posts, videos or other content from the companies Meta Platforms Ireland Ltd. (4 Grand Canal Square, Grand Canal Harbour, Dublin 2, Ireland; however, personal data may also be processed by Meta Platforms Inc, 1601 S. California Ave, Palo Alto, CA 94304, USA), Instagram LLC (1601 Willow Road Menlo Park, CA 94025, USA; however, Meta Platforms is responsible for Instagram under data protection law, see above), Twitter International Company (One Cumberland Place, Fenian Street, Dublin 2 D02 AX07, Ireland; however, personal data may also be processed by X Corp., 1355 Market Street, Suite 900, San Francisco CA 94103, USA), YouTube LLC (901 Cherry Ave., San Bruno, CA 94066, USA; however, Google Ireland Limited, Gordon House Barrow Street Dublin 4, D04E5W5, Ireland, is responsible under data protection law and personal data may also be processed by Google LLC, 1600 Amphitheatre Parkway, Mountain View, CA 94043, USA) and LinkedIn Ireland Unlimited Company (Wilton Plaza, Gardner House 4,5,6, Dublin, Ireland; however, personal data may also be processed by LinkedIn Corporation, 605 W Maude Ave, Sunnyvale, CA 94085, USA) on our website.
You can recognise the social embeds by the respective logos of the companies or networks next to an image, post or other content that is recognisable as external. Once these social embeds have been activated, you will be able to see the content, which we have integrated on our website from the activated social network.
Before clicking on the respective "Show content" button ("
Activation Button
"), our privacy-friendly activation solution prevents your personal data, e.g. your IP address, from being transmitted to the relevant network operator. You will remain invisible to the respective network operator for as long as you do not click on the Activation Button.
We use this privacy-friendly alternative (activation solution) to prevent social networks from tracking and storing internet behaviour without the user’s active contribution.
By clicking the Activation Button, you agree to the collection of your personal data by the respective network operator. Alternatively, you may also enable social embeds via our cookie consent solution. The network operator will be responsible for the collection and processing of personal data that subsequently takes place, including processing based on their use of cookies and similar technologies. You should at least assume the following: Information about which of our websites you have visited and your IP address will then be transferred to the network operator even if you do not have a profile/account with the respective social network or are not currently logged in there. If you are logged in to the social networks as a member, the network operator will attach the information to your personal user account. We will not receive any of this information.
We therefore recommend that you read the privacy policy of the relevant network before clicking the activation button:
Facebook (operated by Meta Platforms):
https://de-de.facebook.com/policy.php
Instagram (operated by Meta Platforms):
https://help.instagram.com/155833707900388
X:
https://x.com/en/privacy
YouTube:
https://policies.google.com/privacy?hl=de
LinkedIn:
https://www.linkedin.com/legal/privacy-policy
Using our
cookie consent solution
you can deactivate social embeds in total or for individual providers for the future.
6. Data transfer to processors and other controllers
In some of the data processing described in this privacy policy, we work together with other companies. These other companies are either processors or other controllers. In addition to the information on data recipients made available in this privacy policy or in the cookie consent solution for specific cases, the following applies in this regard:
a. Processors
All personal data that we process in connection with this website is processed by us or so-called processors. Processors are companies that only process your personal data for us strictly in accordance with our instructions, such as IT service providers (e.g., for hosting and maintenance of the website; cookie providers and analytics providers) or advertising agencies. We use processors primarily to (better) provide our services to you. If these processors are located outside the European Economic Area (EEA), section 6. c. below applies additionally. We have carefully selected these service providers and concluded data processing agreements with them.
b. Other controllers
In certain cases, we may disclose your personal data to other controllers who process the personal data for their own purposes rather than in accordance with our instructions. We will then only share your data for specific purposes, to which these other data controllers must adhere. These purposes are:
Contract performance and service provision
Insofar as necessary for contract performance or the provision of services to you, we transfer your personal data to our contractual partners, e.g. in the context of orders for delivery to the parcel delivery company, in the Global store to ship to an address outside of the European economic area (EEA), in connection with your membership to FC Bayern München e.V., in connection with purchases in the Online Shop to FC Bayern München Basketball GmbH, as well as for login to the app and personalization of messages and content of FC Bayern München Basketball GmbH, for the provision of marketing services to cookie providers, or in the case of payments to the payment provider selected by you.
The transfer of your personal data to these other controllers for these purposes takes place on the basis of contract performance(Art. 6 (1)(b)GDPR), or on the basis of our legitimate interest (Art. 6(1)(f) GDPR) in making our business efficient.
Personal Data is transmitted to FC Bayern München Basketball GmbH in connection with myFCB (ticketing, online shop and login to the app) for the purpose of performing a contract (Art. 6(1)(b) GDPR) or on the basis of your consent (Art. 6(1)(a) GDPR), which you have given to FC Bayern München Basketball GmbH (Newsletter) or to us (surfing behaviour in the cookie banner at https://fcbayern.com). If you have not given consent, e.g. for the transmission of cookie data which can be collected without consent, we will only transmit aggregated data to FC Bayern München Basketball GmbH from which your identifiers have been removed on the basis of our legitimate interest (Art. 6(1)(f) GDPR; our interest and the interest of FC Bayern Munich Basketball GmbH in providing a functioning website).
If you request this, we will transfer your contact details (your email address and/or phone number) to parcel delivery companies so that the parcel delivery companies can inform you about details regarding the delivery of your order (e.g. package notifications). The transfer of your personal data to shipping companies for this purpose is based on your consent (Art. 6(1)(a) GDPR). You can withdraw your consent at any time with effect for the future by sending a message to us (datenschutz@fcbayern.com).
These other controllers may only use the transferred data for the purpose for which we transferred it. If these controllers are located outside the EEA, section 6. c. below will apply in addition.
Credit checks
In justified cases (e.g. direct debit procedures), we exchange address and creditworthiness data with credit service companies and credit agencies in Germany for the purpose of credit checks. These companies only receive personal data as necessary for the performance of the respective activity (e.g., name, address, date of birth) from us. The legal basis is our legitimate interest (Art. 6(1)(f) GDPR) in avoiding a credit default risk.
Legal obligation or enforcement of legal claims
Otherwise, we will only disclose your personal data to other controllers if and to the extent required by law, to enforce legal rights, or to investigate or prevent suspected or actual illegal activity. In these cases, we will inform you separately about the respective transfer if and to the extent legally required.
c. Joint controllership with other FC Bayern entities
In connection with myFCB (see section 3. a.), our Newsletter service (see Section 3. e.) and the personalization of messages and content (see section 3.  f.) your personal data will be processed by FC Bayern München Basketball GmbH (
‘FCBB’
) and FC Bayern München eV (
‘FCB eV’
) under joint control with us. We are responsible for the operation of myFCB, the registration and administration of users (website and app),  sending Newsletters (provided these do not exclusively concern FCBB (in particular the FCBB Newsletter with exclusive reference to the FCBB, without the user's consent to the personalisation of addresses and content) or FCB eV), the sale of football tickets and merchandise in the online shop, the personalization of messages and content, processing in connection with the Kids Club and for the creation of blacklists (these include users who have violated our terms and conditions, such as those regarding ticket resales).
Within the scope of joint controllership, FCB e.V. is responsible for the processing of personal data in connection with the administration of the club membership of the data subjects.
Within the scope of joint controllership, FCBB is responsible for the processing of personal data in connection with (i) the administration of personalisation data, marketing preferences, the sending of marketing communications and the personalisation of basketball-related content, and (ii) transactions via the digital platform in the area of basketball ticketing (e.g. purchases via the online shop), in each case if and to the extent that they relate to FCBB.
For the joint controllership relation, we have concluded a joint controllership agreement in accordance with Art. 26 GDPR. Please contact our data protection officer to assert data subject rights in connection with the responsibilities of the FCB mentioned here. You will find the contact details of our data protection officer in section 1 of this privacy policy.
d. Transfer to third countries
If we transfer your personal data to processors or other controllers in countries outside the European Economic Area (EEA) (for example, in the USA), we implement the standards and security mechanisms required by law. We achieve this, for example, by agreeing on the so-called EU standard contract clauses. Please contact us as described in section 1 to learn more about the specific security mechanisms we use.
7. Secure data transmission
All personal data you transmit to us during your visit on the website in general and during the ordering process in particular, are transmitted in encrypted form. We establish a so-called SSL connection for each transaction. SSL (Secure Socket Layer) is a procedure in which your data is encrypted in such a way that it cannot be read by unauthorised persons during transmission on the Internet.
You can recognise the SSL connection by the fact that the Internet address has changed from http:// to https://. In addition, the secure connection is usually indicated by a closed padlock in the status bar of your web browser.
8. Your rights
You have the following legal rights against FC Bayern München AG with regard to your personal data, provided that the respective requirements are met. You can find further information on your rights and the relevant requirements on the EU Commission's website at https://commission.europa.eu/law/law-topic/data-protection/reform/rights-citizens_en.
a. Right of access
As a data subject, you have the right to request confirmation as to whether we process personal data that concerns you. If this is the case, you have the right to information about this personal data, as well as other information, e.g., the processing purposes, the recipients and the planned duration of storage or the criteria for determining the duration.
b. Right to rectification and completion
As a data subject, you have the right to demand the correction of incorrect personal data without delay. Taking into account the purposes of the processing, you have the right to request the completion of incomplete personal data.
c. Right to erasure ("right to be forgotten")
As concerned data subject, you may have the right to the erasure your personal data. For example, if your personal data is no longer necessary for its original purpose, you have revoked your consent, or the personal data has been improperly processed.
d. Right to restriction of processing
As a data subject, you have the right to restrict the processing in the cases prescribed by law.
e. Right to data portability
As a data subject, you have the right, in the cases prescribed by law, to receive the personal data concerning you in a structured, common and machine-readable format.
f. Right of objection
As a data subject, you have the right to object at any time to the processing of certain personal data concerning you for any reason relating to your particular situation.
In the case of direct marketing, as adata subject, you have the right to object at any time to the processing of personal data concerning you for the purpose of such marketing, including profiling insofar as it is linked to such direct marketing.
g. Right to revoke your consent under data protection law
You may revoke your consent to the processing of your personal data at any time with effect for the future. However, the lawfulness of the processing carried out before the revocation is not affected.
h. Right to complain to a data protection authority
You have the right to lodge a complaint with a supervisory authority, in particular in the Member State in which you reside, your place of work or the place where the alleged infringement was committed, if you believe that the processing of your personal data violates the GDPR.
The responsible supervisory authority for FC Bayern München AG is the Bayerische Landesaufsicht für Datenschutz (
https://www.lda.bayern.de/de/kontakt.html
).
9. Changes
Our privacy policy and also the descriptions in our cookie consent solution may change from time to time. This also includes further developments due to changes in our business and adjustments due to a changed legal situation and/or due to the implementation of new technologies or services on the website. Any updates to the privacy policy will be published by us on this page. In the event of significant changes, we will point this out accordingly. If you have any further questions that our privacy policy could not answer, please send an email to the following address:
datenschutz@fcbayern.com
Version: March 2025
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
https://www.global-e.com/consumer-privacy-policy:
Language:
Arabic (العربية)
Chinese (汉语)
Chinese (漢語)
Dutch (Nederlands)
English
French (Français)
German (Deutsch)
Italian (Italiano)
Japanese (日本語)
Korean (한국어)
Spanish (Español)
Global-e CONSUMER Privacy Policy
Last updated: January 15, 2025
This Privacy Policy (“
Policy
”) governs how Global-e (“
Global-e
”, “
we
”, “
our
” or “
us
”) collect, receive, use, store and disclose Information (sometimes referred to as “Personal Information”, as defined below) about individuals in connection with the use of our services for the sale of products to you, or if applicable, such other services which are explicitly indicated in this Policy (“
Services
”). References to Global-e (or “
we
”, “
our
” or “
us
”) will refer to the Global-e group including the entities, subsidiaries and affiliated companies listed
<<here>>
, and will also include the site operating as “Borderfree.com” and the services offered thereunder (which if offered, will form part of the Service).
This Policy explains our privacy practices for processing Personal Information, as defined below, related to our Services. We will collect, use or disclose your Information only in accordance with the terms of this Policy.
If you do not wish your Information to be collected, please do not submit it. However, please bear in mind that we will not be able to process your order or be limited in performing all or part of our Services without receiving your details.
If you are a resident of, or placing your order for fulfilment into one of the countries listed in the section of
“
Additional information for users of certain jurisdictions
” then the additional and specific terms may apply to you. Please review them.
Global-e may change and update the terms of this Policy from time to time. If we decide to change our Policy materially, we will post the revised Policy on our website with an updated effective date and we will inform you of such changes by any appropriate means. If you continue to use the Service after these changes are posted, you confirm to have read and acknowledged the revised Policy.
‍
Policy Summary/Notice at Collection
For your convenience, we included below a summary of this Policy. This will give you an overview of our practices. Please take the time to read our full Policy for detailed information on each section.
Why we collect your Information
We collect your Information only when we need to, mainly for providing the Services and performing the contract with you. In some cases, we collect your Information following your consent or for our legitimate interests, as detailed further. We may also collect your Information if bound by legal obligations.
How we collect Information
We collect Information directly and indirectly from you, when you fill out your details in the checkout page, contact customer service, or when interacting with the services on the webstore. We also receive information from our third parties such as the Store Owners.
Information we collect
For fulfilling the Services, we will need your Personal Information such as your name, email address and delivery address. We will also need your payment details (e.g. credit card number) to have your payment processed by our contracted payment processors. If you contact our customer support, we will need any other relevant Information, that will help us to solve the inquiry.
How we use your Information
We use your Information for performing the contract with you and for our related legitimate interests. This includes improving the Services and our products, supporting Store Owners, testing new features and protecting our Services from any misuse and legal violations. We may, subject to obtaining your consent or otherwise subject to taking all required legal measures, use your Information for communicating specific offers, promotions or market activities related to our Services. If you have agreed to such communication, you will be able to unsubscribe from them at any time.
For improving your cross-border shopping experience, we collect information by using different types of cookies. We automatically log ‘traffic/session’ information including your IP addresses, all as detailed under our Cookie Policy available using this <<
link
>>, so please make sure you review it. Our Service does not respond to Do Not Track (DNT) signals. Data used for analytic purposes is aggregated and/or anonymized, and we may use it without sending any further notice.
We may also collect identity number (local ID, passport) if such information is required by your country for example to facilitate customs clearance or remittance of import taxes and duties.
Sharing your Information
We will share Information that we collect with third parties for fulfilling your order in relation to the Services. This includes, for example, the Store Owner operating the site where you placed your order, payment processors or facilitators and the order’s chosen carrier. If you provided your specific consent, we would provide the Store Owner with your Information for the Store Owner’s marketing purposes.
We will also share your Information with third party service providers and other providers, including those who provide us analytics tools, as detailed in our Cookie Policy, if necessary, to fulfil the purposes for collecting the Information, provided that any such third party will commit to protect your privacy as required under applicable law and this Policy, and all in connection with performing or rendering the Services.
The sharing or disclosure of your Information to the Store Owner or to any third-party mentioned in this Policy are strictly required for the performance of the Services. You should also read the privacy policies of the Store Owners.
We may also share your Information to comply with a court order or a request from a public authority.
We will not sell your Information
.
Protecting your Information
We take steps to de-identify and anonymize parts of your Information so that it no longer can be used to directly or indirectly identify you (we will do this in a way that will also prevent this data from ever being re-identified).
Children’s privacy
We do not intend to collect Information from anyone we know to be under the legal minimum age in each jurisdiction where the Service is available (“
Minimum
Age
”). If you believe that we have collected such information, please contact us at dataprotection@global-e.com.
Sharing Information in case of a structural change
Merger, acquisition or any other structural change will require us to transfer your Information to other entities, provided that the receiving entities will comply with similarly protective policy in accordance with applicable law. We base such processing operations on our legitimate interest(s), as well as on certain legal obligations we may be subject to.
Other sites and services
For completing your online orders and providing the Services, you may be redirected by links to third party websites (for example, you may elect to pay for your order using PayPal), that are subject to their own privacy policies (please read these policies and make sure you understand them).
Your rights and choice under data protection laws
We do our best to protect your Information, and allowing you to fulfill all of your right under local privacy laws. You may terminate your use of the Services at any time.
We implement systems, applications and procedures to secure your Information, to minimize the risks of theft, damage, loss of Information, or unauthorized access or use of Information. We retain data as needed. We respect your rights under local privacy laws and within the legal limits, such as the right for data retention and your rights to access the information, to correct and to request from us to delete records from our systems. At any time you can submit such requests in our
privacy center.
Not all your requests can be fulfilled at the time of contacting us due to regulatory requirements. However, we keep Information only for legitimate and lawful purposes, and only for the duration required for complying with applicable laws.
Transferring Personal Information outside your territory
Global-e adheres to applicable laws and regulation regarding the transfer of Personal Information across jurisdictions and geographical regions.
Global-e data servers are located in the European Economic Area (“EEA”). If you used Global-e services, your data is stored and processed in Ireland.
Borderfree services are located in the USA. If you used Borderfree services, your data is stored and processed in the USA.
We transfer Information within the Global-e group, only in accordance with the law and this Policy based on the place of your residency and the sub-processors fulfilling the transaction. Data transfers are protected under legally binding agreements. If you are located in the European Union, the UK or Switzerland, you information is protected under the Standard Contractual Clauses or pursuant to applicable Transfer Adequacy Decision.
Dispute Resolution
Contact us at:
dataprotection@global-e.com
. We will make good-faith efforts to resolve any existing or potential dispute with you.
Additional information for users of certain jurisdictions
If you are a user in certain jurisdictions, we have some clarifications and further information for you in relation to the applicable local law. Please read the section “
Additional information for users of certain jurisdictions”
.
Contact us
Please contact us at:
dataprotection@global-e.com
for further information. Our EU-GDPR representative according to Art. 27 GDPR is Rickert Rechtsanwaltsgesellschaft mbH, Colmantstraße 15, 53225 Bonn,
art-27-rep-global-e@rickert.law
.
Our UK representative is Globale UK Limited, of 154 Clerkenwell Rd, London EC1R 5AB, UK,
dataprotection@global-e.com
.
Privacy Policy
Why we collect your Information
We collect your Information only if it is required. When you shop from store owners we fulfill their orders (“Store Owners”), and use our Services, we need to process the transaction and make sure the products are delivered to you. For fulfilling the Services, will need your Information, such as your name, email address and delivery address. We will also need your payment details (e.g. credit card number) to have your payment processed by our contracted payment processors. If you contact customer support, other relevant information will be needed to help solve the inquiry. In some cases, we collect your Information following your consent, for our legitimate interests or if bound by a legal obligation, as detailed further.
Information we collect
For providing you with the Services, we collect your first name, last name, email, phone number, postal address and payment information including the payment method and payment details (or payment voucher details) that you provide us. We may also collect identity number (local ID, passport) if such information is required by your country for example to facilitate customs clearance or remittance of import taxes and duties. If you have contacted Global-e costumer services with enquiries, we will receive and process any Information that you provide us for resolving such matter.
How we collect Information
Purchases. We receive and collect Information directly from you when you interact with any of the Global-e, Borderfree or Flow checkouts. When you place an order for the purchase of merchandise offered on the Store Owners’ sites, we fulfill such orders and you provide us with the information required for processing your online transaction and for delivering the order to your chosen delivery address or providing costumer support in accordance with our Terms of Sale. If you have a Borderfree account, you already provided us with parts of your Information through your Borderfree user account. Please refer to the
specific terms and policy that applies to such Borderfree user account
.
Store Owners. In certain cases, where for example, you are pre-registered with the Store Owner or the payment method, we may receive part of the Information from the Store Owner to pre-populate transaction in forms for ease of completion by you.
Log Files. We use log files that, where permitted by applicable law, we collect automatically from your computer or device when you interact with the Services. The information contained in log files includes internet protocol (or IP, which is the unique address that identifies your computer or device on the internet), type of browser, Internet Service Provider (ISP), date/time stamp, referring/exit pages, clicked pages and any other information your browser sends us.
Cookies. We use cookies and similar tracking technologies to make sure that our Service is continuously improved and meets your needs. Please review our full Cookies Policy for more information on the types of cookies we use and their expiration dates. We use essential cookies for providing, improving, and optimizing our Services and your experience. Our cookies include cookies provided by third parties used to secure your transaction and to create statical reports based on aggregated and anonymized Data. We use standard analytics tools such as of Google Analytics, Hotjar, Heap and Fullstory (the full and current list is stated in the Cookie Policy).
Do Not Track (“DNT”)
Web browsers offer a “Do Not Track” (“
DNT
”) signal. A DNT signal is a HTTP header field indicating your preference for tracking your activities on the Service or through cross-site user tracking. Our Service does not respond to DNT signals.
Using your Personal Information
By choosing to use the Services for the purchase of goods, you provide us with the legal basis to use and retain your Information as needed to provide you the Services and to improve them.
As a matter of legitimate interest, or business purpose, if applicable, and to the extent permitted by applicable law, we may use your Information to maintain our business relationships and operations, including to support Store Owners, testing new features and prevent and detect fraud and abuse of our Services. In addition, we may also create aggregated statistical data, inferred non-personal data or anonymize data for personalizing your user experience, troubleshooting and to ensure our content and Services are presented in the most effective and relevant manner for you and your device.
We may use the Information to communicate with you in relation to the Services, and in relation to security inquiries or other administrative communications related to transactions you have initiated or completed through our Services. Such communication might include request to identify or authenticate your access to the Service, and are required for maintaining the integrity and security of our customers and systems, Services and business. Please note that such communications are not related to marketing, and therefore, we do not rely on or require your consent.
Analyzing anonymous, aggregated and analytical Information
To the extent permitted by applicable law, we may share anonymize information, or aggregated information from multiple users with the Store Owners, marketing and public relations agencies, or other third parties including our subsidiaries and affiliated companies. This information does not contain Personal Information. We have secured procedure for de-identifying or anonymizing your Information. This ensure that this data cannot be re-identified. When using anonymized information, we will do so without notice to you. We will also disclose Anonymous Data (with or without compensation) to third parties, including advertisers and partners.
“
Anonymous Data
” means data that cannot identify an individual user, whether directly or indirectly, and such identification is irreversibly prevented, such as aggregated data about the use of our Service. Therefore, such data does not constitute “Information” and the use and disclosure of same would not affect any of your rights under applicable privacy laws.
Direct Marketing from Store Owner or Borderfree.com
You will be offered the ability to provide your specific consent via our Service to receive direct marketing materials by either email, telephone, text message or post, relating to consumer goods and services generally available via our Service, including offers by brands from which you may have previously purchased through us or which may be of interest to you.
Your Information may be used for direct marketing sent by Borderfree.com, provided your consent was duly given. You have the right to object to the processing of your Information specifically for direct marketing purposes.
If you wish to opt-out from direct marketing communication please contact us for any communication received from Borderfee.com. If you received communication from the Store Owner, please contact the Store Owner directly. Alternatively, you can use the ‘unsubscribe’ features made available through the relevant marketing communication.
Sharing your Personal Information
For providing you with the Services, we will share you data with the following third parties:
Store Owners. In connection with using our Services to make purchases of products available on webstores, we will share the Information with such specific Store Owner who operates the website through which you made your purchase. Such Store Owner will then be entitled to use your Information as if that Store Owner has collected this information directly, subject to the Store Owner’s own privacy policy. For instance, the Store Owner needs to know that you have made a purchase in order to process its delivery, to handle any requests with respect to the items you purchased or process returns/replacements. The Store Owner may also need to use the Information to validate your subscription or membership or otherwise allow you to take advantage of any loyalty scheme that it administers.
Using Global-e affiliates for Information processing. We will share your Information with our subsidiaries and group companies (listed <<here>>) if your purchases are made from locations which require such transfer for the performance of the Services or delivery of your order, or for such other data processing related to the acquiring of your order, customs clearance and import formalities or fulfilling tax filing obligations directly related with the fulfilment of your order. We will also share and transfer Information to our affiliated companies for storing or processing such information on our behalf in connection with our provision of the Services. Such information will be transferred to other jurisdictions around the world where our servers and systems are located, as described under the “Transferring Personal Information outside your Territory” below.
Using third party service providers. We will share (insofar as such sharing is necessary) your Information with our third-party service providers (such as hosting providers, payment processors, fraud detection and prevention service providers, licensed customs brokers, data and website analytics services and order fulfilment providers) whose tools, software, and services we use to process and complete your transaction(s).
We do not sell your information to others, and do not share your Information with third-parties other than as outlined under this Policy, or to the extent necessary for providing you with the Services.
Legal Obligation and necessary disclosure. We may use the Information to comply with any applicable legal obligations, to enforce any applicable terms of service and to protect or defend the Services, our rights, the rights of our users/customers or others. We will disclose your Information or any information you submitted if we have a good faith belief that disclosure of such information is helpful or reasonably necessary to comply with any applicable law, regulation, legal process or governmental request; enforce the terms of sale, including investigations of potential violations thereof; detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud or security issues; or protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of Global-e, its users, yourself or the public.
Sharing Information in case of a Structural Change. We will disclose or transfer your Information if we are acquired by or merged with a third-party entity, or if we are bankrupted or liquidated. If we will use your Information or disclose for any purposes not covered in this Policy in this regard, then we will make efforts to ensure that you receive prior notification of the new purpose and where relevant or required by applicable law, your consent obtained for those new purposes. We base such processing operations on our legitimate interest(s), as well as on certain legal obligations we may be subject to.
Data Protection Framework (DPF). Global-e US Inc. our US subsidiary, complies with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (EU-U.S. DPF) and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce. Global-e US Inc. has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (EU-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from the European Union and the United Kingdom in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF. If there is any conflict between the terms in this privacy policy and the EU-U.S. DPF Principles, the Principles shall govern. To learn more about the Data Privacy Framework (DPF) Program, and to view our certification, please visit
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/
and will be further liable in cases of onward transfers of your personal data to third parties (including our Service Providers).
Complaints about transfers of data from the EU or the UK to the US & dispute resolution
:
In compliance with the DPF Principles, we commit to resolve complaints about our collection or use of your personal data. EEA and UK individuals with inquiries or complaints regarding our DPF compliance should submit enquiries to
dpo@global-e.com
.
If a privacy complaint or dispute relating to personal data received by us in reliance on the DPF cannot be resolved through our internal processes, you did not receive a timely acknowledgement of your EU-US DPF-Principles related complaint from us, or we did not address your EU-US DPF Principles related complaint to your satisfaction, in compliance with the EU-U.S. DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, Global-e US Inc. commits to refer unresolved complaints concerning our handling of personal data received in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF to JAMS, an alternative dispute resolution provider based in United States, If you do not receive timely acknowledgment of your DPF Principles-related complaint from us, or if we have not addressed your DPF Principles-related complaint to your satisfaction, please visit
https://www.jamsadr.com/DPF-Dispute-Resolution
for more information or to file a complaint. The services of JAMS are provided at no cost to you.
Please note that under certain conditions (as described under the DPF Principles Global-e US Inc. adheres to) you can invoke a binding arbitration by delivering a notice to Global-e US Inc. Inc. via
dpo@global-e.com
.  Please also note that Global-e US Inc. is subject to the investigatory and enforcement powers of the Federal Trade Commission (FTC).
Transferring Personal Information outside your territory
Global-e adheres to applicable laws and regulation regarding the transfer of Personal Information across jurisdictions and geographical regions.
Global-e data servers are located in the European Economic Area (“EEA”). If you used Global-e services, your data is stored and processed in Ireland.
Borderfree services are located in the USA. If you used Borderfree services, your data is stored and processed in the USA.
For providing you with the Services, and as part of our cross-border operations, the Information we collect from you may be transferred to Israel, the United Kingdom (UK), the European Union and the United States, and shared between Global-e entities, and additional parties, including the Store Owner and other service providers and sub-processors for fulfilling our Services. We require such third parties to process such information in compliance with Global-e policies and procedures.
Global-e accepts full responsibility for the protection of your Information, according to the applicable privacy legislation and this Policy during these onward transfers to third parties.
If you are a resident of, or placing your order for fulfilment into one of the countries listed in the section of “
Additional information for users of certain jurisdictions
”, additional and specific terms may apply to you. Please review them.
Protecting your Information
We follow generally accepted industry standards, including the use of appropriate administrative, physical and technical safeguards, to protect the integrity and security of the Information. For example, certain sensitive Information (such as data relating to fraud) is transmitted over a Secure Sockets Layer channel and is encrypted; our payment gateway is Payment Card Industry compliant. However, no method of transmission over the internet, or method of electronic storage, is 100% secure.
Your Information will also be retained by us as necessary to and relevant to our legitimate operations, including time necessary to identify, issue or resolve legal proceedings, enforce our terms of sale, to meet our reporting requirements and as otherwise required in accordance with applicable law obligations.
We will take appropriate steps to delete or permanently de-identify (as permitted by applicable law) or anonymize Information at the point such information is no longer needed by us for our legitimate business or legal obligations. While we strive to use generally accepted means to protect your Information, we cannot guarantee its absolute security or confidentiality. If you have any questions about security on the Service, you can contact us at:
dataprotection@global-e.com
.
Your Choice
We request and collect minimal data needed for the purposes described in this Policy. At any time, you may opt to terminate your use of the Service. Thereafter, we will stop collecting any Information from you. However, we will store and continue using or making available certain Information that is related to you. For further information, please read the “Protecting Personal Information” section in this Policy.
Your rights under data protection laws
In accordance with the laws applicable to you within your geographical region, you may have the following rights with regard to you Information.
Access the Information. If you are eligible for the right of access under the applicable law, you can obtain confirmation from us of whether we are processing Information about you and receive a copy of that data. We may need to ask you to provide us certain credentials to make sure that you are who you claim you are. At any time, you can request to access the Information that we keep about you in
our
privacy center
. We will make good-faith efforts to locate your Information that you request to access.
Rectify the Information that we keep about you. If you find that the Information is not accurate, complete or updated, then you may provide us with the necessary information to rectify it.
Delete your Information. In some cases, you have the right to obtain the erasure of Information concerning you. We will review your request and use our judgment, pursuant to the provisions of the applicable law, to reach a decision about your request.
Restrict the processing of your Information. In some cases, you have the right to obtain restriction of the processing of your Information.
Transfer your Information in accordance with your right to data portability. You have the right to receive the Information concerning you which you have provided to us, in a structured, commonly used and machine- readable format, and you have the right to transmit that Information to another controller without hindrance from us. This right only applies when the processing of your Information is based on your consent or on a contract and such processing is carried out by automated means.
Objection to processing. In certain circumstances, for processing operations based on our legitimate interest(s), you have the right to require us to stop processing your Information that we hold about you. When your Information is processed for direct marketing purposes, you have the right to object at any time to the processing of the Information for such direct marketing purpose. Please contact us or the relevant Store Owner directly to opt out of their marketing activities, or use the ‘unsubscribe’ features made available through the relevant marketing communication.
Automated decision-making, including profiling. You have the right not to be subject to a decision based solely on automated processing, including profiling, which produces legal effects concerning you or similarly significantly affecting you.
Children’s Privacy
The Service is not structured to attract or be directed to anyone under the age of 16 years or the Minimum Age applicable in your jurisdiction. Accordingly, we do not intend to collect Information from anyone we know to be under 16 years or the relevant Minimum Age. In certain countries, as listed in the section of “
Additional information for users of certain jurisdictions
”, the Minimum Age may be different.
If we learn that we have collected Information from a person who is younger than 16 years or the applicable Minimum Age, we will delete that information quickly. If you believe that we have any such information, please contact us at:
dataprotection@global-e.com
.
Other Sites and Services
The Service contains links to third party websites and services that are not owned or controlled by Global-e including third party payment providers. We are not responsible for the privacy practices or the content of third party websites or services and your use of or connection to such links and websites is at your sole risk. You should review their privacy policies.
Changes to this Policy
From time to time, we will update this Policy. If the updates have minor to no consequences, they will take effect 7 days after we post a notice on the Service’s website. Substantial changes will be effective 30 days after we initially posted the notice.
Until the new policy takes effect, if it materially reduces the protection of your privacy right under the then- existing policy, you can choose not to accept it and terminate your use of the Services. Continuing to use the Services after the new policy takes effect means that you agree to the new policy. Note that if we need to adapt the policy to legal requirements, the new policy will become effective immediately or as required by law.
Contact us
Please contact us at:
dataprotection@global-e.com
for further information.
You can contact our DPO at:
dpo@global-e.com
.
For information about our Global-e affiliates please press
here
.
Additional Terms for Borderfree Costumers
As a Borderfree costumer, Global-e Privacy Policy applies to your use of the Borderfree services and offerings, all under the auspice of Global-e. This Annex includes additional information relevant to you if you have registered as a Borderfree.com user and provided your consent to receive marketing communications from us.
Collecting Personal Information
User Account. We collect information from you when you interact with the Borderfree website, and when you provide information via any user account as more fully described in the Borderfree Terms & Conditions at
https://www.borderfree.com/terms/en_us
.
Information provided by you for you User Account. You will be required to provide Information. You will receive the option to use such details as default to pre-populate your future transactions with Borderfree. We will not use your Information as default unless you provided your consent. You can change your details and opt-out from default setting anytime.
Credit Card data or other Payment Information.
You will be offered the option to provide Borderfree with your payment information. If you choose to do so, your payment information can be saved and used as default or preferred payment method when checking-out from a supported webstore. By setting your payment details as default, you provide Borderfree the ability to enhance and improve your shopping experience by pre-populating the transaction from the Store Owner.
If you choose to use such default setting, you consent to Borderfree keeping your payment details in an encrypted authentication token. We will only store the last four digits numbers of you payment card, the card type and the expiry date. Those will also be displayed to you on your account for your review. The full card data are not stored by Borderfree or Global-e entities. Your full card data are only stored and processed by the payment services provider.
Protecting your User Account
In accordance with this Policy, we take measures to secure and protect your account and your payment information according to the PCI Card Data Tokenization and Encryption tokenization guidelines.
Direct Marketing. If you are a Borderfree costumer, and you have provided your consent to receive marketing communications from us, we will use your Information for sending you relevant content from us, including promotions and our partner brands’ promotions, sales, events and other special offers from our affiliate partners. You may also receive customer service communicating requesting your feedback on the Services offered. We provide you the choice as to whether you would like to receive such marketing content from “Broderfree.com.”
Where you have consented to receive such communication, then in accordance with applicable law, these communications could be in the form of an email or text message to a mobile telephone and will contain information relating to us, our partners or a Retailer’s products and services. At any time, you may opt out of receiving these communications by either unsubscribing following the instructions in the email/text you received, or sending a request to
CustomerCare@borderfree.com
or
dataprotection@global-e.com
, or by following any unsubscribe instructions in email communications. Please note that subject to applicable law, if you had given your consent to any of our partners or a Retailer, you should contact then directly (or unsubscribe directly through their communications with you).
Additional Information for users of certain jurisdictions
Additional Information for Residents of the EU or the UK
If the General Data Protection Regulation (Regulation (EU) 2016/679) (the “GDPR”) or the UK General Data Protection Regulation and the UK Data Protection Act 2018 (together the “UK DPA”), applies to the processing of your Information that can directly or indirectly identify you, by Global-e, as a data controller, then the following terms apply in addition to, and shall take precedence over, the Policy.
For the purposes of this Policy, Information shall have the meaning ascribed to "personal data" by the GDPR – i.e. any information relating to an identified or identifiable natural person.
Legal Basis, Data Transfers to Store Owners
The processing of your Information by Global-e is mainly based on the fact that it is necessary for providing the Services and more broadly for the performance of your contract. Additionally, we may ground our processing on your consent, on Global-e's legitimate business interest or on legal obligations we are subject to, each as described under the Policy.
Information will be shared with Store Owners as detailed above to the extent necessary for the processing of your order (i.e. performance of your contract) and also for the purposes of the Store Owners’ legitimate interests in promoting the sale of their products. Information transmitted will be further controlled by the Store Owners, so please refer to their privacy policies. Where your consent should be required for a particular form of processing or use, it will be specifically requested.
DPO & EU/UK Representatives
If EU or UK data protection law applies or if you are located in the EEA, you may contact our DPO at
dpo@global-e.com
. Our EU GDPR representative according to Art. 27 GDPR is Rickert Rechtsanwaltsgesellschaft mbH, Colmantstraße 15, 53225 Bonn,
art-27-rep-global-e@rickert.law
. If UK data protection law applies to the processing of your Information, you may contact our UK representative, Globale UK Limited, 154 Clerkenwell Rd, London EC1R 5AB, UK, email
dataprotection@global-e.com
.
Rights under data protection laws
If you are a resident of the EEA or the UK, you are entitled to your rights as detailed under this Policy.
If you are based on the EEA you have a right to lodge a complaint with a data protection supervisory authority of your habitual residence, place of work or of an alleged infringement of the GDPR. If UK data processing laws apply to our processing of your Information, you have a right to lodge a complaint with the UK Information Commissioner’s Office. A summary and further details about your rights under EU data protection laws, is available on the EU Commission’s website at:
https://ec.europa.eu/info/law/law-topic/data-protection/reform/rights-citizens_en
.
You also have the right to receive a copy of your Information in a structured, commonly used, and machine-readable format. Additionally, you have the right to request that we transmit this Information directly to another controller, where technically feasible. This right applies to Information you have provided to us, and it is processed based on your consent or for the performance of a contract with you.
Note that when you send us a request to exercise your rights, we will need to reasonably authenticate your identity and location. We will ask you to provide us credentials to make sure that you are who you claim to be and will ask you further questions to understand the nature and scope of your request.
Data Storage
We are committed to ensuring that your Information is retained only for as long as necessary to fulfill the purposes for which it was collected, as outlined in this Policy, and in compliance with the GDPR’s storage limitation principle.
We may retain your Information for a longer period when it is necessary for compliance with a legal obligation to which we are subject, including, but not limited to, tax, accounting, or other statutory obligations.
In certain cases, we may retain your Information beyond the retention period if it is necessary for our legitimate interests, such as enforcing our terms and conditions, defending against legal claims, fraud prevention, or safeguarding the security and integrity of our systems, provided that such interests do not override your fundamental rights and freedoms.
Once the retention period has expired, or upon your request where applicable, we will securely delete, destroy, or anonymize your Information to ensure it cannot be reconstructed or read.
Data Transfers outside the EU or the UK
As we are an international company, we may securely share your Information with other Global-e entities and our approved partners located all over the world where necessary for the fulfilment of your purchases and performance of our services, as detailed in this Policy.
As detailed under “
transferring Personal Information outside your territory”
, Global-e data servers are based in the EU, and Borderfree data servers are based in the US.
The transfer of your Information outside the EEA and UK is protected by the Standard Contractual Clauses in accordance with the European Commission’s contracts model for the transfer of Information to third jurisdictions, unless the data transfer is to a jurisdiction that has been determined by the European Commission (for transfers from the EEA) or the UK Information Commissioner’s Office (for transfers from the UK) to provide an adequate level of protection for individuals’ rights and freedoms for their Information. When we transfer your Information, we will make sure that our data hosting service providers, or any other third party recipient, provide adequate confidentiality and security commitments required by law. In order to obtain a copy of the Standard Contractual Clauses applicable to transfers outside the EEA and UK, please contact our Representative at the address listed above.
At this time, the U.S. is not recognized by the European Commission or the UK Information Commissioner’s Office as a jurisdiction which offers an adequate level of data protection. Your Information, which is transferred to the U.S., can be processed by U.S. law enforcement agencies, or any other entities under the applicable U.S. law. If you are an EU citizen or resident, or if UK data protection laws apply to you, please note that U.S. laws place limitations on remedies in respect of the processing of your Information by the U.S. authorities, including limitations on the right or ability to bring a legal action to a court of law, or to appear in a court.
Additional Information for Australian Residents
For the purposes of this Policy, “Information” means any information or an opinion about an identified individual, or an individual who is reasonably identifiable, whether the information or opinion is true, or opinion is recorded in a material form. We are committed to keeping your Information secure and will use all reasonable precautions to protect it from loss, misuse or unauthorized access or alteration. However, except to the extent liability cannot be excluded due to the operation of statute including the Privacy Act 1988 (Cth), we exclude all liability (including in negligence) for the consequences of any unauthorized access to, disclosure of, misuse of or loss or corruption of your Information.
Transferring Personal Information Outside your Territory
As we are an international company, we may securely share your Information with our Affiliates and our approved partners located all over the world where necessary for the fulfilment of your purchases and performance of our services, as detailed in this Policy.
By consenting to overseas disclosure, you acknowledge that we do not guarantee that the overseas recipient will comply with the Australian Privacy Principles and they may not be subject to privacy obligations similar to those in your jurisdiction, as detailed under “
transferring Personal Information outside your territory”
. We will not be liable to you for breaches of the Australian Privacy Principles committed by the overseas recipient.
When we transfer your Information, we will make sure that our data hosting service providers, or any other third party recipient, provide adequate confidentiality and security commitments. We take reasonable steps to ensure that third party recipients of your Information that are located outside Australia do not breach the Australian Privacy Principles and comply with privacy laws that are similar to those of your jurisdiction, you acknowledge and agree that we cannot control the actions of third party recipients and so cannot guarantee that they will comply with those privacy laws.
Nothing in this Policy restricts, excludes or modifies or purports to restrict, exclude or modify any statutory consumer rights or other rights under any applicable law including the Competition and Consumer Act 2010 (Cth) or the Privacy Act 1988 (Cth). If you are unhappy with this Policy or you have a complaint about compliance with the Australian Privacy Principles, please contact us at:
dataprotection@global-e.com
. We will respond to your complaint and make good-faith efforts to resolve your complaint within a reasonable time (and in any event within 30 days). If you are not happy with how we have dealt with your complaint, you may submit a complaint to the Office of the Australian Information Commissioner via the website at:
https://www.oaic.gov.au/privacy/privacy-complaints/
.
Additional Information for Canadian Residents
If you are a resident of Canada, or if our processing of your Information is governed by Canadian privacy legislation (including, without limitation, the
Act respecting the protection of personal information in the private sector
(Québec),
the Personal ‎Information Protection Act
(Alberta), the
Personal Information Protection Act
(British ‎Columbia) ‎or the
Personal Information Protection and Electronic Documents Act
(Canada)), the following additional terms apply. Your rights may differ depending on your province or territory of ‎residence within ‎Canada: please consult the section below relevant to your ‎place of residence.‎ ‎
Consent
Unless otherwise allowed by the laws applicable in your province or territory of ‎residence, we will only ‎‎collect, use, communicate, or otherwise process your Information ‎with your consent.‎ You are generally not obliged ‎to provide your Information, however please note that we may be unable to provide certain services to you if you refuse to ‎do so.‎
Cross-border Data Transfers
As we are an international company, we may securely share your Information with our Affiliates and our ‎‎approved partners located all over the world where necessary for the fulfilment of your purchases and ‎‎performance of our services, as detailed in this Policy. ‎
We may communicate, store and process your Information outside ‎of your province or ‎territory of residence, in any country where we have facilities ‎or in which we engage service providers. This includes, as detailed under the section “Transferring Personal Information outside your territory” of the Policy, the EU, where our Global-e data servers are ‎‎based, and the US, where our Borderfree data servers are based.
These other jurisdictions may have data protection rules that ‎are different from those of your ‎place of residence. Your Information, which is ‎transferred to the U.S., can be processed by U.S. law enforcement agencies, ‎or any other entities under ‎the applicable U.S. law. ‎
Whenever we ‎transfer your Information outside of your jurisdiction of residence, we will only do so in full ‎compliance with all the requirements of applicable privacy ‎laws, and we will ‎ensure that adequate safeguards are in place so that your Information ‎will ‎receive an adequate degree of protection in the jurisdiction of destination.‎ ‎
Privacy rights
As a resident of Canada, you have the following rights regarding Information that we hold, subject to ‎any conditions or limitations set out in applicable law:‎
You have the right to obtain information about our processing of your Information ‎and obtain access to and a copy of your Information that we hold.‎
You may have the right to update, complete, or correct inaccuracies in your Information.‎
You have the right to withdraw your consent to our processing of your ‎Information, without affecting the lawfulness of processing up until withdrawal. Please ‎note that we may be unable to offer you ‎certain services or process certain orders for you if you withdraw your consent. ‎‎Withdrawing your consent does not create an ‎obligation for us to delete Information ‎which we ‎are otherwise allowed or required to ‎retain under applicable law.‎
If you are a resident of the province of Québec, the following rights are available ‎to you, in addition to the ‎rights identified above:‎
You may have the right to obtain a copy of your Information that we hold in a structured, commonly-used technological format, and that we transmit it to another third party you designate, where technically feasible.‎
You have the right to request, in certain ‎circumstances, that we cease disseminating ‎your Information or to ‎de-‎‎index any hyperlink that allows access to that Information by ‎technological means, if ‎‎such dissemination contravenes applicable law or a ‎court order.‎
Please note that some of these rights may be limited, for example, if fulfilling your request would reveal ‎‎personal information about another person, or if you ask us to delete Information ‎which we are required ‎by law to retain‎.
To exercise the rights described above, please submit your request to us by sending an email to:
dataprotection@global-e.com
.
Complaints to Supervisory Authorities
You have the right to lodge a complaint with the relevant data ‎protection authority of your habitual residence, your place of work or the place of the alleged ‎infringement/violation of your rights. You may raise a concern or file a complaint with the Federal Office ‎of the ‎Privacy Commissioner at ‎https://www.priv.gc.ca/en.‎ If you are a resident of the province of British ‎Columbia, you should contact the ‎the Office of the Information & Privacy Commissioner for British ‎Columbia at ‎https://www.oipc.bc.ca/. ‎If you are a resident of the province of Alberta, you should contact ‎the Office of ‎the Information and Privacy Commissioner of Alberta at https://oipc.ab.ca/. ‎If you are a ‎resident of the province of Québec, you should contact the Quebec ‎Commission d’accès à l’information at ‎https://www.cai.gouv.qc.ca/.
Additional Information for Residents of China Mainland
Children’s Privacy
The Service is not structured to attract or be directed to anyone under the age of 18 years without parental consent. Accordingly, we do not intend to collect Information from anyone we know to be under that minimum age.
If we learn that we have collected Information from a person who is younger than 18 years without parental consent, we will delete that information quickly. If you believe that we have any such information, please contact us at:
dataprotection@global-e.com
.
Processing Personal Information outside your Territory
We provide our Services and process your personal information outside mainland China. By using our Services, you will be providing your personal Information to Global-e and our affiliates located outside mainland China and your personal information will be processed in Ireland and/or other jurisdictions where our servers and databases are located. Your Information will be securely shared with our Affiliates and our approved partners located all over the world where necessary for the fulfilment of your purchases and performance of our services, as detailed in this Policy.
By agreeing to this Policy, you consent to your Information and sensitive personal Information being collected, used, and disclosed in accordance with this Policy.
Your Information will be secured by substantially appropriate safeguards as set forth in China Data Protection Law. To the extent required under the China Data Protection Law, we will obtain separate consent from you before the transfer of your Information to a third party.
Your rights and choice under China Data Protection Law
In accordance with the terms of the applicable China Data Protection Law, Individuals must be notified at the point of collection of the purposes for which the Information was collected and thereafter the Information can only be used for those purposes unless consent is obtained for a new purpose.
In accordance with the terms of the applicable China Data Protection Law, you may have the following rights to your Information, including the rights detailed under this Policy to request access to, and transfer, correction or deletion of, your Information, and withdrawal of your consent to, or restriction or objection to the processing of your Information, and cancellation of your account. You also have the right to request us to explain our Information processing rules. To the extent permitted by applicable China Data Protection Law, a fee may be chargeable by us for complying with a data access request. In certain instances, applicable China Data Protection Law may allow us legitimately and properly to refuse some of these requests; for instance, to comply with applicable legal obligations or to protect the legitimate rights of third parties.
For the purposes of this Policy, China Data Protection Law shall mean the Cybersecurity Law of the People's Republic of China (“PRC”), the PRC Data Security Law, the PRC Personal Information Protection Law, and all related, then current data protection provisions under the PRC Civil Code, other data protection related laws, regulations, administrative rules, administrative measures and national guidelines effective in China Mainland (together as “China Data Protection Law”).
Additional Information for Residents of Hong Kong
The Service is not structured to attract or be directed to anyone under the age of 18 years. Accordingly, we do not intend to collect Information from anyone we know to be under that minimum age.
If we learn that we have collected Information from a person who is younger than 18 years or under 14 years without parental consent, we will delete that information quickly. If you believe that we have any such information, please contact us at:
dataprotection@global-e.com
.
Transferring Personal Information outside your Territory
As we are an international company, we may securely share your Information with our Affiliates and our approved partners located all over the world where necessary for the fulfilment of your purchases and performance of our services, as detailed in this Policy.
In accordance with Section 33 to the Ordinance, by using our Services you agree to your Information, being exported outside your territory, including your name, email address, physical address, telephone number, ID number or credit card/payment details. You consent to the Information being processed in the Economic Area of the European Union, and transferred between Global-e entities, as detailed under “
transferring Personal Information outside your territory”
, including to the European Union and the United States, in order to provide you with the Services, or to other third-party such as shipping providers, the Store Owner of the merchandise you purchased from and payment services providers, who may be located outside your territory as well.
We will transfer your data only where the transfer is necessary for the performance of the contract between you and us. You are entitled to make a subject access request to receive a copy of the data we process about you, a data correction request as well as a right to reject to the use of your Information for direct marketing purposes by contacting our Data Protection Officer at
dpo@global-e.com
.
Your rights and choice under the Personal Data (Privacy) Ordinance
Under the Personal Data (Privacy) Ordinance, individuals must be notified at the point of collection of the purposes for which the data was collected and thereafter the data can only be used for those purposes unless consent is obtained for a new purpose. If you are not happy with this Policy, you may submit a complaint to the Office of the Privacy Commissioner for Personal Data. As a Hong Kong data subject you have legal rights in relation to the Information we hold about you (to the extent permitted under applicable laws and regulations).
‍
Additional Information for Residents of
Japan
Transferring Personal Information outside your Territory
As we are an international company, we may securely share your Information with our Affiliates and our approved partners located all over the world where necessary for the fulfilment of your purchases and performance of our services, as detailed in this Policy.
By using the Services your provide your consent to your Information and sensitive personal Information being collected, used, disclosed and transferred cross-border in accordance with this Policy and transferred between Global-e entities, as detailed under “
transferring Personal Information outside your territory
, to any jurisdiction where we have databases or affiliates and, in particular, to the EU and the US.
You may request us to notify you about the purposes of use of, to disclose, to make any correction to, to discontinue the use or provision of, and/or to delete any and all of your Information which is stored by us, to the extent provided by the Act on the Protection of Personal Information of Japan. When you wish to make such requests, please contact us at
dataprotection@global-e.com
.
Additional Information for Residents of Singapore
By using the Services, you signify that you have read and understood this Policy. To the extent required under applicable law, you also provide your consent to us collecting, using and disclosing your personal information in accordance with this Policy.
Transferring Personal Information outside your Territory
We will transfer Information (including your name, email address, physical address and telephone number) to shipping service providers, Store Owners of merchandise you purchase from us, payment services providers, customs/clearance brokers and logistics providers who fulfil your orders. Information will be transferred only where necessary for the fulfilment of your purchases.
Your rights and choice under the Personal Data Protection Act 2012
Under the Personal Data Protection Act 2012, individuals must be notified at the point of collection of the purposes for which the data was collected and thereafter the data can only be used for those purposes unless consent is obtained for a new purpose.
As a Singaporean data subject you have legal rights in relation to the Information we hold about you (to the extent permitted under applicable laws and regulations).
You are entitled to make a subject access request to receive a copy of the data we process about you, a data correction request as well as a right to reject to the use of your Information for direct marketing purposes. We will not charge any fee for complying with a data access request.
Additional Information for Residents of South Korea
Transfer of Personal Information outside your Territory
Transfer of Personal Information outside your Territory
By using the Services your provide your consent to your Information and sensitive personal Information being collected, used, disclosed and transferred cross-border in accordance with this Policy to any jurisdiction where we have databases or affiliates and, in particular, to US, Ireland and Germany.
Protecting Personal Information
We take the following steps to ensure the safety of personal information:
Administrative Measures: Establishment and implementation of internal management plans, regular employee training, etc.
Technical Measures: Management of access rights to personal information processing system, installation of access control system, encryption of unique identification information, installation of security programs.
Physical Measures: Control access to computer rooms, data storage rooms, etc.
We retain personal information for specified retention periods pursuant to certain tax and export controls laws to which we are subject. We store, in an isolated and highly secured fashion, personal information recorded and stored in the form of electronic files so that the records cannot be accessed or reproduced without strict procedures and subject to meeting certain criteria of necessity. After the end of the relevant retention period, personal information recorded and stored in electronic files will be securely destroyed using technical measures to prevent the possibility of recovery and paper records will be either shredded or burned.
The laws of Korea, including the Act on the Consumer Protection in Electronic Commerce, Etc. (E-Commerce Consumer Protection Act), the Framework Act on Electronic Documents and Transactions, and the Protection of Communications Secrets Act, require retention of certain types of information for a certain period of time, as follows:
E-Commerce Consumer Protection Act
Records of contracts or cancellation of orders shall be retained for a period of five (5) years.
Records of payments and provision of goods shall be retained for a period of five (5) years.
Records of consumer complaints or dispute resolution shall be retained for a period of three (3) years.
Framework Act on Electronic Documents and Transactions
Records of electronic document distribution via certified electronic address shall be retained for a period of ten (10) years.
Protection of Communications Secrets Act
Sign-in records shall be retained for a period of three (3) months.
Personal Information Protection Officer
We have designated the person in charge of personal information protection as follows in order to take full responsibility for the handling of personal information, and to handle complaints from and remedy damages suffered by our users related to our processing of personal information:
Name: Oded Griffel
Position: DPO
Contact Information: dpo@global-e.com
Specific Provisions for certain U.S Residents
This section applies solely to individuals who reside in U.S. states with consumer data protection laws. California, Colorado, Connecticut, Delaware, Florida, Indiana, Iowa, Montana, Oregon, Tennessee, Texas, Utah, Virginia and any other U.S. states provide (now or in the future) their state residents with rights related to their information. We adopted this section to comply with these laws, including the California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018 (‘
CCPA’
), and the California Privacy Rights Act of 2020 (‘
CPRA
’) and any terms defined in the abovementioned consumer data protection laws have the same meaning when used in this section.
Categories of Personal Information we collect
We have collected the following categories of Information from consumers within the last twelve (12) months:
Identifiers and Information categories listed in the California Customer Records statute (Cal. Civ. Code § 1798.80(e)). These include names, telephone number, postal address, online identifier Internet Protocol address.
Commercial information such as products or services purchased, obtained, or considered, or other purchasing or consuming histories or tendencies.
Internet or other electronic network activity information, including, but not limited to, browsing history, search history, and information regarding a consumer’s interaction with the Service.
Geolocation data, such as your physical location
Card details for processing the transaction of the merchandise
Inferences drawn from any of the information identified to create a profile about a consumer reflecting the consumer’s preferences, characteristics, psychological trends, preferences, predispositions, behavior, attitudes, intelligence, abilities and aptitudes.
How we collect the Information
We obtain the categories of Information listed above from the following categories of sources:
Directly and indirectly from you and your activity on our Service.
Third parties such as our retailers.
How we use the Information we collect
We use the Information we collect for one of the following business purposes:
To fulfill the reason for which the Information is provided.
To provide you with our products and services and to further develop and improve our products and services.
To enforce our terms and as necessary to protect our rights.
To respond to law enforcement requests and as required by applicable law, court order, or governmental regulations.
We do not sell your Information for monetary or other valuable consideration.
In the preceding twelve (12) months, we have not sold Information.
We disclose Information to third parties for business purposes as described in this Policy under “
Sharing your personal Information
”.
In the preceding twelve (12) months, we have disclosed the following categories of Information for business purposes:
Identifiers, which We have shared with the following categories of third parties: service providers involved in the performance of the fulfilment of the sales contract you entered into, including the retailer;
Commercial information, which We have shared with the following categories of third parties: the retailer of the merchandise you have purchased from us, the shipper that delivered your purchase to, the bank or payment service provider that acquired the transaction for purchasing the merchandise.
How we retain the Information
Your Information will be retained by us as necessary to and relevant to our legitimate operations, including time necessary to identify, issue or resolve legal proceedings, enforce our terms of sale, to meet our reporting requirements and as otherwise required in accordance with applicable law obligations.
Your Rights
You may be entitled to the following specific rights under state consumer data protection laws regarding your Information:
Access to Specific Information and Data Portability Rights. You have the right to request that we will disclose certain information to you about our collection and use of your Information over the past 12 months. Upon confirmation of your request, We will disclose to you:
The categories of Information We collected about you;
The categories of sources for the Information We collected about you;
Our business or commercial purpose for collecting that Information;
The categories of third parties with whom we share that Information;
The categories of Information that we disclosed for a business purpose, and the categories of third parties to whom we disclosed that particular category of Information;
The specific pieces of Information We collected about you;
If We disclosed your Information for a business purpose, we will provide you with a list which will identify the Information categories that each category of recipient obtained.
Deletion Rights. You have the right to request that we delete any of your Information. Upon confirmation of your request, we will delete (and direct our service providers to delete) your Information from our records, unless an exception applies.
Nondiscrimination Right. You have the right not to be discriminated against for exercising any of the aforementioned rights.
The Right to Correction (Excluding Iowa and Utah). if you find that the data is not accurate, complete or updated, then you may provide us with the necessary information to rectify it and request the correction, amendment or deletion of your Information if it is inaccurate or if you believe that the processing of your Information is in violation of the applicable law.
The Right to Opt Out. You have the right to opt out of personal information processing for purposes of targeted advertising (excluding Iowa), data les, or profiling in furtherance of decisions that produce legal or similarly significant effects (Excluding Iowa and Utah).
The Right to Control Sensitive Information Disclosures. You have the right to limit the use and disclosure of sensitive information (California) or to consent to the collection of sensitive information.
Exercising Your Rights. To exercise your access and deletion rights, please submit your request in our
privacy center
. To exercise any of the other rights described above, please submit your request to us by sending an email to:
dataprotection@global-e.com
. Only you or a person authorized to act on your behalf, may make a request related to your Information. You may also make a verifiable consumer request on behalf of your minor child. If you submit your request through an authorized agent, we may request that the agent provide proof of your prior authorization, as well as information necessary to verify your identity.
A request for access can be made by you only twice within a 12-month period.
We may ask you to provide additional information in order to verify your identity before we respond to your request. We cannot respond to your request or provide you with the requested Information if we cannot verify your identity or authority to make the request and confirm the Information relates to you. We will only use the Information provided in your request to verify your identity or authority to make the request.
We will do our best to respond to your request within 45 days of its receipt. If we require more time (up to additional 45 days), we will inform you of the reason and extension period in writing. If you do not have an account with us, we will deliver our written response by mail or electronically, at your option.
Any disclosures we provide will only cover the 12-month period preceding receipt of your request.
The response we provide will also explain the reasons we cannot comply with a request, if applicable. If we cannot comply with a request, you have the right to appeal this decision (excluding California). To make an appeal, follow the instructions provided in our communications with you.
For data portability requests, we will select a format to provide your Information that is readily useable and should allow you to transmit the information from one entity to another entity without hindrance, specifically by electronic mail communication.
We do not charge a fee to process or respond to your request unless it is excessive, repetitive, or manifestly unfounded. If we determine that the request warrants a fee, we will inform you of the reasons for such decision and provide you with a cost estimate before completing your request.
Additional U.S. Rights
Nevada provides its residents with a limited right to opt-out of certain personal information sales. Residents who wish to exercise this sale opt-out rights may submit a request to opt out. However, please know we do not currently sell data triggering that statute's opt-out requirements.
California's "Shine the Light" law (Civil Code Section § 1798.83) permits California residents to request certain information regarding our disclosure of personal information to third parties for their direct marketing purposes. To make such a request, please send an email to dataprotection@global-e.com.
Additional Information for Residents of Brazil
Children’s Privacy
The Service is not structured to attract or be directed to anyone under the age of 18 years. Accordingly, we do not intend to collect Information from anyone we know to be under that minimum age.
If we learn that we have collected Information from a person who is younger than 18 years or under 14 years without parental consent, we will delete that information quickly. If you believe that we have any such information, please contact us at:
dataprotection@global-e.com
.
Transferring Personal Information outside your territory
If the transfer of your Information is governed by the LGPD, and your data is transferred to another jurisdiction outside Brazil, your data will be secured by appropriate safeguards as set forth in LGPD Arts. 33, 34 and 35, in particular, but without limitation to, by the use of the Standard Contractual Clauses for the transfer of data between Brazil and other jurisdictions.
If you are a Brazilian resident, you may be entitled to the following specific rights under the LGPD regarding your Information:
The right to anonymize, block or erase data that is unnecessary, excessive or processed in violation of the LGPD;
The right to erase data that was processed based on consent, unless an exception applies;
The right to confirm and access the Information we collect about you;
The right to port data to another service provider;
The right to receive information about the public and private entities with whom the controller has shared data;
The right to receive information about the possibility of not providing consent (when it is required);
The right to withdraw consent, when applicable;
The right to lodge a complaint with the Brazilian Data Protection Authority; and
The right to object to a processing activity when the processing activity violates the LGPD
Exercising Your Rights
To exercise the rights described above, please submit your request to us by sending an email to:
dataprotection@global-e.com
.
Only you or a person authorized to act on your behalf, may make a request related to your Information. You may also make a verifiable consumer request on behalf of your minor child.
We cannot respond to your request or provide you with the requested Information if we cannot verify your identity or authority to make the request and confirm the Information relates to you. We will only use the Information provided in your request to verify your identity or authority to make the request.
We will respond to your request for access within 15 days of its receipt. If you do not have an account with us, we will deliver our written response by mail or electronically, at your option.
For data portability requests, we will select a format to provide your Information that is readily useable and should allow you to transmit the information from one entity to another entity without hindrance, specifically by electronic mail communication.
Global-e cookies policy
Last updated: January 2023
Global-e (“
Global-e
”,“
we
”, “
our
” or “
us
”) wants to ensure that your use of our fulfillment services, as further detailed below (“
Services
”) is smooth and reliable, to you as possible. To help us do this, we use cookies and similar technologies, such as tags/beacons and JavaScripts (“cookies”), to make our Service relevant to your interests and needs.
References to Global-e (or “
we
”, “
our
” or “us”) will refer to the Global-e group including the entities, subsidiaries and affiliated companies listed <<here>>, and will also include the site operating as “Borderfree.com" and the services offered thereunder (which if offered, will form part of the Service).
‍
What are cookies?
Cookies ares mall text files, or similar technologies, as for example, HTML5 local storage, Local Shared Objects and fingerprinting techniques, that store information or provide access to information already stored on your device, including your computer, smart phone or tablet. For the purpose of this Policy, “cookies” include any technology that Global-e use for storing information about your browsing on the website, or for accessing information already stored.
Cookies contain basic information to recognize your computer or mobile device. This is essential for providing the required services, and it allows to improve your browsing and shopping experience in certain cases. After certain amount of time, the Cookies expire. Typically, Cookies are either removed from your computer once you close your browser session (“
Session Cookies
”) or they expire after specific amount of time (“
Persistent Cookies
”)
What type of cookies Global-e is using?
We use both Session Cookies and Persistent Cookies for keep track of your preferences and improve our service to you. Some cookies are strictly essential for the operation of our Service while other cookies help us improve the level of services provided to you.
Global-e use First-Party and Third-Party Cookies:
First-party cookies
are set directly by the website that the user is visiting. For the purpose of this policy, these are cookies that are set directly by our Service.
Third-party cookies
are set by a domain other than the one visited by the user. For the purpose of this policy, these are cookies that are set on the Global-e checkout page for providing and supporting our Services, as those required to secure your checkout.
We have created a detailed list, which is attached
below
. It is available here. The table will provide you with a clear and comprehensive image of the tracking technologies that we use.
When a cookie contains personal information, for processing your order of products, then our
Privacy Policy
applies as well.
What happens when I disable Cookies?
Cookies will not be stored on your device without your consent. You can delete previously set cookies manually or configure the browser settings to disable or delete cookies, as further explained below.
When switching-off cookies, depending on the cookies disabled, your browsing experience may change. The website and our Services may not operate properly, depending on the category of the cookie disabled (Essential/functional or not) as described below.
If you choose to delete Global-e cookies, your access to some functionality and areas of our Service may be degraded or restricted.
The categories of the cookies we use?
Essential cookies
Essential cookies are necessary and essential for the basic operations  of our Service, as for example, your ability to complete your purchase with  your chosen items. Without these cookies, you may not be able to use our  Service and to complete your purchase from the webstore.
Functional Cookies
Functional cookies allow us to provide smooth and easy experience.  For example, saving you the trouble of  having to change the language display every time you enter our Service by  saving your preferred currency.
Without these cookies, our Service would not work properly, and you  would skip important features of it.
Analytics cookies
Analytic cookies are used to help us understand how visitors reached our  Service, how they experience it, and for how long.
Analytic cookies provide us with anonymous information that enable to carry  statistical analysis of the service. They help us understand which parts of  our Service interest visitors and if they experience any errors. We use these  cookies to test different designs and features for our sites. In the table we provided below, you will find more information on how we use these cookies.
We also use Google Analytics.  We have set our Google Analytics to protect your privacy to the maximum extent. We have concluded a data processing agreement with Google to protect your data. We have also made sure that the last octet of your IP-address is invisible and have turned off the setting which allows sharing data with Google.
Please review Google Privacy Policy available
here.
If you wish to optout from Google Analytic, please follow this
link
Advertising, marketing and social media cookies
We only place advertising, marketing and social media cookies if you have given us your permission to do this by using our services and accepting the cookies of the Store Owner.
Advertisement and marketing cookies collect information about your  browsing habits for displaying content and advertising relevant to your  interests. These cookies are also used to help us measure the effectiveness of advertising campaigns by tracking number of clicks.
Most of the cookies under this category are placed by third party  advertising networks as social media platforms. They remember the websites  you visit and use this information to give you access to interesting content  on our Service, and to show you more personalized adverts when you visit other websites. These cookies also help improve your browsing experience, for example by helping to prevent the same advertisement from continuously  reappearing to you.
Advertisement cookies are not control or stored on Global-e domain.  Social media platforms such as Facebook, can use cookies to carry out their  own analysis and statistics, depending on your user account settings. If you  would like to know more how these social media platforms use data, please  refer to the privacy notices of these platforms.
Obtaining your consent for using tracking technologies
We need your consent to use all cookies which are not essential or functional. If you do not agree to accept our cookies or other tracking technologies, we will make commercially reasonable efforts to provide you with the same level of services and experience without using such cookies.
Withdrawing your consent
You can withdraw your consent to advertising, marketing and social media cookies by contacting: dataprotection@global-e.com.
Managing your cookie settings and deleting cookies
We only place cookies, including non-essential cookies if you have given your consent. If you have given us your consent but would like the cookies placed to be removed, you can do this from the settings of your browser:
For Microsoft Edge
: Choose Settings – then, under “Site Permissions” select “Cookies and site Data” for set specific controls.
For Google Chrome
: Choose Settings – then under “Privacy and Security” click on “Content settings” –Click “Cookies”.
For Safari”
: Choose “Preferences”- then under “Privacy” click on “Remove all Website Data”.
For Mozilla Firefox
: Choose “Tools” on the menu and click on “ Options”- then select “Privacy” and choose “Cookie”.
In addition, you can turn off certain third party advertising cookies by visiting the following links: Network Advertising Initiative, the Digital Advertising Alliance Consumer Choice and Your Online Choices pages.
Some web browsers offer a “Do Not Track” (“DNT”) signal. A DNT signal is an HTTP header field indicating your preference for tracking your activities on our services or through cross-site user tracking. Global-e Services do not respond to DNT signals.
Questions, comments or in need of help?
If you have any questions or if we can help you with something, we would be happy to assist. Contact us at: dataprotection@Global-e.com.
Changes to this Policy
We update this policy, where needed. Every time we change this policy, we either send you an email about it or post a notice on our Service. We will post a notice on our Service if our policy update includes substantial changes and obtain your consent once again, where required under applicable laws.
Cookies tables
The list below includes all the cookies that are used by Global-e for providing the Services.
For your convenience, the list is divided according to the Cookies Categories and hosting party (First or Third Party). Please note that this is an extended list, and not all cookies are used for all websites and services. For identifying the specific cookies relevant to you, please visit your browser setting page.
First Party Essential and Functional Cookies
These cookies are strictly essential as they provide us with access to information that is the basic of our Service. The cookies also enable your movement around our Service. This category of cookies cannot be disabled.
Name
Category
Purpose
Session Time
GlobalE_Data
Essential
This cookie holds the browsing information of the user
72 hours
GE_ESSENTIALS_ONLY
Essential
This cookiee disable allow user to disable non-essential cookies
1 year
GlobalE_Gem_Data
Essential
This cookie stores the store identification and the user cart identifications for processing the order with the items
10 days
GlobalE_Full_Redirect
Essential
This cookie allows fluent browsing flow including to skip the sign-in page before checkout
End of browsing Session
GlobalECartID
Essential
This cookie is required for capturing the user cart (specific order) by unique identifier and validate it with the webstore.
Session expires when the webstore cart expiree
GlobalE_Welcome_Data
Essential
This cookie display the Welcome Popup. The Welcome Popup enable the user to change currency and shipping destination
72 hours
GlobalE_ShowStoreBanner
Functional
This cookie controls the fluent display of the price conversion according to the user chosen currency
1 year by defaultt.  Can be configurable
IsOperated GE_ISOPERATED
Functional
This cookie determines whether the shipping destination is operated by Global-e as the Merchant of Record
End of browsing Session
GE_Show_Switcher cookie
Functional
This cookie is set by the Magento extension. It is required for fluent browsing in non-blocking mode
3 days
GlobalE_Locale
Functional
This cookie allows fluent browsing flow by correcting the local information received from the webstore to the one identified by Global-e.
End of browsing Session
GlobalE_SupportThirdPartcookies
Essential
This cookie supports Third-Party cookies.
End of browsing Session
GlobalE_CT_Data
Functional
This cookie holds a unique client identifier for a customer (per browser), which helps Global-e to provide information about the client behaviour on a Global-e enabled website.
2 years
GE_Replacement
Functional
This cookie keeps information on the users’ country and currency
30 min
First Party Analytic Cookies
Name
Category
Purpose
Session Time
GlobalE_AB_Data
Analytic
This cookie, if configurated, enable different types of testing in the checkout
10 years
GlobalE_Ref
Analytic
This cookie keeps information on the referrer of the user
30 min
GlobalE_sess_ID
Analytic
This cookie tracks the session ID
2 years
Third Party Essential Cookies
Name
Category
Purpose
Session Time
_cflb
Essential
This cookies is Third Party cookie by Cloudflare. It is required for secured browsing flow while detecting  malicious visitors, including bots and the use of CAPTCHA
The session can run up to 24 hours
_cf_bm
Essential
This cookies is Third Party cookie by Cloudflare. It is required for secured browsing flow while detecting  malicious visitors, including bots and the use of CAPTCHA
Expires after 30 min
cb_ob_info
Essential
This cookies is Third Party cookie by Cloudflare required for “Always Online” feature.
Expires after 30 seconds
cf_use_ob
Essential
This cookies is Third Party cookie by Cloudflare required for “Always Online” feature.
Expires after 30 seconds
__cfruid
Essential
This cookies is Third Party cookie by Cloudflare required to support “Rate Limiting” for managing the website traffic
8 months
_cfuvid
Essential
This cookies is Third Party cookie by Cloudflare required to support “Rate Limiting Rules” for managing the website traffic when multiple unique visitors share the same IP
ForterToken
Essential
This cookies is Third Party cookie by Forter, It is required for fraud detection. This cookie identifies the browser between browsing session.
Expires after 5 years
Ftr_ncd
Essential
This cookies is Third Party cookie by Forter.  a flag used to make sure data is not sent more than once per predefined timeframe.
Expires after 5 years
portal.allyable.com
Functional
This cookie is Third Party cookie by Allyable. It enables accessibility of browsing. The cookie saves the users widget's choices. By default, it's not used. The user needs to actively select this option via te widget, otherwise it's saved in the browser cache.
When browser cache expires
Third Party Non-Essential Cookies
Name
Category
Purpose
Session Time
_ga
Analytic
This is Third-Party cookie by Google Analytics used to identify the unique user
2 years
_gcl_au
Advertising
This is Third-Party cookie set by Google Ads. It used for measuring campaign performance.
3 months
_gid
Analytic
This is Third-Party cookie set by Google Analytics. It is used for tracking user behavior.
24 hours
_cid
Analytic
This is Third-Party cookie set by Google Analytics. It is used for saving the customer ID in the analytics
_fbp
Advertising
This is Third-Party cookie set by Facebook. It is used for marketing
_VWO
Analytic
This is Third-Party “cookie Jar” set by VMO. This cookie is a jar of all the cookies. It is currently created only for the Safari browser. In the future, it would replace all the cookies.
It expires in 2096 years.The actual expiry of a cookie doesn’t matter as it stores the expiry of cookies set in it and keeps on expiring them. It expires in 2096 years
_vwo_uuid_v2
Analytic
This is Third-Party cookie by set  VMO. This cookie calculates unique traffic on a website
366 days
_vwo_ssm
Analytic
This is Third-Party cookie set by VMO. This cookie is used for testing and is created only on sites that use the HTTP protocol. This is used to check if VWO can create cookies on them, post which this cookie is deleted
10 years
_hp2_id.APP_ID
Analytics
This is Third-Party User Cookie is set by Heap. It stores user_id, identity, other ids
13 months
_hp2_ses_props.APP_ID
Analytics
This is Third-Party Cookie is set by Heap. It is the session properties cookie, it stores timestamp and cookie domain/path
30 minutes
_hp2_props.APP_ID
Analytics
This is Third-Party Cookie is set by Heap. It is Event properties cookie, It stores properties set by addEventProperties API
13 months
_hp2_hld.
Analytics
This is Third-Party Cookie is set by Heap. It is used to determine which domain a cookie can be set on (since public suffix domains block setting cookies on the top level)
Should not persist
userty.core.p.app_id_hash
Analytics
This is Third-Party Cookie is set by Heap. It ccontains replay user properties (user id, user identity, and some user metadata)
2 years
userty.core.s.app_id_hash
Analytics
This is Third-Party Cookie is set by Heap. It contains replay session properties (replay session id, session timestamp and some session metadata)
Current session
fs_uid
Analytics
This is First-Party Cookie set by Full Story, and hosted on Global-e domain. It is used for tracking users across sessions and pages.
After 1 year
fs_cid
Analytics
This is Third-Party Cookie set by Full Story. It stores the consent state for this device
After 1 year
fs_session
Analytics
This is Third-Party Cookie set by Full Story. This is the session cookie for the FullStory Web Application (app.fullstory.com). It maintains an authenticated user's session.
30 days
fs_trusted_device
Analytics
This is Third-Party Cookie set by Full Story. Once verification succeeds, this cookie is set so that the user will not have to verify a device on every login attempt
60 days
fs_last_activity
Analytics
This is Third-Party Cookie set by Full Story. It records the timestamp of the last action the user took within the web application. It is used to assist with session timeouts.
When the session/browser closes
_fs_tab_id
Analytics
This is Third-Party Cookie set by Full Story. It support multi-tab playback, provides a unique ID to each tab.
When the tab is closed
raygun4js-sid
Functional
This is Third-Party Cookie set by Raygun. It Tracks performance and errors for a session id
When the tab is closed
raygun4js-userid
Functional
This is Third-Party Cookie set by Raygun. It Tracks performance and errors for an anonymous user id
When the tab is closed by user
Sub-policy 1
https://fcbayern.whistleblowing-software.com/privacy-system:

Sub-policy 2
https://www.facebook.com/privacy/policy/:
Facebook
Email or phone
Password
Forgot account?
Create new account
It looks like you were misusing this feature by going too fast. You’ve been temporarily blocked from using it.
Back
English (US)
Gaeilge
Polski
Lietuvių
Português (Brasil)
Русский
Română
Español
Français (France)
Deutsch
Italiano
Meta © 2025
Allow the use of cookies from Facebook on this browser?
We use cookies and similar technologies to help provide and improve content on
Meta Products
. We also use them to provide a safer experience by using information we receive from cookies on and off Facebook, and to provide and improve Meta Products for people who have an account.
Essential cookies: These cookies are required to use Meta Products and are necessary for our sites to work as intended.
Cookies from other companies: We use these cookies to show you ads off of Meta Products and to provide features like maps and videos on Meta Products. These cookies are optional.
You have control over the optional cookies we use. Learn more about cookies and how we use them, and review or change your choices at any time in our
Cookies Policy
.
About cookies
What are cookies?
Learn more
Why do we use cookies?
Learn more
What are Meta Products?
Learn more
Your cookie choices
Learn more
Cookies from other companies
We use cookies from
other companies
in order to show you ads off of our Products, and provide features like maps, payment services and video.
Choose cookies by category
How we use these cookies
If you allow these cookies
If you don't allow these cookies
Other ways you can control your information
Manage your ad experience in Accounts Center
More information about online advertising
Controlling cookies with browser settings
Allow all cookies
Decline optional cookies
Allow all cookies
Decline optional cookies
Sub-policy 3
https://x.com/en/privacy:
Skip to main content
Privacy Policy
Privacy Settings
Privacy Center
Help Center
Policy Archive
Download PDF
X Privacy Policy
Effective: November 15, 2024
Before you scroll, read this
It’s really hard to make everyone happy with a Privacy Policy. Most people who use X want something short and easy to understand. While we wish we could fit everything you need to know into a post, our regulators ask us to meet our legal obligations by describing them all in a lot of detail.
With that in mind, we’ve written our Privacy Policy as simply as possible to empower you to make informed decisions when you use X by making sure you understand and have control over the information we collect, how it’s used, and when it’s shared.
So if you skip reading every word of the Privacy Policy, at least know this:
X is a public platform
Learn what’s viewable & searchable
We collect some data
about you
Learn what we collect & how
Affiliate services may have their own policies
Learn about affiliates
We use your data to make X better
Learn how we make your info work
You can control your experience
Learn how to update your settings
If you have questions about how we use data, just ask
Learn how to contact us
Privacy Policy
1. Information We Collect
2. How We Use Information
3. Sharing Information
4. How Long We Keep Information
5. Take Control
6. Your Rights and Ours
7. X's Audience
8. Changes To This Privacy Policy
9. General
10. How To Contact X
Privacy Policy
1. Information We Collect
2. How We Use Information
3. Sharing Information
4. How Long We Keep Information
5. Take Control
6. Your Rights and Ours
7. X's Audience
8. Changes To This Privacy Policy
9. General
10. How To Contact X
1. Information We Collect
The information we collect when you use X falls into three categories.
1.1 Information you provide us.
To use some of our products and services you need to have an account, and to create an account, you need to provide us certain information. Likewise, if you use our paid products and services, we cannot provide them to you without getting payment information. Basically, certain information is necessary if you want to use many of our products and services.
Personal Accounts.
If you create an account, you must provide us with some information so that we can provide our services to you. This includes a display name (for example, “Creators”); a username (for example, @XCreators); a password; an email address or phone number; a date of birth; your display language; and third-party single sign-in information (if you choose this sign-in method). You can also choose to share your location in your profile and posts, and to upload your address book to X to help find people you may know. Your profile information, which includes your display name and username, is always public, but you can use either your real name or a pseudonym. And remember, you can create multiple X accounts, for example, to express different parts of your identity, professional or otherwise.
Professional Accounts.
If you create a
professional account
, you also need to provide us with a professional category, and may provide us with other information, including street address, contact email address, and contact phone number, all of which will always be public.
Payment Information.
In order to purchase ads or other offerings provided as part of our paid products and services you will need to provide us payment information, including your credit or debit card number, card expiration date, CVV code, and billing address.
Preferences.
When you set your preferences using your
settings
, we collect that information so that we can respect your preferences.
Biometric Information.
Based on your consent, we may collect and use your biometric information for safety, security, and identification purposes.
Job Applications / Recommendations.
We may collect and use your personal information (such as your biographical information, employment history, educational history, employment preferences, skills and abilities, and job search activity and engagement, in addition to the information we already collect as disclosed in the “Information we collect when you use X” section of our Privacy Policy below) to recommend potential jobs to you, to share with potential employers when you apply for a job, to enable connections for professional opportunities, and to show you more relevant advertising.
1.2 Information we collect when you use X.
When you use our services, we collect information about how you use our products and services. We use that information to provide you with products and services, to help keep X more secure and respectful for everyone, and more relevant to you.
Usage Information.
We collect information about your activity on X, including:
Posts and other content you post (including the date, application, and version of X) and information about your broadcast activity (e.g., Spaces), including broadcasts you’ve created and when you created them, your lists, bookmarks, and Communities you are a part of.
Your interactions with other users’ content, such as reposts, likes, bookmarks, shares, downloads, replies, if other users mention or tag you in content or if you mention or tag them, and broadcasts you’ve participated in (including your viewing history, listening, commenting, speaking, and reacting).
How you interact with others on the platform, such as people you follow and people who follow you, metadata related to
Encrypted Messages
, and when you use
Direct Messages
, including the contents of the messages, the recipients, and date and time of messages.
If you communicate with us, such as through email, we will collect information about the communication and its content.
We collect information on links you interact with across our services (including in our emails sent to you).
Purchase and payments.
To allow you to make a payment or send money using X features or services, including through an intermediary, we may receive information about your transaction such as when it was made, when a subscription is set to expire or auto-renew, and amounts paid or received.
Device Information.
We collect information from and about the devices you use to access X, including:
Information about your connection, such as your IP address, browser type, and related information.
Information about your device and its settings, such as device and advertising ID, operating system, carrier, language, memory, apps installed, and battery level.
Your device address book, if you’ve chosen to share it with us.
Location Information.
When you use X, we collect some information about your approximate location to provide the service you expect, including showing you relevant ads. You can also choose to share your current precise location or places where you’ve previously used X by enabling these settings in your account.
Inferred Identity.
We may collect or receive information that we use to infer your identity as detailed below:
When you sign into X on a browser or device, we will associate that browser or device with your account. Subject to your settings, we may also associate your account with browsers or devices other than those you use to sign into X (or associate your signed-out device or browser with other browsers or devices or X-generated identiﬁers).
When you provide other information to X, including an email address or phone number, we associate that information with your X account. Subject to your settings, we may also use this information in order to infer other information about your identity, for example by associating your account with hashes of email addresses that share common components with the email address you have provided to X.
When you access X and are not signed in, we may infer your identity based on the information we collect.
Log Information.
We may receive information when you view content on or otherwise interact with our products and services, even if you have not created an account or are signed out, such as:
IP address and related information; browser type and language; operating system; the referring webpage; access times; pages visited; location; your mobile carrier; device information (including device and application IDs); search terms and IDs (including those not submitted as queries); ads shown to you on X; X-generated identiﬁers; and identiﬁers associated with cookies. We also receive log information when you click on, view, or interact with links on our services, including when you install another application through X.
Advertisements.
When you view or interact with ads we serve on or oﬀ X, we may collect information about those views or interactions (e.g., watching a video ad or preroll, clicking on an ad, interacting with reposts of or replies to an ad).
Cookies and similar technologies.
Like many websites, we use cookies and similar technologies to collect additional website usage data and to operate our services. Cookies are not required for many parts of our products and services such as searching and looking at public proﬁles. You can learn more about how we use cookies and similar technologies
here
.
Interactions with our content on third-party sites.
When you view our content on third-party websites that integrate X content, such as embedded timelines or post buttons, we may receive log information that includes the web page you visited.
1.3 Information we receive from third parties.
When you use other online products and services, they may share information about that usage with us.
Ad Partners, Developers, Publishers.
Our ad and business partners share information with us such as browser cookie IDs, X-generated identifiers,
mobile device IDs, hashed user information like email addresses, demographic or interest data, and content viewed or actions taken on a website or app. Some of our ad partners, particularly our advertisers, also enable us to collect similar information directly from their website or app by integrating our advertising technology. Information shared by ad partners and affiliates or collected by X from the websites and apps of ad partners and affiliates may be combined with the other information you share with X and that X receives,
generates, or infers
about you described elsewhere in this Privacy Policy.
Other Third Parties, Account Connections, and Integrations.
We may receive information about you from third parties who are not our ad partners, such as other X users, developers, and partners who help us evaluate the safety and quality of content on our platform, our
corporate affiliates
, and other services you link to your X account. You may choose to connect your X account to your account on another service, and that other service may send us information about your account on that service.
2. How We Use Information
Breaking down how we use the information we collect is not simple because of the way the systems that bring our services to you work. For example, the same piece of information may be used differently for different purposes to ultimately deliver a single service. We think it’s most useful to describe the five main ways we use information and if you have questions that are not answered, you can always
contact us
. Here we go:
2.1 Operate, improve, and personalize our services.
We use the information we collect to provide and operate X products and services. We also use the information we collect to improve and personalize our products and services so that you have a better experience on X, including by showing you more relevant content and ads, suggesting people and topics to follow, enabling and helping you discover
affiliates
, third-party apps, and services. We may use the information we collect and publicly available information to help train our machine learning or artificial intelligence models for the purposes outlined in this policy.
We may use the information we collect from accounts of other services that you choose to connect to your X account to provide you features like cross-posting or cross-service authentication, and to operate our services.
We use your contact information to help others find your account if your settings permit, including through third-party services and client applications.
We use your information to provide our advertising and sponsored content services subject to your
settings
, which helps make ads on X more relevant to you. We also use this information to measure the effectiveness of ads and to help recognize your devices to serve you ads on and off of X. Some of our ad partners also enable us to collect similar information directly from their website or app by integrating our advertising technology. Information shared by ad partners and affiliates or collected by X from the websites and apps of ad partners and affiliates may be combined with the other information you share with X and that X receives, generates, or infers about you, as described elsewhere in our Privacy Policy.
2.2  Foster safety and security.
We use information we collect to provide for the safety and security of our users, our products, services, and your account. This includes verifying your identity, authenticating your account, and defending against fraud, unauthorized use, and illegal activity. We also use the information to evaluate and affect the safety and quality of content on X - this includes investigating and enforcing our policies and and terms, as well as applicable law.
2.3 Measure, analyze and make our services better.
We use the information we collect to measure and analyze the effectiveness of our products and services and to better understand how you use them in order to make them better.
2.4 Communicate with you about our services.
We use the information we collect to communicate with you about our products and services, including about product updates and changes to our policies and terms. If you’re open to hearing from us, we may also send you marketing messages from time to time.
2.5 Research.
We use information you share with us, or that we collect to conduct research, surveys, product testing, and troubleshooting to help us operate and improve our products and services.
3. Sharing Information
You should know the ways we share your information, why we share it, and how you can control it. There are five general ways we share your information.
3.1 When you post and share.
With the general public
. You are directing us to disclose that information as broadly as possible. X content, including your profile information (e.g., name/pseudonym, username, profile pictures), is available for viewing by the general public. The public does not need to be signed in to view some content on X. They may also find X content off of X: for example, from search query results on Internet search engines or videos downloaded and reshared elsewhere (depending on your
settings
).
With other X users.
Depending on your
settings
, and based on the X products and services you use, we share:
Your interactions with X content of other users, such as replies, and people you follow.
Content you send to a specific X user, such as through
Direct Messages
. Please keep in mind that if you’ve shared information like Direct Messages or protected posts with someone else who accesses X through a third-party service, the information may be shared with the third-party service.
With partners.
Depending on your
settings
, we also provide certain third parties with information to help us offer or operate our products and services. You can learn more about these partnerships in our
Help Center
. You can control whether X shares your personal information with these partners by using the “Data sharing with business partners” option in your
Privacy & Safety settings
. (This setting does not control sharing described elsewhere in this Privacy Policy, such as when we share information with our service providers, or through partnerships other than as described in this
Help Center
article.)
3.2 With third parties & third-party integrations.
With service providers.
We may share your information with our
service providers
that perform functions and provide services on our behalf, including payment services providers who facilitate payments; service providers that host our various blogs and wikis; service providers that help us understand the use of our services; applicant tracking system providers to send and receive applicant and job data to potential employers; and those that provide fraud detection services.
With advertisers.
Advertising revenue enables us to provide our products and services. Advertisers may learn information from your engagement with their ads on or off X. For example, if you click on an external link or ad on our services, that advertiser or website operator might figure out that you came from X, along with other information associated with the ad you clicked, such as characteristics of the audience it was intended to reach and other X-generated identifiers for that ad. They may also collect other personal information from you, such as cookie identifiers, or your IP address.
Third-party content & integrations.
We share or disclose your information with your consent or at your direction, such as when you
authorize a third-party web client or application
to access your account or when you direct us to share your feedback with a business. Similarly, to improve your experience, we work with third-party partners to display their video content on X or to allow cross-platform sharing. When you watch or otherwise interact with content from our video or cross-platform sharing partners, they may receive and process your personal information as described in their privacy policies. For video content, you can adjust your
autoplay settings
if you prefer that content not to play automatically.
Third-party collaborators.
Depending on your
settings
, or if you decide to share your data, we may share or disclose your information with third parties. If you do not opt out, in some instances the recipients of the information may use it for their own independent purposes in addition to those stated in X’s Privacy Policy, including, for example, to train their artificial intelligence models, whether generative or otherwise.
Through our APIs.
We use technology like
APIs
and embeds to make public X information available to websites, apps, and others for their use, for example, displaying posts on a news website or analyzing what people say on X. We generally make this content available in limited quantities for free and charge licensing fees for large-scale access. We have
standard terms
that govern how this information can be used, and a compliance program to enforce these terms. But these individuals and companies are not affiliated with X, and their offerings may not reflect updates you make on X. For more information about how we make public data on X available to the world, visit
https://developer.x.com
.
3.3 When required by law, to prevent harm, or in the public interest.
We may preserve, use, share, or disclose your information if we believe that it is reasonably necessary to:
comply with a law, regulation,
legal process, or governmental request
;
protect the safety of any person, protect the safety or integrity of our platform, including to help prevent spam, abuse, or malicious actors on our services;
explain why we have removed content or accounts from our services (e.g., for a violation of
our Rules
);
address fraud, security, or technical issues; or
protect our rights or property, or the rights or property of those who use our services.
We may also use different signals and your data to infer, preserve, use, share, or disclose your age and identity information in order to comply with regulatory requirements as well as for safety, security, fraud, know-your-customer, know-your-business, and identity verification, as the case may be. We may also share or disclose your age and identity information with our partners, service providers, and others for these purposes.
3.4 With our Affiliates.
We may share information amongst our
affiliates
to provide our products and services.
3.5 As a result of a change in ownership.
We may share, sell, or transfer information about you in connection with a merger, acquisition, reorganization, sale of assets, or bankruptcy. This Privacy Policy will apply to your personal information that is shared with (before and after the close of any transaction) or transferred to the new entity.
4. How Long We Keep Information
We keep different types of information for different periods of time, depending on how long we need to retain it in order to provide you with our products and services, to comply with our legal requirements and for safety and security reasons. For example:
We keep your profile information, such as your display name, user name, password and email address for the duration of your account. We cannot provide you with our products and services without retaining this information.
We keep your usage information, such as the content you post, your interactions with other users’ content and how you interact with others on the platform for the duration of your account or until such content is removed.
We keep your payment information, including your credit or debit card number and billing address for the duration you use our paid products and services. Records of transactions will be kept for longer, in accordance with applicable law.
If you communicate with us, such as through email, we will keep information about the communication and its content for up to 18 months, unless it is necessary for us to retain it for a longer period to comply with our legal obligations or to exercise or defend our legal rights.
We generally collect device information, location information, inferred identity information and log information using cookies. We keep cookies and information collected using cookies for up to 13 months. You can learn more about how we use cookies and similar technologies
here
.
We keep information about your views or interactions with ads on or off X, as well as how you interact with our content on third-party sites for up to 90 days.
We keep information shared by ad and business partners for up to 90 days.
Where you violate our Rules and your account is suspended, we may keep the identifiers you used to create the account (such as your email address or phone number) indefinitely to prevent repeat policy offenders from creating new accounts.
We may need to keep certain information longer than our policies specify in order to comply with legal requirements and for safety and security reasons. For example:
To comply with a law, regulation, legal process or governmental request.
Including in order to adhere to a legally appropriate preservation request made by law enforcement. You can read more about law enforcement access
here
.
In connection with legal claims, litigation and regulatory matters.
Including where it is reasonably necessary to retain information relating to your account in order to defend X against legal claims.
To maintain the safety and security of our products and services.
Including where it is necessary to store your information longer in order to investigate and fight abuse on our products and services.
Remember public content can exist elsewhere even after it is removed from X. For example, search engines and other third parties may retain copies of your posts longer, based upon their own privacy policies, even after they are deleted or expire on X. You can read more about search visibility
here
.
5. Take Control
5.1 Access, Correction, Portability.
You can access, correct, or modify the information you provided to us by editing your profile and adjusting your account
settings
.
You can learn more about the information we have collected or inferred about you in
Your X Data
and request access to additional information
here
.
You can download a copy of your information, such as your posts, by following the instructions
here
.
To protect your privacy and maintain security, we take steps to verify your identity before granting you access to your personal information or complying with a deletion, portability, or other related request. We may, in certain situations, reject your request for access, correction, or portability, for example, we may reject access where you are unable to verify your identity.
5.2 Deleting your Information.
If you follow the instructions
here
, your account will be deactivated and your data will be queued for deletion. When deactivated, your X account, including your display name, username, and public profile, will no longer be viewable on X.com, X for iOS, and X for Android. For up to 30 days after deactivation it is still possible to restore your X account if it was accidentally or wrongfully deactivated.
5.3 Objecting to, Restricting, or Withdrawing your Consent.
You can manage your privacy settings and other account features
here
. If you change your settings it may take some time for your choices to be fully reflected throughout our systems. You may also notice changes in your X experience or limitations in your ability to access certain features depending on the settings you’ve adjusted. You may also manage additional settings when interacting with certain content and features on different parts of the platform, such as whether a
Space
is recorded, or whether
videos you upload
are downloadable by others.
5.4 Authorized Agent Requests.
To submit a request related to access, modification, or deletion of your information, or someone else’s information if you are their authorized agent, you may also contact us as specified in the How To Contact X section of our Privacy Policy below. We may require you to provide additional information for verification.
6. Your Rights and Ours
We provide X to people all over the world and provide many of the same privacy tools and controls to all of our users regardless of where they live. However, your experience may be slightly different than users in other countries to ensure X respects local requirements.
6.1 We have specific legal bases to use your information.
X has carefully considered the legal reasons it is permitted to collect, use, share and otherwise process your information. If you want to dig in to learn more and better understand the nuances, we’d encourage you to check out
this additional information about data processing
. And no, we don’t sell your personal information.
6.2 We move your data to make X work for you.
Just as you use X to seamlessly participate in global conversations with people in countries all over the world, X must move information across borders and to different countries around the world to support the safe and reliable service you depend on. For example, if you live in Europe and are having a conversation with someone in the United States, information has to move between those countries to provide that experience – it’s what you expect from us.
We also use data centers and cloud providers, and engage
our affiliates
and third-party partners and
service providers
located in many parts of the world to help us provide our services. Before we move data between countries we look at the risks that may be presented to the data and rely on
standard contractual clauses
(SCCs), where applicable, to ensure your data rights are protected. To request a copy of the SCCs, please contact us
here
. If data will be shared with a third party, we require them to maintain the same protections over your data that we provide directly.
X is a
participant
in the EU-US Data Privacy Framework (DPF), the Swiss-US DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-US DPF. X complies with the DPF Principles for all its processing of personal data received from the European Union, Switzerland and the UK, in reliance on the EU-US DPF, Swiss-US DPF and UK Extension to the EU-US DPF, respectively. If you have an inquiry or complaint related to our participation in the DPF, please contact us
here
. As part of our participation in the DPF, if you have a dispute with us about our adherence to the DPF Principles, we will seek to resolve it through our internal complaint resolution process, alternatively through the US-based independent dispute resolution body
JAMS
, and under certain conditions, through the DPF Arbitration Process following the procedures and subject to the conditions described in
Annex 1
to the DPF Principles. DPF participants are subject to the investigatory and enforcement powers of the US Federal Trade Commission and other authorized statutory bodies. Under certain circumstances, participants may be liable for the transfer of personal data from the EU, Switzerland and the UK to third parties outside the EU, Switzerland and the UK. Learn more about the EU-US DPF, the Swiss-US DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-US DPF
here
.
7. X's Audience
8. Changes To This Privacy Policy
The most current version of this Privacy Policy governs our processing of your personal data and we may revise this Privacy Policy from time to time as needed.
If we do revise this Privacy Policy and make changes that are determined by us to be material, we will provide you notice and an opportunity to review the revised Privacy Policy before you continue to use X.
9. General
The X Privacy Policy is written in English but is made available in multiple languages through translations. X strives to make the translations as accurate as possible to the original English version. However, in case of any discrepancies or inconsistencies, the English language version of the X Privacy Policy shall take precedence. You acknowledge that English shall be the language of reference for interpreting and constructing the terms of the X Privacy Policy.
10. How To Contact X
We want to hear from you if you have thoughts or questions about this Privacy Policy. You can contact us via our
Privacy Policy Inquiries
page or by writing to us at the appropriate address below.
Information about our handling of California Consumer Privacy Act (CCPA) requests is available
here
. Information about our handling of “Consumer Health Data” and associated requests as defined under Washington State’s My Health My Data Act and other similar state laws is available
here
.
If you live in the United States or any other country outside of the European Union, EFTA States, or the United Kingdom, the data controller responsible for your personal data is X Corp., with an address of:
X Corp.
Attn: Privacy Policy Inquiry
865 FM 1209, Building 2
Bastrop, TX 78602
If you live in the European Union, EFTA States, or the United Kingdom, the data controller responsible for your personal data is Twitter International Unlimited Company, with an address of:
Twitter International Unlimited Company
Attn: Data Protection Officer
One Cumberland Place, Fenian Street
Dublin 2, D02 AX07 IRELAND
If you live in Switzerland, you can also contact our appointed representative at the following address:
Twitter Switzerland GmbH
Attn: Data Protection Officer
c/o Wasag Treuhand AG
Bolligenstrasse 18
Bern, 3006, SWITZERLAND
If you wish to raise a concern about our
data processing practices
, you have the right to do so with your local supervisory authority or Twitter International Unlimited Company’s lead supervisory authority, the Irish Data Protection Commission, using the
contact details
listed on their website.
View previous policies
Take control of your privacy
Adjust your settings
Did someone say … cookies?
X and its partners use cookies to provide you with a better, safer and
  faster service and to support our business. Some cookies are necessary to use
  our services, improve our services, and make sure they work properly.
Show more about your choices
.
Accept all cookies
Refuse non-essential cookies
Sub-policy 4
https://policies.google.com/privacy?hl=de:
Datenschutzerklärung & Nutzungsbedingungen
Übersicht
Datenschutzerklärung
Nutzungsbedingungen
Technologien
Häufig gestellte Fragen
Google-Konto
Datenschutzerklärung
Einführung
Von Google erhobene Daten
Gründe für die Datenerhebung durch Google
Datenschutzeinstellungen
Datenweitergabe
Gewährleistung der Datensicherheit
Löschen und Exportieren Ihrer Daten
Aufbewahrung Ihrer Informationen
Compliance und Zusammenarbeit mit Regierungsbehörden
Anforderungen in Europa
Informationen über diese Datenschutzerklärung
Weitere Informationen zum Datenschutz
Rahmenbedingungen für Datenübermittlungen
Wichtige Begriffe
Partner
Aktualisierungen
Google-Datenschutzerklärung
Wenn Sie unsere Dienste nutzen, vertrauen Sie uns Ihre Daten an. Wir sind uns bewusst, dass dies eine große Verantwortung ist und setzen alles daran, Ihre Daten zu schützen und zu gewährleisten, dass Sie die Kontrolle darüber behalten.
In dieser Datenschutzerklärung erfahren Sie, welche Daten von uns erhoben werden, welche Zwecke wir damit verfolgen und wie Sie Ihre Daten aktualisieren, verwalten, exportieren und löschen können.
Wenn das Datenschutzrecht der Europäischen Union oder des Vereinigten Königreichs auf die Verarbeitung Ihrer Daten Anwendung findet, finden Sie unten im Abschnitt
Anforderungen in Europa
weitere Informationen zu Ihren Rechten sowie zur Einhaltung dieser Gesetze durch Google.
Privatsphärecheck
Sie möchten Ihre Datenschutzeinstellungen ändern?
Privatsphärecheck machen
Wirksam ab dem 16. September 2024
|
Archivierte Versionen
|
PDF herunterladen
Inhalt
Einführung
Von Google erhobene Daten
Gründe für die Datenerhebung durch Google
Datenschutzeinstellungen
Datenweitergabe
Gewährleistung der Datensicherheit
Löschen und Exportieren Ihrer Daten
Aufbewahrung Ihrer Informationen
Compliance und Zusammenarbeit mit Regierungsbehörden
Anforderungen in Europa
Informationen über diese Datenschutzerklärung
Weitere Informationen zum Datenschutz
Wir entwickeln eine Vielzahl von Diensten, die Millionen von Menschen Tag für Tag helfen, die Welt ganz neu zu entdecken und mit ihr zu interagieren. Zu unseren Diensten zählen:
Google-Apps, -Websites und -Geräte, wie die Google-Suche, YouTube und Google Home
Plattformen wie der Chrome-Browser und das Android-Betriebssystem
Produkte, die in Apps und Websites von Drittanbietern integriert sind, wie Werbe- und Analyseprodukte und das eingebettete Google Maps
Sie können unsere Dienste auf vielfältige Weise nutzen, um Ihre Privatsphäre zu verwalten. So haben Sie beispielsweise die Möglichkeit, sich für ein Google-Konto zu registrieren, wenn Sie Inhalte wie E-Mails und Fotos erstellen und verwalten oder relevantere Suchergebnisse erhalten möchten. Sie können auch zahlreiche Google-Dienste nutzen, ohne sich anzumelden oder ein Konto zu erstellen, beispielsweise wenn Sie die Google Suche verwenden oder sich YouTube-Videos ansehen. Außerdem ist es möglich, in einem privaten Modus im Web zu surfen, etwa im
Inkognitomodus von Chrome
, sodass andere Personen, die Ihr Gerät verwenden, nicht sehen können, welche Inhalte Sie aufgerufen haben. Bei allen unseren Diensten können Sie Ihre Datenschutzeinstellungen ändern und so festlegen, ob wir manche Arten von Daten erheben und wie wir sie verwenden.
Um Ihnen unsere Datenschutzerklärung möglichst verständlich zu machen, haben wir Beispiele, Videos und Definitionen für
Schlüsselbegriffe
angefügt. Wenn Sie dennoch Fragen dazu haben,
können Sie uns gern kontaktieren
.
Von Google erhobene Daten
Im Folgenden erklären wir Ihnen, welche Arten von Daten wir erheben, während Sie unsere Dienste nutzen
Wir erheben Daten, um allen unseren Nutzern bessere Dienste zur Verfügung zu stellen – von der Feststellung grundlegender Informationen wie zum Beispiel Ihrer Sprache bis hin zu komplexeren Fragen wie zum Beispiel
Werbung, die Sie besonders nützlich finden
, den
Personen, mit denen Sie online am häufigsten zu tun haben
, oder den YouTube-Videos, die Sie interessant finden. Welche Daten Google erhebt und wie diese verwendet werden hängt davon ab, wie Sie unsere Dienste nutzen und wie Sie Ihre Datenschutzeinstellungen verwalten.
Wenn Sie nicht in einem Google-Konto angemeldet sind, speichern wir die von uns erhobenen Daten mit
eindeutigen Kennungen
, die mit dem Browser, der App oder dem
Gerät
verknüpft sind, welche Sie verwenden. Auf diese Weise können wir verschiedene Dinge tun, wie beispielsweise Ihre Einstellungen über Browsersitzungen hinweg beibehalten, zum Beispiel Ihre bevorzugte Sprache oder ob Sie relevantere Suchergebnisse oder Werbung auf Grundlage Ihrer Aktivitäten sehen möchten.
Wenn Sie in einem Google-Konto angemeldet sind, erheben wir auch Daten, die wir in Ihrem Google-Konto speichern und als
personenbezogene Daten
erachten.
Daten, die Sie uns bei der Nutzung unserer Dienste bereitstellen
Wenn Sie ein Google-Konto erstellen, stellen Sie uns
personenbezogene Daten
zur Verfügung, darunter Ihren Namen und ein Passwort. Sie können Ihrem Konto auch eine
Telefonnummer
oder
Zahlungsinformationen
hinzufügen. Selbst wenn Sie nicht bei einem Google-Konto angemeldet sind, können Sie uns Daten zur Verfügung stellen, etwa eine E-Mail-Adresse, um mit Google zu kommunizieren oder Benachrichtigungen zu unseren Diensten zu erhalten.
Wir erheben auch die Inhalte, die Sie bei der Nutzung unserer Dienste erstellen, hochladen oder von anderen erhalten. Dazu gehören beispielsweise E-Mails, die Sie verfassen und empfangen, Fotos und Videos, die Sie speichern, Dokumente und Tabellen, die Sie erstellen, und Kommentare, die Sie zu YouTube-Videos schreiben.
Daten, die wir bei der Nutzung unserer Dienste erheben
Ihre Apps, Browser und Geräte
Wir erheben Daten über die Apps, Browser und
Geräte
, die Sie beim Zugriff auf Google-Dienste verwenden. Das hilft uns, Funktionen wie automatische Produktupdates anzubieten oder Ihren Bildschirm zu dimmen, wenn Ihr Akku schwach ist.
Zu den von uns erhobenen Daten zählen
eindeutige Kennungen
, der Typ und die Einstellungen des Browsers, der Typ und die Einstellungen des Geräts, das Betriebssystem, Informationen zum Mobilfunknetz wie der Name des Mobilfunkanbieters und die Telefonnummer sowie die Versionsnummer der App. Wir erheben auch Daten über die Interaktion Ihrer Apps, Browser und Geräte mit unseren Diensten. Hierzu zählen u. a. die
IP-Adresse
, Absturzberichte, Systemaktivitäten sowie das Datum, die Uhrzeit und die Verweis-URL Ihrer Anfrage.
Wir erheben diese Daten, wenn ein Google-Dienst auf Ihrem Gerät unsere Server kontaktiert, beispielsweise wenn Sie eine App vom Play Store installieren oder wenn ein Dienst automatische Updates abfragt. Wenn Sie ein
Android-Gerät mit Google Apps
verwenden, kontaktiert Ihr Gerät regelmäßig die Google-Server, um Daten über Ihr Gerät und die Verbindung zu unseren Diensten bereitzustellen. Zu diesen Daten zählen beispielsweise
der Typ Ihres Geräts und der Name Ihres Mobilfunkanbieters
, Absturzberichte, die von Ihnen installierten Apps und, abhängig von den Einstellungen auf Ihrem Gerät,
weitere Informationen dazu, wie Sie Ihr Android-Gerät verwenden
.
Ihre Aktivitäten
Wir erheben in unseren Diensten Daten zu Ihren Aktivitäten. Diese Daten verwenden wir beispielsweise, um Ihnen ein YouTube-Video zu empfehlen, das Ihnen gefallen könnte. Unter anderem könnten folgende Aktivitätsdaten erhoben werden:
Begriffe, nach denen Sie suchen
Videos, die Sie sich ansehen
Inhalte und Werbeanzeigen, die Sie sich ansehen und mit denen Sie interagieren
Sprach- und Audiodaten
Kaufaktivitäten
Personen, mit denen Sie kommunizieren oder Inhalte austauschen
Aktivitäten auf Websites und Apps von Drittanbietern, die unsere Dienste nutzen
Der Chrome-Browserverlauf, den Sie
mit Ihrem Google-Konto synchronisiert
haben
Wenn Sie unsere
Dienste nutzen, um Anrufe zu tätigen und zu erhalten oder um Nachrichten zu senden und zu empfangen
, erheben wir möglicherweise Anruf- und Nachrichteninformationen wie Ihre Telefonnummer, die Anrufernummer, die Nummer des Angerufenen, Weiterleitungsnummern, die E-Mail-Adressen von Sender und Empfänger, das Datum und die Uhrzeit von Anrufen und Nachrichten, die Dauer von Anrufen, Routing-Informationen und die Art und Anzahl von Anrufen und Nachrichten.
Die in Ihrem Konto gespeicherten Aktivitätsdaten können Sie sich in Ihrem Google-Konto ansehen und sie dort auch verwalten.
Zum Google-Konto
Ihre Standortdaten
Wenn Sie unsere Dienste nutzen, erheben wir Standortinformationen. Dadurch können wir Ihnen Funktionen wie Wegbeschreibungen, Suchergebnisse für Dinge in Ihrer Nähe und Werbung auf Grundlage Ihres Standorts anbieten.
Je nachdem, welche Produkte Sie nutzen und welche Einstellungen Sie auswählen, kann Google verschiedene Arten von Standortinformationen verwenden, um bestimmte Dienste und Produkte hilfreicher zu gestalten. Dazu gehören unter anderem:
GPS- und andere
Sensordaten von Ihrem Gerät
IP-Adresse
Aktivitäten in Google-Diensten
, zum Beispiel von Ihren Suchanfragen oder
Orte, die Sie mit einem Label versehen, etwa Ihr Zuhause oder Ihr Arbeitsplatz
Informationen über Objekte in der Nähe Ihres Geräts
, wie etwa WLAN-Zugriffspunkte, Funkmasten und Bluetooth-fähige Geräte
Die durch uns erhobenen Arten von Standortdaten und wie lange wir diese speichern hängen zum Teil von Ihren Geräte- und Kontoeinstellungen ab. Zum Beispiel können Sie mit der App „Einstellungen“ auf Ihrem Android-Gerät
die Standorterfassung Ihres Geräts aktivieren oder deaktivieren
. Wenn Sie eine private Karte mit Orten erstellen möchten, die Sie mit Ihren angemeldeten Geräten besuchen, können Sie auch den
Standortverlauf
aktivieren. Und wenn die Einstellung „Web- & App-Aktivitäten“ aktiviert ist, werden Ihre Suchanfragen und anderen Aktivitäten in Google-Diensten, die möglicherwiese ebenfalls Standortinformationen enthalten, in Ihrem Google-Konto gespeichert. Weitere Informationen dazu, wie wir Standortinformationen verwenden,
finden Sie hier
.
In manchen Fällen erhebt Google auch Daten über Sie aus
öffentlich zugänglichen Quellen
. Wenn beispielsweise Ihr Name in Ihrer lokalen Zeitung erwähnt wird, kann die Google-Suchmaschine diesen Artikel indexieren und anderen Personen zeigen, wenn sie nach Ihrem Namen suchen. Unter Umständen erhalten wir auch Daten über Sie von vertrauenswürdigen Partnern. Dazu zählen Verzeichnisdienste, die uns in Google-Diensten anzuzeigende Informationen zu Unternehmen liefern, Marketingpartner, die uns Daten über potenzielle Kunden unserer Geschäftsdienste bereitstellen, und Sicherheitspartner, die uns Daten liefern, mit denen wir uns
vor Missbrauch schützen
können. Wir erhalten auch Daten von
Partnern, damit wir in deren Auftrag Werbung und Recherchedienste zur Verfügung stellen können
.
Zum Erheben und Speichern von Daten verwenden wir verschiedene Technologien. Dazu zählen
Cookies
,
Pixel-Tags
, die lokale Speicherung wie etwa
Browser-Webspeicher
oder
Anwendungsdaten-Caches
, Datenbanken und
Serverprotokolle
.
Gründe für die Datenerhebung durch Google
Wir verwenden Daten zur Verbesserung unserer Dienste
Wir nutzen die von uns im Rahmen unserer Dienste erhobenen Daten für folgende Zwecke:
Bereitstellung unserer Dienste
Wir nutzen Ihre Daten zur
Bereitstellung unserer Dienste
. Hierzu zählen beispielsweise die Verarbeitung Ihrer Suchbegriffe, um Suchergebnisse einzublenden, oder das Vorschlagen von Empfängern aus Ihren Kontakten, wenn Sie Inhalte teilen möchten.
Wartung und Verbesserung unserer Dienste
Wir verwenden Ihre Daten,
um zu gewährleisten, dass unsere Dienste ordnungsgemäß funktionieren
. Beispielsweise verwenden wir sie zur Überprüfung von Störungen oder zur Beseitigung von Problemen, die Sie uns gemeldet haben. Außerdem nutzen wir Ihre Daten, um
unsere Dienste zu verbessern
. Dazu zählt beispielsweise die Feststellung, welche Suchbegriffe am häufigsten falsch geschrieben werden, damit wir die in unseren Diensten verwendete Rechtschreibprüfung verbessern können.
Entwicklung neuer Dienste
Wir nutzen die im Rahmen unserer bestehenden Dienste erhobenen Daten zur Entwicklung neuer Dienste. Beispielsweise halfen uns Erkenntnisse darüber, wie Personen Fotos in Picasa, der ersten Foto-App von Google, organisiert haben, bei der Entwicklung von Google Fotos.
Bereitstellung personalisierter Dienste, einschließlich Inhalte und Werbeanzeigen
Wir nutzen die von uns erhobenen Daten zur Personalisierung unserer Dienste. Dazu zählen die Bereitstellung von Empfehlungen, von personalisierten Inhalten und
von personalisierten Suchergebnissen
. Beispielsweise erhalten Sie im
Sicherheitscheck
Sicherheitstipps, die auf Ihre persönliche Nutzung von Google-Produkten zugeschnitten sind. Je nach Ihren verfügbaren Einstellungen kann Google Play Daten nutzen, etwa über Apps, die Sie installiert haben, und Videos, die Sie sich auf YouTube angesehen haben, um neue Apps zu empfehlen, die Ihnen gefallen könnten.
Je nach Ihren Einstellungen zeigen wir Ihnen möglicherweise auch auf Ihre Interessen und Aktivitäten in Google-Diensten bezogene
personalisierte Werbung
. Wenn Sie beispielsweise nach „Mountainbikes“ suchen, kann auf YouTube Werbung für Sportausrüstung eingeblendet werden. In Ihren Einstellungen für Werbung unter
Mein Anzeigen-Center
können Sie festlegen, welche Daten wir zur Auswahl der präsentierten Werbung verwenden.
Wir zeigen Ihnen keine personalisierte Werbung, die auf
sensiblen Kategorien
, wie der ethnischen Zugehörigkeit, Religion, sexuellen Orientierung oder Gesundheit beruht.
Wir zeigen Ihnen keine personalisierte Werbung auf Grundlage von Ihren Inhalten aus Google Drive, Gmail oder Google Fotos.
Wir geben Daten, durch die Sie persönlich identifizierbar sind, wie beispielsweise Ihren Namen oder Ihre E-Mail-Adresse, nur dann an Werbetreibende weiter, wenn Sie uns dazu auffordern. Wenn Sie beispielsweise Werbung für einen Blumenladen in Ihrer Nähe sehen und die Schaltfläche "Zum Anrufen tippen" auswählen, verbinden wir Ihren Anruf und geben Ihre Telefonnummer möglicherweise an den Blumenladen weiter.
Zu „Mein Anzeigen-Center“
Messung der Leistung
Wir nutzen die Daten zur Analyse und Messung, um zu verstehen, wie unsere Dienste verwendet werden. Beispielsweise analysieren wir Daten über Ihre Besuche auf unseren Websites, um das Design unserer Produkte zu optimieren. Zusätzlich nutzen wir Daten der Werbeanzeigen, mit denen Sie interagieren, einschließlich Ihrer zugehörigen Aktivitäten in der Google Suche, um Werbetreibenden ein besseres Verständnis ihrer Werbekampagnen zu ermöglichen. Dazu nutzen wir verschiedene Tools, wie z. B. Google Analytics. Wenn Sie Websites besuchen oder Apps verwenden, bei denen Google Analytics eingesetzt wird, kann ein Google Analytics-Kunde sich dafür entscheiden, es Google zu ermöglichen,
Daten über Ihre Aktivitäten auf dieser Website oder in dieser App mit Aktivitäten auf anderen Websites oder in anderen Apps zu verknüpfen
, bei denen ebenfalls unsere Werbedienste genutzt werden.
Kommunikation mit Ihnen
Wir nutzen die von uns erhobenen Daten, wie Ihre E-Mail-Adresse, um uns direkt mit Ihnen in Verbindung zu setzen. So könnten wir Ihnen beispielsweise eine Benachrichtigung senden, wenn wir verdächtige Aktivitäten feststellen, wie einen Versuch, sich von einem ungewöhnlichen Standort aus in Ihrem Google-Konto anzumelden. Außerdem könnten wir Sie auch über bevorstehende Änderungen oder Verbesserungen in Bezug auf unsere Dienste informieren. Und wenn Sie Google kontaktieren, zeichnen wir Ihre Anfrage auf, um Ihnen bei der Lösung etwaiger Probleme behilflich zu sein.
Schutz von Google, unserer Nutzer und der Öffentlichkeit
Wir nutzen Daten, um die Verbesserung der
Sicherheit und Zuverlässigkeit
unserer Dienste zu unterstützen. Dazu zählen das Erkennen, Verhindern und Bekämpfen von Betrug, Missbrauch, Sicherheitsrisiken und technischen Problemen, die Google, unseren Nutzern oder
der Öffentlichkeit
schaden könnten.
Um Ihre Daten zu diesen Zwecken zu verarbeiten, verwenden wir verschiedene Technologien. Wir nutzen automatisierte Systeme, die Ihre Inhalte analysieren, sodass wir Ihnen personalisierte Suchergebnisse, personalisierte Werbung oder andere Funktionen bereitstellen können, die auf Ihre Nutzung unserer Dienste zugeschnitten sind. Zusätzlich analysieren wir Ihre Inhalte, damit wir
Missbrauch erkennen können
, wie Spam, Malware und illegale Inhalte. Wir verwenden auch
Algorithmen
, um Muster in Daten zu erkennen. Google Übersetzer hilft beispielsweise Personen, über Sprachbarrieren hinweg zu kommunizieren, indem der Dienst geläufige Sprachmuster in Sätzen erkennt, die übersetzt werden sollen.
Unter Umständen werden
die durch uns erhobenen Daten zu den oben beschriebenen Zwecken dienst- und geräteübergreifend verwendet
. Wenn Sie sich beispielsweise, je nach Ihren verfügbaren Einstellungen, Videos von Gitarrenspielern auf YouTube ansehen, kann eine Werbeanzeige für Gitarrenunterricht auf einer Website ausgeliefert werden, auf der unsere Anzeigenprodukte verwendet werden. Je nach Ihren Kontoeinstellungen könnten
Ihre Aktivitäten auf anderen Websites und in Apps
mit Ihren personenbezogenen Daten verknüpft werden, um die Dienste von Google und die von Google ausgelieferten Werbeanzeigen zu verbessern.
Wenn andere Nutzer bereits über Ihre E-Mail-Adresse oder andere Sie identifizierende Daten verfügen, zeigen wir diesen Nutzern möglicherweise die öffentlich sichtbaren Daten Ihres Google-Kontos an, wie Ihren Namen und Ihr Foto. Damit können andere Personen beispielsweise eine von Ihnen stammende E-Mail identifizieren.
Bevor wir Daten zu anderen als den in dieser Datenschutzerklärung aufgeführten Zwecken nutzen, bitten wir Sie um Ihre Einwilligung.
Datenschutzeinstellungen
Sie haben Entscheidungsmöglichkeiten in Bezug auf die durch uns erhobenen Daten und ihre Verwendung
In diesem Abschnitt werden die wichtigsten Einstellungen beschrieben, mit denen Sie Ihre Privatsphäre in unseren Diensten verwalten können. Sie können auch den
Privatsphärecheck
verwenden, um wichtige Datenschutzeinstellungen zu überprüfen und anzupassen. Zusätzlich zu diesen Tools bieten wir auch spezifische Datenschutzeinstellungen in unseren Produkten. Mehr dazu erfahren Sie in unserem
Leitfaden zum Datenschutz in Google-Produkten
.
Zum Privatsphärecheck
Daten verwalten, überprüfen und aktualisieren
Wenn Sie angemeldet sind, können Sie Ihre Daten jederzeit in den von Ihnen verwendeten Diensten überprüfen und aktualisieren. Beispielsweise ermöglichen Ihnen Fotos und Drive die Verwaltung bestimmter auf Google gespeicherter Inhaltstypen.
Wir stellen Ihnen auch einen Ort zur Verfügung, an dem Sie die in Ihrem Google-Konto gespeicherten Daten überprüfen und deren Speicherung steuern können. Ihr
Google-Konto
beinhaltet:
Datenschutzeinstellungen
Aktivitätseinstellungen
Hier können Sie festlegen, welche Arten von Aktivitäten in Ihrem Konto gespeichert werden sollen. Wenn Sie zum Beispiel den YouTube-Verlauf aktiviert haben, werden die Videos, die Sie sich ansehen, und die Dinge, nach denen Sie suchen, in Ihrem Konto gespeichert, damit Sie bessere Empfehlungen erhalten und Videos an der zuletzt angesehenen Stelle fortsetzen können. Und wenn die Einstellung „Web- & App-Aktivitäten“ aktiviert ist, werden Ihre Suchanfragen und Aktivitäten in anderen Google-Diensten in Ihrem Google-Konto gespeichert. So können Dienste persönlicher für Sie gestaltet werden, damit Sie unter anderem schneller Suchergebnisse und nützlichere Empfehlungen zu Apps und Inhalten erhalten. „Web- & App-Aktivitäten“ hat auch eine Untereinstellung, mit der Sie festlegen können, ob
Informationen zu Ihren Aktivitäten auf anderen Websites, in anderen Apps und auf Geräten, die Google-Dienste nutzen
, in Ihrem Google-Konto gespeichert und zur Verbesserung von Google-Diensten verwendet werden. Zu diesen Informationen gehört beispielsweise, welche Apps Sie auf Android installieren und verwenden.
Aktivitätseinstellungen aufrufen
Einstellungen für Werbung
Hier können Sie Ihre Einstellungen zu Werbeanzeigen verwalten, die auf Google sowie auf Websites und in Apps im Rahmen einer
Partnerschaft mit Google
von Google ausgeliefert werden. Sie können Ihre Interessen verändern, auswählen, ob Ihre personenbezogenen Daten verwendet werden sollen, um sich relevantere Werbung präsentieren zu lassen, und bestimmte Werbedienste aktivieren oder deaktivieren.
Zu „Mein Anzeigen-Center“
Über mich
Personenbezogene Daten in Ihrem Google-Konto verwalten und festlegen, wer sie in Google-Diensten sehen kann.
Zu "Über mich"
Soziale Empfehlungen
Hier können Sie auswählen, ob Ihr Name und Ihr Foto neben Ihren Aktivitäten wie Rezensionen und Empfehlungen in Werbeanzeigen erscheinen sollen.
Zu "Soziale Empfehlungen"
Websites und Apps, auf bzw. in denen Google-Dienste genutzt werden
Daten von Websites und Apps, auf bzw. in denen Google-Dienste wie Google Analytics genutzt werden, verwalten, die eventuell an Google weitergegeben werden, wenn Sie ihre Dienste aufrufen oder damit interagieren.
Zu Wie wir Daten von Websites oder Apps verwenden, auf bzw. in denen unsere Dienste genutzt werden
Möglichkeiten zur Überprüfung und Aktualisierung Ihrer Daten
Meine Aktivitäten
In „Meine Aktivitäten“ können Sie überprüfen und festlegen, welche Daten in Ihrem Google-Konto gespeichert werden, wenn Sie angemeldet sind und Google-Dienste verwenden, zum Beispiel Ihre Suchanfragen oder Nutzung von Google Play. Sie können sich die Inhalte nach Datum und Thema sortiert ansehen und Ihre Aktivitäten teilweise oder vollständig löschen.
Zu "Meine Aktivitäten"
Google Dashboard
Google Dashboard ermöglicht Ihnen die Verwaltung von Daten, die mit bestimmten Produkten verknüpft sind.
Zu Google Dashboard
Ihre personenbezogenen Daten
Hier können Sie Ihre Kontaktdaten wie Ihren Namen, Ihre E-Mail-Adresse und Ihre Telefonnummer verwalten.
Zu den personenbezogenen Daten
Wenn Sie abgemeldet sind, können Sie Daten verwalten, die mit Ihrem Browser oder Gerät verknüpft sind, z. B.:
Personalisierte Suche:
Hier können Sie auswählen
, ob Ihnen anhand Ihrer Suchaktivitäten relevantere Ergebnisse und Empfehlungen bereitgestellt werden sollen.
YouTube-Einstellungen: Hier können Sie Ihren
YouTube-Suchverlauf
und Ihren
YouTube-Wiedergabeverlauf
pausieren und löschen.
Einstellungen für Werbung: Hier können Sie
Ihre Einstellungen für Werbeanzeigen verwalten
, die Ihnen auf Google und Websites sowie in Apps von Google-Anzeigenpartnern präsentiert werden.
Daten exportieren, entfernen und löschen
Sie können eine Kopie Ihrer Inhalte aus Ihrem Google-Konto exportieren, um diese zu sichern oder sie mit einem anderen Dienst als den von Google zu nutzen.
Daten exportieren
Zum Löschen Ihrer Daten haben Sie folgende Möglichkeiten:
Inhalte aus
bestimmten Google-Diensten
löschen
Bestimmte Elemente in Ihrem Konto unter Verwendung von
Meine Aktivitäten
suchen und dann löschen
Bestimmte Google-Produkte
einschließlich Ihrer mit diesen Produkten verknüpften Daten löschen
Gesamtes Google-Konto löschen
Daten löschen
Sie können über den
Kontoinaktivität-Manager
auch einer anderen Person Zugriff zu Teilen Ihres Google-Kontos gewähren, falls Sie unerwarteterweise nicht in der Lage sind, Ihr Konto zu verwenden.
Und schließlich können Sie auch basierend auf dem anwendbaren Recht und unseren Richtlinien eine
Anfrage zum Entfernen von Inhalten
aus bestimmten Google-Diensten stellen.
Es gibt auch andere Möglichkeiten festzulegen, welche Daten von Google erhoben werden dürfen, und zwar unabhängig davon, ob Sie in einem Google-Konto angemeldet sind oder nicht. Hierzu zählen:
Browsereinstellungen: Ihr Browser lässt sich beispielsweise so konfigurieren, dass angezeigt wird, wenn von Google ein
Cookie
in Ihrem Browser gesetzt wurde. Ihr Browser lässt sich auch so konfigurieren, dass alle Cookies von einer bestimmten Domain oder allen Domains blockiert werden. Beachten Sie aber, dass Cookies erforderlich sind,
damit unsere Dienste ordnungsgemäß funktionieren
und etwa Ihre Spracheinstellungen gespeichert werden können.
Geräteeinstellungen: Ihr Gerät verfügt möglicherweise über Steuerelemente, mit denen Sie festlegen können, welche Daten wir erheben. So können Sie beispielsweise auf Ihrem Android-Gerät
Standorteinstellungen anpassen
.
Datenweitergabe
Datenweitergabe durch Sie
In vielen unserer Dienste können Sie Daten mit anderen Personen teilen. Sie bestimmen in diesem Fall, wie dabei vorgegangen werden soll. Beispielsweise können Sie entscheiden, welche Ihrer Videos auf YouTube öffentlich geteilt werden und welche vertraulich bleiben sollen. Bedenken Sie, dass, wenn Sie Daten öffentlich teilen, Suchmaschinen, einschließlich der Google-Suche, möglicherweise auf diese Daten zugreifen können.
Wenn Sie angemeldet sind und mit Google-Diensten interagieren, z. B. wenn Sie Kommentare zu einem YouTube-Video verfassen oder eine App bei Play rezensieren, werden Ihr Name und Ihr Foto neben Ihrer Aktivität angezeigt. Diese Daten werden wir gegebenenfalls
entsprechend Ihren Einstellungen für "Soziale Empfehlungen"
auch in Werbeanzeigen veröffentlichen.
Datenweitergabe durch Google
Wir geben personenbezogene Daten an Unternehmen, Organisationen oder Personen außerhalb von Google nur in folgenden Fällen weiter:
Mit Ihrer Einwilligung
Wir geben personenbezogene Daten außerhalb von Google weiter, wenn wir Ihre Einwilligung dazu haben. Wenn Sie beispielsweise
Google Home verwenden, um eine Tischreservierung vorzunehmen
, holen wir Ihre Zustimmung ein, bevor wir dem Restaurant Ihren Namen oder Ihre Telefonnummer weitergeben. Wir bieten Ihnen außerdem Steuerungsmöglichkeiten, damit Sie
Drittanbieter-Apps und -Websites einsehen und verwalten
können, denen Sie Zugriff auf Daten in Ihrem Google-Konto gewährt haben. Vor der Weitergabe von
sensiblen personenbezogenen Daten
holen wir Ihre ausdrückliche Einwilligung ein.
Im Falle von Domain-Administratoren
Wenn Sie Mitglied einer Bildungseinrichtung oder Mitarbeiter einer Organisation sind, die Google-Dienste nutzt, haben der
Domainadministrator
und Reseller, die Ihr Konto verwalten, Zugriff auf Ihr Google-Konto. Diese haben folgende Möglichkeiten:
Auf die in Ihrem Konto gespeicherten Daten zugreifen und diese speichern, z. B. Ihre E-Mail
Statistiken zu Ihrem Konto ansehen, z. B. wie viele Apps Sie installieren
Das Passwort für Ihr Konto ändern
Den Zugriff auf Ihr Konto sperren oder beenden
Ihre Kontodaten abrufen, um anwendbare Gesetze, Vorschriften und gerichtliche Verfahren einzuhalten oder einer vollstreckbaren behördlichen Anordnung nachzukommen
Ihre Möglichkeiten einschränken, Daten oder Datenschutzeinstellungen zu löschen oder zu bearbeiten
Für die Verarbeitung durch andere Stellen
Wir stellen personenbezogene Daten unseren
verbundenen Unternehmen
, anderen vertrauenswürdigen Unternehmen oder Personen zur Verfügung, die diese in unserem Auftrag verarbeiten. Dies geschieht auf der Grundlage unserer Weisungen und im Einklang mit unserer Datenschutzerklärung sowie anderen geeigneten Vertraulichkeits- und Sicherheitsmaßnahmen. Beispielsweise nutzen wir Dienstanbieter zur Unterstützung beim Betrieb unserer Rechenzentren, Bereitstellen unserer Produkte und Dienste, Verbessern unserer internen Geschäftsprozesse und Anbieten zusätzlichen Supports für unsere Kunden und Nutzer. Außerdem arbeiten wir mit Dienstanbietern zusammen, die uns beim Prüfen von Videoinhalten auf YouTube aus Gründen der öffentlichen Sicherheit unterstützen und uns durch das Analysieren und Anhören von Beispielausschnitten gespeicherter Audioaufnahmen von Nutzern helfen, die Audioerkennungstechnologien von Google zu verbessern.
Aus rechtlichen Gründen
Wir geben personenbezogene Daten an Stellen außerhalb von Google weiter, wenn wir nach Treu und Glauben davon ausgehen dürfen, dass die Offenlegung dieser Daten vernünftigerweise notwendig ist, um folgende Zwecke zu erfüllen:
Geltende Gesetze, Vorschriften oder
gerichtliche Verfahren einzuhalten oder einer vollstreckbaren behördlichen Anordnung nachzukommen
. In unserem
Transparenzbericht
veröffentlichen wir Daten über die Anzahl und die Art der Anfragen, die wir von Behörden erhalten.
Geltende Nutzungsbedingungen durchzusetzen, einschließlich der Untersuchung möglicher Verstöße.
Betrug, Sicherheitsmängel oder technische Probleme aufzudecken, zu verhindern oder anderweitig zu bekämpfen.
Die Rechte, das Eigentum oder die Sicherheit von Google,
unserer Nutzer
oder der Öffentlichkeit vor Schaden zu schützen.
Wir geben möglicherweise
nicht personenbezogene Daten
an die Öffentlichkeit und unsere Partner, beispielsweise an Publisher, Werbetreibende, Entwickler oder Rechteinhaber, weiter. Beispielsweise veröffentlichen wir Daten,
um Trends bezüglich der allgemeinen Nutzung unserer Dienste aufzuzeigen
. Darüber hinaus erlauben wir
bestimmten Partnern
, Daten von Ihrem Browser oder Gerät unter Verwendung ihrer eigenen Cookies oder ähnlicher Technologien zu Werbe- und Messzwecken zu erheben.
Falls Google an einem Unternehmenszusammenschluss, einem Unternehmenserwerb oder einem Verkauf von Vermögensgegenständen beteiligt ist, werden wir weiterhin dafür sorgen, die Vertraulichkeit Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten sicherzustellen. Zusätzlich werden wir betroffene Nutzer benachrichtigen, bevor personenbezogene Daten übermittelt oder Gegenstand einer anderen Datenschutzerklärung werden.
Gewährleistung der Datensicherheit
Wir integrieren Sicherheitsfunktionen in unsere Dienste, um Ihre Daten zu schützen
Alle Google-Produkte sind mit starken Sicherheitsfunktionen ausgestattet, die Ihre Daten fortwährend schützen. Die Erkenntnisse, die wir durch die Bereitstellung unserer Dienste gewinnen, helfen uns, Bedrohungen der Sicherheit automatisch abzufangen und zu verhindern, dass Sie mit solchen konfrontiert werden. Wenn wir tatsächlich ein Risiko erkennen, von dem Sie unserer Meinung nach erfahren sollten, benachrichtigen wir Sie und schlagen Ihnen Maßnahmen vor, um sich besser zu schützen.
Wir bemühen uns intensiv darum, Sie und Google vor unbefugtem Zugriff auf Daten oder vor unbefugter Veränderung, Offenlegung oder Vernichtung von Daten zu schützen. Unsere Maßnahmen umfassen Folgendes:
Wir verschlüsseln Ihre Daten, um sie während der Übertragung zu schützen.
Wir bieten eine Vielzahl von Sicherheitsfunktionen, wie
Safe Browsing
, Sicherheitscheck und die
Bestätigung in zwei Schritten
, um Ihnen zu helfen, Ihr Konto zu schützen.
Wir überprüfen laufend unsere Praktiken zur Erhebung, Speicherung und Verarbeitung von Daten, einschließlich der physischen Sicherheitsmaßnahmen, um unsere Systeme vor unbefugtem Zugriff zu schützen.
Der Zugriff auf personenbezogene Daten wird durch uns beschränkt und nur Mitarbeitern, Auftragnehmern und Kundenservicemitarbeitern von Google gewährt, die diese Daten für die weitere Datenverarbeitung unbedingt benötigen. Alle Personen mit diesen Zugriffsrechten sind strengen Vertraulichkeitsverpflichtungen unterworfen und können disziplinarischen Maßnahmen unterzogen oder entlassen werden, falls sie diese Verpflichtungen nicht einhalten.
Löschen und Exportieren Ihrer Daten
Sie können Ihre Daten jederzeit exportieren oder aus Ihrem Google-Konto löschen.
Sie können eine Kopie Ihrer Inhalte aus Ihrem Google-Konto exportieren, um diese zu sichern oder sie mit einem anderen Dienst als den von Google zu nutzen.
Daten exportieren
Zum Löschen Ihrer Daten haben Sie folgende Möglichkeiten:
Inhalte aus
bestimmten Google-Diensten
löschen
Bestimmte Elemente in Ihrem Konto unter Verwendung von
Meine Aktivitäten
suchen und dann löschen
Bestimmte Google-Produkte
einschließlich Ihrer mit diesen Produkten verknüpften Daten löschen
Gesamtes Google-Konto löschen
Daten löschen
Aufbewahrung Ihrer Informationen
Wir speichern erhobene Daten über verschiedene Zeiträume, abhängig davon, um welche Daten es sich handelt, wie wir sie nutzen und wie Sie Ihre Einstellungen konfigurieren:
Einige Daten können Sie jederzeit löschen, beispielsweise Ihre
personenbezogenen Daten
oder selbst erstellte oder hochgeladene Inhalte, wie
Fotos
und
Dokumente
. Darüber hinaus können Sie in Ihrem Konto gespeicherte
Informationen zu Ihren Aktivitäten
löschen oder
festlegen, dass diese nach einer bestimmten Zeit automatisch gelöscht werden
. Wir speichern diese Daten in Ihrem Google-Konto, bis Sie sie entweder selbst entfernen oder entfernen lassen.
Andere Daten werden nach einer bestimmten Zeit automatisch gelöscht oder anonymisiert, etwa
Werbedaten
in Serverprotokollen.
Einige Daten, etwa dazu, wie oft Sie unsere Dienste nutzen, speichern wir, bis Sie Ihr Google-Konto löschen.
Einige Daten speichern wir für längere Zeit, wenn dies aus legitimen geschäftlichen oder rechtlichen Gründen erforderlich ist. Diese Gründe können Sicherheit, Betrugs- und Missbrauchsabwehr oder eine Dokumentationspflicht im Finanzbereich sein.
Wenn Sie Daten löschen, beginnen wir mit einem Datenlöschvorgang, um dafür zu sorgen, dass die Daten sicher und vollständig von unseren Servern entfernt werden oder nur in anonymisierter Form gespeichert bleiben. Wir bemühen uns, Daten mithilfe unserer Dienste davor zu schützen, irrtümlich oder mutwillig gelöscht zu werden. Aus diesem Grund kann es zwischen der von Ihnen durchgeführten Löschung von Inhalten und dem Zeitpunkt, zu dem Kopien aus unseren aktiven Systemen und Sicherungssystemen gelöscht werden, zu Verzögerungen kommen.
Weitere Informationen zur Dauer der Datenspeicherung bei Google und Angaben dazu, wie lange es dauert, bis wir Ihre Informationen löschen,
finden Sie hier
.
Compliance und Zusammenarbeit mit Regierungsbehörden
Wir überprüfen die vorliegende Datenschutzerklärung regelmäßig und verarbeiten Ihre Daten entsprechend dieser Datenschutzerklärung.
Datenübermittlung
Wir betreiben
Server auf der ganzen Welt
. Deshalb können Ihre Daten auf Servern verarbeitet werden, die außerhalb des Landes liegen, in dem Sie leben. Datenschutzgesetze sind von Land zu Land unterschiedlich und einige bieten mehr Schutz als andere. Unabhängig davon, wo Ihre Daten verarbeitet werden, wenden wir grundsätzlich dieselben, in der Datenschutzerklärung beschriebenen Schutzmaßnahmen an. Ferner halten wir bestimmte
rechtliche Rahmenbedingungen
zu Datenübermittlungen ein.
Sobald wir formale schriftliche Beschwerden erhalten, nehmen wir mit der Person, die die Beschwerde eingereicht hat, Kontakt auf. Wir arbeiten mit den jeweils zuständigen Regulierungsbehörden einschließlich der lokalen Datenschutzaufsichtsbehörden zusammen, um alle Beschwerden bezüglich der Übermittlung Ihrer Daten beizulegen, die wir nicht direkt mit Ihnen klären können.
Anforderungen in Europa
So können Sie Ihre Rechte ausüben und Google kontaktieren
Wenn das Datenschutzrecht der Europäischen Union (EU) oder des Vereinigten Königreichs (UK) auf die Verarbeitung Ihrer Daten Anwendung findet, stellen wir Ihnen die in dieser Datenschutzerklärung beschriebenen
Steuerungsmöglichkeiten
zur Verfügung, damit Sie Ihre Rechte ausüben können, Auskunft über Ihre Daten zu erhalten, sie zu aktualisieren, zu
löschen
und deren Verarbeitung einzuschränken. Darüber hinaus haben Sie das Recht, der Verarbeitung Ihrer Daten zu widersprechen oder Ihre Daten in einen anderen Dienst zu exportieren.
Bei weiteren Fragen oder Anliegen hinsichtlich Ihrer Rechte können Sie sich
an Google und an unsere Datenschutzabteilung wenden
. Falls Sie Bedenken bezüglich Ihrer Rechte gemäß lokalem geltenden Recht haben, können Sie sich außerdem an Ihre lokale Datenschutzaufsichtsbehörde wenden.
Datenverantwortlicher
Der für die Verarbeitung Ihrer Informationen zuständige Datenverantwortliche
hängt von Ihrem gewöhnlichen Aufenthaltsort ab, sofern dies in den Datenschutzhinweisen eines bestimmten Dienstes nicht anders angegeben ist:
Google Ireland Limited, mit Sitz in Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin 4, Irland, für Nutzer von Google-Diensten, die ihren gewöhnlichen Aufenthalt im Europäischen Wirtschaftsraum oder der Schweiz haben.
Google LLC, mit Sitz in 1600 Amphitheatre Parkway, Mountain View, CA 94043, USA, für Nutzer von Google-Diensten, die ihren gewöhnlichen Aufenthalt im Vereinigten Königreich haben.
Google LLC ist unabhängig von Ihrem Wohnort der zuständige Datenverantwortliche für die Verarbeitung von Informationen, die in Diensten wie der
Google Suche
und Google Maps indexiert und angezeigt werden. Google Ireland Limited ist der zuständige Datenverantwortliche für die Verarbeitung von Informationen, mit denen Google AI-Modelle trainiert werden, um sie in Diensten einzusetzen, die Google Ireland Limited im Europäischen Wirtschaftsraum oder in der Schweiz bereitstellt.
Rechtsgrundlagen der Verarbeitung
Wir verarbeiten Ihre Daten zu den in dieser Datenschutzerklärung beschriebenen
Zwecken
auf der Basis der folgenden rechtlichen Grundlagen:
Wir verarbeiten Ihre Daten, um Ihnen einen Dienst bereitzustellen, den Sie im Rahmen eines Vertrags angefordert haben.
Wir verarbeiten Ihre Daten, soweit wir oder
Dritte
ein berechtigtes Interesse daran haben, dies zu tun. Dabei wenden wir
geeignete Maßnahmen
zum Schutz Ihrer Privatsphäre an.
Wir verarbeiten Ihre Daten, wenn dies zum Schutz Ihrer lebenswichtige Interessen oder denen einer anderen Person erforderlich ist.
Wir verarbeiten Ihre Daten, wenn wir dazu eine rechtliche Verpflichtung haben.
Wir bitten Sie um Ihre Einwilligung zur Verarbeitung Ihrer Daten für bestimmte Zwecke. Sie haben das Recht, Ihre Einwilligung jederzeit zu widerrufen.
Ihre Datenschutzeinstellungen sowie die Art, wie Sie Google-Dienste verwenden, bestimmen, welche Daten verarbeitet werden, zu welchem Zweck dies geschieht und was die Rechtsgrundlagen dafür sind. In der folgenden Tabelle werden diese Verarbeitungszwecke, die Arten der verarbeiteten Daten sowie die rechtlichen Grundlagen für die Verarbeitung ausführlicher erläutert.
Warum und wie wir Daten verarbeiten
Welche Daten wir verarbeiten
Rechtliche Gründe
Bereitstellung von Google-Diensten, ‑Produkten und ‑Funktionen
Beispiele für Verarbeitungsaktivitäten:
Wir verarbeiten die Begriffe, nach denen Sie suchen, um Ihnen entsprechende Suchergebnisse anzuzeigen.
Wir verwenden die IP-Adresse Ihres Geräts, um Ihnen die angeforderten Daten senden zu können, beispielsweise ein YouTube-Video.
Wir verwenden eindeutige IDs, die in Cookies auf Ihrem Gerät gespeichert sind, um Sie als die Person zu authentifizieren, die auf Ihr Google-Konto zugreifen darf.
Fotos und Videos, die Sie in Google Fotos hochladen, werden verwendet, um Ihnen zu helfen, Alben, Collagen und andere Kreationen zu erstellen, die Sie mit anderen teilen können.
Wenn Sie Dienstleistungen oder Artikel von uns kaufen, verwenden wir Informationen wie Ihre Lieferadresse oder Lieferanweisungen – beispielsweise für die Bearbeitung und Lieferung Ihrer Bestellung sowie zur Bereitstellung des Supports für das Produkt oder die Dienstleistung, die Sie kaufen.
Wir verarbeiten Ihre Zahlungsinformationen, wenn Sie zusätzlichen Speicherplatz für Google Drive kaufen.
Wir können Kontaktdaten (wie Namen und E‑Mail-Adressen) von Personen verwenden, mit denen Sie in Google-Produkten interagieren. So können wir Ihnen helfen, diese Personen zu finden, wenn Sie in Google-Diensten wie Gmail, Fotos und Assistant etwas mit ihnen teilen oder mit ihnen kommunizieren möchten.
Eine E‑Mail mit einer Flugbestätigung kann verwendet werden, um eine Check‑in-Schaltfläche in Gmail zu erstellen.
Google erhebt auch Daten über Sie aus öffentlich zugänglichen Quellen. Wenn beispielsweise Ihr Name in Ihrer lokalen Zeitung erwähnt wird, kann die Google-Suchmaschine diesen Artikel indexieren und anderen Personen zeigen, wenn sie nach Ihrem Namen suchen. Oder wenn Ihre Unternehmensinformationen auf einer Website erscheinen, können wir sie indexieren und in Google-Diensten anzeigen.
Wir können Ihnen helfen, Ihren Standort mithilfe der
Google-Standortfreigabe
zu teilen. So können andere Sie auf einer Karte finden oder Ihre voraussichtliche Ankunftszeit abschätzen.
Wie im Abschnitt
Datenweitergabe
beschrieben, geben wir personenbezogene Daten außerhalb von Google weiter, wenn wir Ihre Einwilligung dazu haben. Wir bieten Ihnen außerdem Einstellungen, mit denen Sie
Apps und Websites von Drittanbietern überprüfen und verwalten
können, denen Sie Zugriff auf Daten in Ihrem Google-Konto gewährt haben.
Welche Daten verarbeitet werden, hängt von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Die Daten können Folgendes umfassen:
Daten, die Sie uns bei der Nutzung unserer Dienste zur Verfügung stellen:
Inhalte, die Sie erstellen, hochladen oder empfangen (z. B. Fotos, Videos, E‑Mails, Dokumente und Tabellen).
Google Dashboard
: Damit können Sie Daten verwalten, die mit bestimmten Produkten verknüpft sind.
Personenbezogene Daten, die Sie angeben, wenn Sie ein Google-Konto erstellen (z. B.
Ihr Name
und Ihr Passwort,
Ihre Telefonnummer
, Ihr Geburtsdatum oder
Zahlungsinformationen
).
Daten, die wir erheben, wenn Sie unsere Dienste nutzen:
Informationen zu Ihren Apps, Browsern und Geräten
wie
eindeutige IDs
, die mit dem Browser, der App oder dem Gerät verknüpft sind, den, die bzw. das Sie verwenden, sowie Informationen über die Interaktion Ihrer Apps, Browser und Geräte mit unseren Diensten (z. B. IP-Adresse, Absturzberichte und Systemaktivitäten).
Informationen zu Ihren Aktivitäten in unseren Diensten
wie Ihre Suchbegriffe, der mit Ihrem Google-Konto synchronisierte Chrome-Browserverlauf, Ihre Aufrufe und Interaktionen von bzw. mit Inhalten und Werbung sowie Ihre Aktivitäten auf Websites und in Apps von Drittanbietern, in denen unsere Dienste genutzt werden. Die in Ihrem Google-Konto gespeicherten Aktivitäten können Sie auf der Seite
Meine Aktivitäten
einsehen und verwalten.
Standortinformationen
, die etwa anhand von GPS, IP-Adresse und anderen Daten von Sensoren an Ihrem Gerät oder in dessen Nähe ermittelt werden können. Dies hängt zum Teil von Ihren Geräte- und Kontoeinstellungen ab.
Informationen aus öffentlich zugänglichen Quellen
wie Informationen, die online (z. B. wenn Ihr Name in Ihrer lokalen Zeitung erwähnt wird) oder aus anderen Quellen öffentlich verfügbar sind.
Informationen von unseren vertrauenswürdigen Partnern
, z. B. von Verzeichnisdiensten, die uns Informationen zu Unternehmen liefern, die in Google-Diensten angezeigt werden sollen, oder von Sicherheitspartnern, die uns Daten liefern, um vor Missbrauch zu schützen.
Die rechtlichen Grundlagen für die Verarbeitung dieser Informationen hängen von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Diese Grundlagen können Folgendes umfassen:
Erfüllung eines Vertrags
mit Ihnen, beispielsweise durch das Bereitstellen eines YouTube-Videos oder durch die Bearbeitung und Lieferung Ihrer Bestellung, wenn Sie Dienstleistungen oder physische Waren von uns kaufen.
Wahrung unserer
berechtigten Interessen
und derer von Dritten, einschließlich:
Bereitstellung, Verwaltung und Optimierung von Diensten, um die Anforderungen unserer Nutzer zu erfüllen.
Beispiel: Verwendung von Kontaktdaten (wie Namen und E‑Mail-Adressen) von Personen, mit denen Sie in Google-Produkten interagieren, damit Sie diese Personen leichter finden, wenn Sie in Google-Diensten wie Gmail, Fotos und Assistant etwas mit ihnen teilen oder mit ihnen kommunizieren möchten.
Ihre
Einwilligung
, z. B. wenn Sie Ihren Standort über die Google-Standortfreigabe teilen.
Aufrechterhaltung und Verbesserung von Google-Diensten, ‑Produkten und ‑Funktionen
Aufrechterhaltung des Dienstes, damit er wie vorgesehen funktioniert, z. B. durch Fehlerbehebung sowie Nachverfolgung und Behebung von Problemen.
Beispiele für Verarbeitungsaktivitäten:
Wir überprüfen fortlaufend die ordnungsgemäße Funktion unserer Dienste, um Probleme zu erkennen. Wenn wir feststellen, dass eine Funktion fehlerhaft ist, ermöglichen uns die vor dem Eintreten des Problems erhobenen Aktivitätsdaten, das Problem schneller zu beheben.
Wir erfassen die Interaktionen von Nutzern mit Schaltflächen in Anwendungen wie Google Maps und der Google Suche, um festzustellen, ob sie wie vorgesehen funktionieren.
Verbesserung der Google-Dienste sowie der Sicherheit und Zuverlässigkeit dieser Dienste, z. B. durch Erkennung, Verhinderung und Reaktion von bzw. auf Betrug, Missbrauch, Sicherheitsrisiken und technische Probleme, die den Dienst oder Nutzer beeinträchtigen könnten.
Beispiele für Verarbeitungsaktivitäten:
Wir analysieren Daten zu Ihren Interaktionen mit unseren Diensten, damit wir die Produkte weiter optimieren können. So können wir beispielsweise besser feststellen, wenn Nutzer zu lange brauchen, um eine bestimmte Aufgabe auszuführen, oder manche Schritte überhaupt nicht beenden können. In diesem Fall können wir diese Funktion überarbeiten und das Produkt für alle verbessern.
Wir analysieren, welche Suchbegriffe am häufigsten falsch geschrieben werden, damit wir die Rechtschreibprüfung für alle unsere Dienste verbessern können.
Wir analysieren die Nutzung von Google Übersetzer, um die Übersetzungsqualität zu verbessern und Google Übersetzer in weiteren Sprachen verfügbar zu machen.
Wir analysieren Suchanfragen bei Google Shopping, um festzustellen, welche Produkte, Händler und Marken für verschiedene Arten von Suchanfragen relevant sind.
Die Safe Browsing-Funktion von Google Chrome kann Informationen zu verdächtigen Websites zwischen dem Browser eines Nutzers und Google-Servern teilen und dadurch z. B. zum Schutz vor Phishing, Malware und schädlicher Werbung beitragen.
Welche Daten verarbeitet werden, hängt von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Die Daten können Folgendes umfassen:
Daten, die Sie uns bei der Nutzung unserer Dienste zur Verfügung stellen:
Inhalte, die Sie erstellen, hochladen oder empfangen (z. B. Fotos, Videos, E‑Mails, Dokumente und Tabellen).
Google Dashboard
: Damit können Sie Daten verwalten, die mit bestimmten Produkten verknüpft sind.
Personenbezogene Daten, die Sie angeben, wenn Sie ein Google-Konto erstellen (z. B.
Ihr Name
und Ihr Passwort,
Ihre Telefonnummer
, Ihr Geburtsdatum oder
Zahlungsinformationen
).
Daten, die wir erheben, wenn Sie unsere Dienste nutzen:
Informationen zu Ihren Apps, Browsern und Geräten
wie
eindeutige IDs
, die mit dem Browser, der App oder dem Gerät verknüpft sind, den, die bzw. das Sie verwenden, sowie Informationen über die Interaktion Ihrer Apps, Browser und Geräte mit unseren Diensten (z. B. IP-Adresse, Absturzberichte und Systemaktivitäten).
Informationen zu Ihren Aktivitäten in unseren Diensten
wie Ihre Suchbegriffe, der mit Ihrem Google-Konto synchronisierte Chrome-Browserverlauf, Ihre Aufrufe und Interaktionen von bzw. mit Inhalten und Werbung sowie Ihre Aktivitäten auf Websites und in Apps von Drittanbietern, in denen unsere Dienste genutzt werden. Die in Ihrem Google-Konto gespeicherten Aktivitäten können Sie auf der Seite
Meine Aktivitäten
einsehen und verwalten.
Standortinformationen
, die etwa anhand von GPS, IP-Adresse und anderen Daten von Sensoren an Ihrem Gerät oder in dessen Nähe ermittelt werden können. Dies hängt zum Teil von Ihren Geräte- und Kontoeinstellungen ab.
Informationen aus öffentlich zugänglichen Quellen
wie Informationen, die online (z. B. wenn Ihr Name in Ihrer lokalen Zeitung erwähnt wird) oder aus anderen Quellen öffentlich verfügbar sind.
Informationen von unseren vertrauenswürdigen Partnern
, z. B. von Verzeichnisdiensten, die uns Informationen zu Unternehmen liefern, die in Google-Diensten angezeigt werden sollen, oder von Sicherheitspartnern, die uns Daten liefern, um vor Missbrauch zu schützen.
Die rechtlichen Grundlagen für die Verarbeitung dieser Informationen hängen von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Diese Grundlagen können Folgendes umfassen:
Erfüllung eines Vertrags
mit Ihnen, beispielsweise bei der Verwendung der Interaktionsprotokolle von Google-Apps, um sicherzustellen, dass diese wie vorgesehen funktionieren.
Wahrung unserer
berechtigten Interessen
und derer von Dritten, einschließlich:
Bereitstellung, Verwaltung und Optimierung von Diensten, um die Anforderungen unserer Nutzer zu erfüllen.
Beispielsweise analysieren wir, welche Suchbegriffe am häufigsten falsch geschrieben werden, damit wir die Rechtschreibprüfung für alle unsere Dienste verbessern können.
Erkenntnisse darüber, wie Personen unsere Dienste nutzen, um die Leistung unserer Dienste zu gewährleisten und zu verbessern.
Beispielsweise analysieren wir die Nutzung von Google Übersetzer, um die Übersetzungsqualität zu verbessern und Google Übersetzer in weiteren Sprachen verfügbar zu machen.
Durchführung von Recherchen, mit denen unsere Dienste für unsere Nutzer verbessert werden und die für die Öffentlichkeit von Vorteil sind.
Beispielsweise arbeiten wir daran, die Übersetzungsqualität von Google Übersetzer zu verbessern und Google Übersetzer in weiteren Sprachen verfügbar zu machen.
Entwicklung neuer Google-Dienste, ‑Produkte und ‑Funktionen
Beispiele für Verarbeitungsaktivitäten:
Erkenntnisse darüber, wie Nutzer Fotos in Picasa, der ersten Foto-App von Google, organisiert haben, halfen uns bei der Entwicklung von Google Fotos.
Erkenntnisse darüber, wie kurze Inhalte von Creatorn erstellt und von Nutzern angesehen werden, halfen Google dabei, neue YouTube-Dienste zu entwickeln.
Je nach Ihren Einstellungen können wir Audioaufnahmen von Sprachinteraktionen mit Diensten wie der Google Suche, Assistant, Maps und Gboard speichern, um die Audiotechnologien von Google weiterzuentwickeln und zu verbessern.
Wir verwenden Informationen, die online oder aus anderen Quellen öffentlich verfügbar sind, um neue Modelle für maschinelles Lernen zu trainieren und grundlegende Technologien zu entwickeln, die für verschiedene Google-Produkte wie Google Übersetzer, Gemini-Apps und Cloud AI-Funktionen eingesetzt werden.
Wir nutzen Ihre Interaktionen mit KI-Modellen und ‑Technologien wie Gemini-Apps, um diese Modelle zu entwickeln, zu trainieren, zu optimieren und zu verbessern, damit sie besser auf Ihre Anfragen reagieren. Wir verwenden sie auch, um Klassifikatoren und Filter zu aktualisieren und dadurch z. B. die Sicherheit, das Sprachverständnis und die Genauigkeit zu verbessern.
Welche Daten verarbeitet werden, hängt von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Die Daten können Folgendes umfassen:
Daten, die Sie uns bei der Nutzung unserer Dienste zur Verfügung stellen:
Inhalte, die Sie erstellen, hochladen oder empfangen (z. B. Fotos, Videos, E‑Mails, Dokumente und Tabellen).
Google Dashboard
: Damit können Sie Daten verwalten, die mit bestimmten Produkten verknüpft sind.
Personenbezogene Daten, die Sie angeben, wenn Sie ein Google-Konto erstellen (z. B.
Ihr Name
und Ihr Passwort,
Ihre Telefonnummer
, Ihr Geburtsdatum oder
Zahlungsinformationen
).
Daten, die wir erheben, wenn Sie unsere Dienste nutzen:
Informationen zu Ihren Apps, Browsern und Geräten
wie
eindeutige IDs
, die mit dem Browser, der App oder dem Gerät verknüpft sind, den, die bzw. das Sie verwenden, sowie Informationen über die Interaktion Ihrer Apps, Browser und Geräte mit unseren Diensten (z. B. IP-Adresse, Absturzberichte und Systemaktivitäten).
Informationen zu Ihren Aktivitäten in unseren Diensten
wie Ihre Suchbegriffe, der mit Ihrem Google-Konto synchronisierte Chrome-Browserverlauf, Ihre Aufrufe und Interaktionen von bzw. mit Inhalten und Werbung sowie Ihre Aktivitäten auf Websites und in Apps von Drittanbietern, in denen unsere Dienste genutzt werden. Die in Ihrem Google-Konto gespeicherten Aktivitäten können Sie auf der Seite
Meine Aktivitäten
einsehen und verwalten.
Standortinformationen
, die etwa anhand von GPS, IP-Adresse und anderen Daten von Sensoren an Ihrem Gerät oder in dessen Nähe ermittelt werden können. Dies hängt zum Teil von Ihren Geräte- und Kontoeinstellungen ab.
Informationen aus öffentlich zugänglichen Quellen
wie Informationen, die online (z. B. wenn Ihr Name in Ihrer lokalen Zeitung erwähnt wird) oder aus anderen Quellen öffentlich verfügbar sind.
Informationen von unseren vertrauenswürdigen Partnern
, z. B. von Verzeichnisdiensten, die uns Informationen zu Unternehmen liefern, die in Google-Diensten angezeigt werden sollen, oder von Sicherheitspartnern, die uns Daten liefern, um vor Missbrauch zu schützen.
Die rechtlichen Grundlagen für die Verarbeitung dieser Informationen hängen von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Diese Grundlagen können Folgendes umfassen:
Wahrung unserer
berechtigten Interessen
und derer von Dritten, einschließlich:
Entwicklung neuer Produkte und Funktionen, die für unsere Nutzer hilfreich sind.
Beispielsweise haben uns Erkenntnisse darüber, wie Personen Fotos in Picasa, der ersten Foto-App von Google, verwendet haben, bei der Entwicklung von Google Fotos geholfen. Oder wir nutzen Daten, die online oder in anderen öffentlichen Quellen verfügbar sind, um die KI-Modelle von Google zu trainieren sowie Produkte und Funktionen weiterzuentwickeln, die diese grundlegenden Technologien nutzen – wie Google Übersetzer, Gemini-Apps und Cloud AI.
Bereitstellung, Aufrechterhaltung und Optimierung von Diensten, um die Anforderungen unserer Nutzer zu erfüllen.
Zum Beispiel verwenden wir Informationen über Ihre Aktivitäten in unseren Diensten – wie Ihre Interaktionen mit Gemini-Apps – um Modelle für maschinelles Lernen zu trainieren und zu verbessern und um ihr Sprachverständnis sowie ihre Sicherheitsklassifikatoren und -filter zu aktualisieren.
Mit Ihrer
Einwilligung
, beispielsweise das Speichern von Audioaufnahmen von Sprachinteraktionen mit der Google Suche, Assistant, Maps und Gboard, um Technologien zur Audioerkennung von Google zu entwickeln und verbessern.
Zur Bereitstellung personalisierter Dienste, einschließlich Inhalte und Werbeanzeigen
Um unsere Dienste für Sie anzupassen, etwa über Empfehlungen, personalisierte Inhalte und personalisierte Suchergebnisse.
Beispiele für Verarbeitungsaktivitäten:
Der Sicherheitscheck von Google bietet Ihnen Sicherheitstipps, die an Ihre Nutzung von Google-Produkten angepasst sind.
Google News bietet Ihnen möglicherweise lokale Nachrichten, die auf Ihrem ungefähren Standort basieren.
Die Google Suche bietet Ihnen möglicherweise Ergebnisse, die auf ihrem ungefähren Standort basieren.
Google Assistant kann Ihre Kontakte verwenden, um auf Anfrage Nachrichten zu senden, z. B. „SMS an Max Mustermann“.
Google Play nutzt Daten, etwa über Apps, die Sie installiert haben, und Videos, die Sie sich auf YouTube angesehen haben, um neue Apps zu empfehlen, die Ihnen gefallen könnten.
Möglicherweise zeigen wir ein Google-Doodle auf der Startseite der Google Suche, das sich speziell auf einen feierlichen Anlass in Ihrem Land bezieht.
Google kann Werbung basierend auf dem Kontext der von Ihnen besuchten Website anzeigen, beispielsweise Anzeigen für Gartengeräte auf einer Seite mit Tipps zum Gärtnern.
Wenn Sie in Ihrem Google-Konto angemeldet sind und „Web- & App-Aktivitäten“ aktiviert haben, können Sie relevantere Suchergebnisse erhalten, die auf Ihren bisherigen Suchanfragen und Aktivitäten in anderen Google-Diensten basieren.
Je nach Ihren Einstellungen, um auf Ihre Interessen bezogene personalisierte Werbung anzuzeigen.
Beispiele für Verarbeitungsaktivitäten:
Wenn Sie nach „Mountainbikes“ suchen oder Videos über Mountainbiken ansehen, kann in Ihren Suchergebnissen oder auf YouTube Werbung für Sportausrüstung eingeblendet werden.
Wenn Sie sich auf YouTube Videos zum Thema Backen ansehen, wird Ihnen beim Surfen im Web möglicherweise mehr Werbung zu diesem Thema präsentiert.
Möglicherweise wird Ihnen auch personalisierte Werbung präsentiert, die auf den Daten des Werbetreibenden basiert. Wenn Sie beispielsweise auf der Website eines Werbetreibenden eingekauft haben, kann dieser die Daten über Ihren Besuch zum Einblenden von Werbeanzeigen nutzen.
Welche Daten verarbeitet werden, hängt von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Die Daten können Folgendes umfassen:
Daten, die Sie uns bei der Nutzung unserer Dienste zur Verfügung stellen:
Inhalte, die Sie erstellen, hochladen oder empfangen (z. B. Fotos, Videos, E‑Mails, Dokumente und Tabellen).
Google Dashboard
: Damit können Sie Daten verwalten, die mit bestimmten Produkten verknüpft sind.
Personenbezogene Daten, die Sie angeben, wenn Sie ein Google-Konto erstellen (z. B.
Ihr Name
und Ihr Passwort,
Ihre Telefonnummer
, Ihr Geburtsdatum oder
Zahlungsinformationen
).
Daten, die wir erheben, wenn Sie unsere Dienste nutzen:
Informationen zu Ihren Apps, Browsern und Geräten
wie
eindeutige IDs
, die mit dem Browser, der App oder dem Gerät verknüpft sind, den, die bzw. das Sie verwenden, sowie Informationen über die Interaktion Ihrer Apps, Browser und Geräte mit unseren Diensten (z. B. IP-Adresse, Absturzberichte und Systemaktivitäten).
Informationen zu Ihren Aktivitäten in unseren Diensten
wie Ihre Suchbegriffe, der mit Ihrem Google-Konto synchronisierte Chrome-Browserverlauf, Ihre Aufrufe und Interaktionen von bzw. mit Inhalten und Werbung sowie Ihre Aktivitäten auf Websites und in Apps von Drittanbietern, in denen unsere Dienste genutzt werden. Die in Ihrem Google-Konto gespeicherten Aktivitäten können Sie auf der Seite
Meine Aktivitäten
einsehen und verwalten.
Standortinformationen
, die etwa anhand von GPS, IP-Adresse und anderen Daten von Sensoren an Ihrem Gerät oder in dessen Nähe ermittelt werden können. Dies hängt zum Teil von Ihren Geräte- und Kontoeinstellungen ab.
Informationen aus öffentlich zugänglichen Quellen
wie Informationen, die online (z. B. wenn Ihr Name in Ihrer lokalen Zeitung erwähnt wird) oder aus anderen Quellen öffentlich verfügbar sind.
Informationen von unseren vertrauenswürdigen Partnern
, z. B. von Verzeichnisdiensten, die uns Informationen zu Unternehmen liefern, die in Google-Diensten angezeigt werden sollen, oder von Sicherheitspartnern, die uns Daten liefern, um vor Missbrauch zu schützen.
Die rechtlichen Grundlagen für die Verarbeitung dieser Informationen hängen von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Diese Grundlagen können Folgendes umfassen:
Um einen
Vertrag mit Ihnen auszuführen
, zum Beispiel wenn Google Assistant Ihre Kontakte verwendet, um auf Ihre Anfrage hin eine Nachricht zu senden, wie „Sende eine SMS an Max Mustermann“.
Wahrung unserer
berechtigten Interessen
und derer von Dritten, einschließlich:
Personalisierung unserer Dienste, um sie nutzerfreundlicher zu gestalten.
Beispielsweise können wir ein Google-Doodle auf der Startseite der Google Suche zeigen, das sich speziell auf einen feierlichen Anlass in Ihrem Land bezieht, Sicherheitstipps passend zu Ihrer Nutzung von Google-Produkten geben oder gegebenenfalls die Nutzung altersgerecht anpassen.
Einblenden von Werbung, um viele unserer Dienste kostenlos anbieten zu können.
Zum Beispiel zeigen wir möglicherweise Werbung, die auf dem Kontext einer besuchten Website basiert, wie Werbeanzeigen für Gartengeräte auf einer Seite mit Gartentipps. Bei personalisierter Werbung bitten wir Sie um Ihre Einwilligung.
Mit Ihrer
Einwilligung
– beispielsweise Empfehlungen bei Google Play basierend auf Videos, die Sie sich auf YouTube angesehen haben, oder personalisierte Werbung auf Grundlage Ihrer Interessen. Zum Beispiel könnte Ihnen Werbung rund um das Thema Backen angezeigt werden, wenn Sie im Web surfen, nachdem Sie auf YouTube Videos über Backen angesehen haben.
Zur Leistungsmessung – Wir nutzen die Daten zur Analyse und Messung, um zu verstehen, wie unsere Dienste verwendet werden.
Beispiele für Verarbeitungsaktivitäten:
Wir analysieren Daten über Ihre Besuche auf unseren Websites, um das Design unserer Produkte zu optimieren.
Wir nutzen Daten zu der Werbung, mit der Sie interagieren, um Werbetreibenden ein besseres Verständnis ihrer Werbekampagnen zu ermöglichen.
Wir verwenden Daten darüber, welche Orte Nutzer in Google Earth am häufigsten anklicken, um zu erfahren, welche Funktionen beliebt sind, und um Fehler zu identifizieren.
Die Google Suche erhebt, wie oft eine bestimmte Anfrage gestellt wurde und wie Nutzer die Qualität ihrer Suchergebnisse wahrnehmen, um die Google Suche noch hilfreicher zu gestalten.
Google Übersetzer analysiert Daten über die Anzahl der angefertigten Übersetzungen und die Häufigkeit, mit der eine Übersetzung als minderwertig eingestuft wird, um mögliche neue Funktionen zu ermitteln und Probleme bei der Nutzung des Dienstes zu beheben.
Wir geben möglicherweise nicht personenidentifizierbare Informationen an unsere Partner – beispielsweise Lizenzgeber von Inhalten – weiter, wenn wir Lizenzgebühren zahlen.
Welche Daten verarbeitet werden, hängt von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Die Daten können Folgendes umfassen:
Daten, die Sie uns bei der Nutzung unserer Dienste zur Verfügung stellen:
Inhalte, die Sie erstellen, hochladen oder empfangen (z. B. Fotos, Videos, E‑Mails, Dokumente und Tabellen).
Google Dashboard
: Damit können Sie Daten verwalten, die mit bestimmten Produkten verknüpft sind.
Personenbezogene Daten, die Sie angeben, wenn Sie ein Google-Konto erstellen (z. B.
Ihr Name
und Ihr Passwort,
Ihre Telefonnummer
, Ihr Geburtsdatum oder
Zahlungsinformationen
).
Daten, die wir erheben, wenn Sie unsere Dienste nutzen:
Informationen zu Ihren Apps, Browsern und Geräten
wie
eindeutige IDs
, die mit dem Browser, der App oder dem Gerät verknüpft sind, den, die bzw. das Sie verwenden, sowie Informationen über die Interaktion Ihrer Apps, Browser und Geräte mit unseren Diensten (z. B. IP-Adresse, Absturzberichte und Systemaktivitäten).
Informationen zu Ihren Aktivitäten in unseren Diensten
wie Ihre Suchbegriffe, der mit Ihrem Google-Konto synchronisierte Chrome-Browserverlauf, Ihre Aufrufe und Interaktionen von bzw. mit Inhalten und Werbung sowie Ihre Aktivitäten auf Websites und in Apps von Drittanbietern, in denen unsere Dienste genutzt werden. Die in Ihrem Google-Konto gespeicherten Aktivitäten können Sie auf der Seite
Meine Aktivitäten
einsehen und verwalten.
Standortinformationen
, die etwa anhand von GPS, IP-Adresse und anderen Daten von Sensoren an Ihrem Gerät oder in dessen Nähe ermittelt werden können. Dies hängt zum Teil von Ihren Geräte- und Kontoeinstellungen ab.
Informationen aus öffentlich zugänglichen Quellen
wie Informationen, die online (z. B. wenn Ihr Name in Ihrer lokalen Zeitung erwähnt wird) oder aus anderen Quellen öffentlich verfügbar sind.
Informationen von unseren vertrauenswürdigen Partnern
, z. B. von Verzeichnisdiensten, die uns Informationen zu Unternehmen liefern, die in Google-Diensten angezeigt werden sollen, oder von Sicherheitspartnern, die uns Daten liefern, um vor Missbrauch zu schützen.
Die rechtlichen Grundlagen für die Verarbeitung dieser Informationen hängen von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Diese Grundlagen können Folgendes umfassen:
Wahrung unserer
berechtigten Interessen
und derer von Dritten, einschließlich:
Erkenntnisse darüber, wie Personen unsere Dienste nutzen, um die Leistung unserer Dienste zu gewährleisten und zu verbessern.
Beispielsweise analysieren wir die Nutzung von Google Übersetzer, um die Übersetzungsqualität zu verbessern und Google Übersetzer in weiteren Sprachen verfügbar zu machen.
Aufdecken, Verhindern oder anderweitiges Bekämpfen von Betrug, Missbrauch, Sicherheitsmängeln oder technischen Problemen bei unseren Diensten.
Beispielsweise beobachten wir Nutzungsmuster in Google Earth, um Programmfehler zu identifizieren.
Bereitstellung, Aufrechterhaltung und Optimierung von Diensten, um die Anforderungen unserer Nutzer zu erfüllen.
Beispielsweise analysieren wir, wie oft eine Übersetzung bei Google Übersetzer als minderwertig eingestuft wird, um Probleme bei der Nutzung des Dienstes zu beheben.
Entwicklung neuer Produkte und Funktionen, die für unsere Nutzer hilfreich sind.
Zum Beispiel analysieren wir Daten zur Anzahl der in Google Übersetzer angefertigten Übersetzungen, um mögliche neue Funktionen zu ermitteln.
Einhalten von Verpflichtungen gegenüber unseren Partnern wie Entwicklern und Rechteinhabern.
Zum Beispiel erstellen wir Berichte für die Lizenzgeber von Inhalten, die mit der Zahlung von Lizenzgebühren einhergehen.
Für die Kommunikation mit Ihnen – Wir verwenden die von uns erhobenen Daten, wie etwa Ihre E-Mail-Adresse, um direkt mit Ihnen zu interagieren.
Beispiele für Verarbeitungsaktivitäten:
So könnten wir Ihnen beispielsweise eine Benachrichtigung senden, wenn wir verdächtige Aktivitäten feststellen, z. B. einen Versuch, sich von einem ungewöhnlichen Standort aus in Ihrem Google-Konto anzumelden.
Möglicherweise informieren wir Sie über anstehende Änderungen oder Verbesserungen unserer Dienste.
Wenn Sie Google kontaktieren, zeichnen wir Ihre Anfrage auf, um Ihnen bei der Lösung eventuell auftretender Probleme behilflich sein zu können.
Google-Dienste wie Google Fotos können Ihnen, abhängig von Ihren Einstellungen, Marketingmitteilungen über Angebote wie beispielsweise Rabattaktionen für Fotodrucke senden.
Google-Dienste wie YouTube Premium und YouTube Music Premium können Sie über anstehende Änderungen Ihres Abonnements informieren.
Welche Daten verarbeitet werden, hängt von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Die Daten können Folgendes umfassen:
Daten, die Sie uns bei der Nutzung unserer Dienste zur Verfügung stellen:
Inhalte, die Sie erstellen, hochladen oder empfangen (z. B. Fotos, Videos, E‑Mails, Dokumente und Tabellen).
Google Dashboard
: Damit können Sie Daten verwalten, die mit bestimmten Produkten verknüpft sind.
Personenbezogene Daten, die Sie angeben, wenn Sie ein Google-Konto erstellen (z. B.
Ihr Name
und Ihr Passwort,
Ihre Telefonnummer
, Ihr Geburtsdatum oder
Zahlungsinformationen
).
Daten, die wir erheben, wenn Sie unsere Dienste nutzen:
Informationen zu Ihren Apps, Browsern und Geräten
wie
eindeutige IDs
, die mit dem Browser, der App oder dem Gerät verknüpft sind, den, die bzw. das Sie verwenden, sowie Informationen über die Interaktion Ihrer Apps, Browser und Geräte mit unseren Diensten (z. B. IP-Adresse, Absturzberichte und Systemaktivitäten).
Informationen zu Ihren Aktivitäten in unseren Diensten
wie Ihre Suchbegriffe, der mit Ihrem Google-Konto synchronisierte Chrome-Browserverlauf, Ihre Aufrufe und Interaktionen von bzw. mit Inhalten und Werbung sowie Ihre Aktivitäten auf Websites und in Apps von Drittanbietern, in denen unsere Dienste genutzt werden. Die in Ihrem Google-Konto gespeicherten Aktivitäten können Sie auf der Seite
Meine Aktivitäten
einsehen und verwalten.
Standortinformationen
, die etwa anhand von GPS, IP-Adresse und anderen Daten von Sensoren an Ihrem Gerät oder in dessen Nähe ermittelt werden können. Dies hängt zum Teil von Ihren Geräte- und Kontoeinstellungen ab.
Informationen aus öffentlich zugänglichen Quellen
wie Informationen, die online (z. B. wenn Ihr Name in Ihrer lokalen Zeitung erwähnt wird) oder aus anderen Quellen öffentlich verfügbar sind.
Informationen von unseren vertrauenswürdigen Partnern
, z. B. von Verzeichnisdiensten, die uns Informationen zu Unternehmen liefern, die in Google-Diensten angezeigt werden sollen, oder von Sicherheitspartnern, die uns Daten liefern, um vor Missbrauch zu schützen.
Die rechtlichen Grundlagen für die Verarbeitung dieser Informationen hängen von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Diese Grundlagen können Folgendes umfassen:
Zur
Ausführung eines Vertrags
mit Ihnen, beispielsweise wenn Sie den Google-Support kontaktieren oder sich für Mitteilungen über Produktupdates anmelden.
Wahrung unserer
berechtigten Interessen
und derer von Dritten, einschließlich:
Bereitstellung, Aufrechterhaltung und Optimierung von Diensten, um die Anforderungen unserer Nutzer zu erfüllen.
Wir informieren Sie beispielsweise über unsere Dienste, beispielsweise über anstehende Änderungen oder Verbesserungen.
Marketing, um Nutzer über unsere Dienste zu informieren.
Zum Beispiel können wir eine E-Mail an Nutzer von Google Fotos senden, die Informationen zu einer Rabattaktion für Fotodrucke enthält.
Zum Schutz von Google, unserer Nutzer und der Öffentlichkeit
Zur Verbesserung der Sicherheit und Zuverlässigkeit unserer Dienste. Dazu zählen das Erkennen, Verhindern und Bekämpfen von Betrug, Missbrauch, Sicherheitsmängeln und technischen Problemen, die Google, unseren Nutzern oder der Öffentlichkeit schaden könnten.
Beispiele für Verarbeitungsaktivitäten:
Wir erheben und analysieren IP-Adressen und Cookiedaten, um unsere Dienste durch automatisierte Mechanismen vor Missbrauch zu schützen. Dieser Missbrauch kann viele verschiedene Formen annehmen, zum Beispiel das Senden von Spam an Gmail-Nutzer. Außerdem könnte Werbetreibenden durch betrügerisches Klicken auf Werbung Geld gestohlen werden oder Inhalte durch das Starten eines Distributed-Denial-of-Service-Angriffs (DDoS) unterdrückt werden.
Mit der Funktion "Letzte Kontoaktivität" in Gmail können Sie feststellen, ob und wann eine andere Person ohne Ihr Wissen auf Ihre E-Mail zugegriffen hat. In dieser Funktion finden Sie Informationen zu den letzten Aktivitäten in Gmail, wie etwa die IP-Adressen, über die auf Ihre E-Mails zugegriffen wurde, sowie wo und wann der Zugriff erfolgt ist.
Wir analysieren Ihre Inhalte, um
Missbrauch wie Spam, Malware und illegale Inhalte zu erkennen
.
Wir verarbeiten Informationen zu Ersuchen um Entfernung von Inhalten aus unseren Diensten gemäß den Richtlinien von Google zur Entfernung von Inhalten oder gemäß anwendbarem Recht, um das betreffende Ersuchen zu prüfen, Transparenz zu gewährleisten, die Fähigkeit zur Rechenschaftslegung zu verbessern und Missbrauch und Betrug bei diesen Verfahren zu verhindern.
Zur Einhaltung geltender Gesetze, Verordnungen sowie Rechtsverfahren oder Befolgung eines vollstreckbaren behördlichen Ersuchens.
Beispiele für Verarbeitungsaktivitäten:
Wie andere Technologie- und Kommunikationsunternehmen auch erhält Google regelmäßig Anfragen von staatlichen Behörden und Gerichten auf der ganzen Welt, in denen wir zur Offenlegung von Nutzerdaten aufgefordert werden. Die Achtung Ihrer Privatsphäre und die Sicherheit Ihrer gespeicherten Daten sind zwei wesentliche Aspekte, an denen wir uns bei der Frage orientieren, ob wir diesen rechtlichen Anfragen nachkommen. Unsere Rechtsabteilung prüft jede einzelne Anfrage unabhängig von ihrer Art. Häufig werden Anfragen abgelehnt, die zu allgemein gehalten sind oder bei denen das korrekte Verfahren nicht eingehalten wurde.
Aufgrund rechtlicher Verpflichtungen müssen wir bestimmte Daten speichern, etwa aufgrund einer Dokumentationspflicht im Finanzbereich. Beispielsweise speichern wir aus steuerrechtlichen oder buchhalterischen Gründen Daten zu Zahlungen, die Sie an Google geleistet haben.
Verschiedene Gesetze und Vorschriften verpflichten uns dazu, Maßnahmen zu ergreifen, um sicherzustellen, dass unsere Nutzer alt genug sind, um unsere Dienste zu nutzen. Um Ihr Alter zu bestimmen, verarbeiten wir das von Ihnen angegebene Geburtsdatum. Wir verarbeiten auch Informationen über Ihre Aktivitäten in unseren Diensten, sowohl wenn Sie in einem Google-Konto angemeldet als auch wenn Sie abgemeldet sind, und verwenden maschinelles Lernen, um festzustellen, ob Sie wahrscheinlich über 18 Jahre alt sind. In bestimmten Fällen, wenn wir nicht bestätigen können, dass Sie alt genug sind, um unsere Dienste zu nutzen, können wir andere Informationen anfordern, um Ihr Alter zu überprüfen, beispielsweise Ihren Personalausweis, Ihre Kreditkarte, ein Foto von Ihnen oder Ihre Telefonnummer.
Welche Daten verarbeitet werden, hängt von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Die Daten können Folgendes umfassen:
Daten, die Sie uns bei der Nutzung unserer Dienste zur Verfügung stellen:
Inhalte, die Sie erstellen, hochladen oder empfangen (z. B. Fotos, Videos, E‑Mails, Dokumente und Tabellen).
Google Dashboard
: Damit können Sie Daten verwalten, die mit bestimmten Produkten verknüpft sind.
Personenbezogene Daten, die Sie angeben, wenn Sie ein Google-Konto erstellen (z. B.
Ihr Name
und Ihr Passwort,
Ihre Telefonnummer
, Ihr Geburtsdatum oder
Zahlungsinformationen
).
Daten, die wir erheben, wenn Sie unsere Dienste nutzen:
Informationen zu Ihren Apps, Browsern und Geräten
wie
eindeutige IDs
, die mit dem Browser, der App oder dem Gerät verknüpft sind, den, die bzw. das Sie verwenden, sowie Informationen über die Interaktion Ihrer Apps, Browser und Geräte mit unseren Diensten (z. B. IP-Adresse, Absturzberichte und Systemaktivitäten).
Informationen zu Ihren Aktivitäten in unseren Diensten
wie Ihre Suchbegriffe, der mit Ihrem Google-Konto synchronisierte Chrome-Browserverlauf, Ihre Aufrufe und Interaktionen von bzw. mit Inhalten und Werbung sowie Ihre Aktivitäten auf Websites und in Apps von Drittanbietern, in denen unsere Dienste genutzt werden. Die in Ihrem Google-Konto gespeicherten Aktivitäten können Sie auf der Seite
Meine Aktivitäten
einsehen und verwalten.
Standortinformationen
, die etwa anhand von GPS, IP-Adresse und anderen Daten von Sensoren an Ihrem Gerät oder in dessen Nähe ermittelt werden können. Dies hängt zum Teil von Ihren Geräte- und Kontoeinstellungen ab.
Informationen aus öffentlich zugänglichen Quellen
wie Informationen, die online (z. B. wenn Ihr Name in Ihrer lokalen Zeitung erwähnt wird) oder aus anderen Quellen öffentlich verfügbar sind.
Informationen von unseren vertrauenswürdigen Partnern
, z. B. von Verzeichnisdiensten, die uns Informationen zu Unternehmen liefern, die in Google-Diensten angezeigt werden sollen, oder von Sicherheitspartnern, die uns Daten liefern, um vor Missbrauch zu schützen.
Die rechtlichen Grundlagen für die Verarbeitung dieser Informationen hängen von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Diese Grundlagen können Folgendes umfassen:
Wahrung unserer
berechtigten Interessen
und derer von Dritten, einschließlich:
Durchsetzen rechtlicher Forderungen, einschließlich der Untersuchung möglicher Verletzungen anwendbarer Nutzungsbedingungen.
Wir analysieren beispielsweise Inhalte, um Missbrauch wie Spam, Malware und illegale Inhalte zu erkennen.
Aufdecken, Verhindern oder anderweitiges Bekämpfen von Betrug, Missbrauch, Sicherheitsmängeln oder technischen Problemen bei unseren Diensten.
Zum Beispiel erheben und analysieren wir IP-Adressen und Cookiedaten zum Schutz vor automatisiertem Missbrauch.
Schutz der Rechte, des Eigentums und der Sicherheit von Google, unserer Nutzer und der Öffentlichkeit vor Schaden, einschließlich der Offenlegung von Informationen gegenüber Behörden.
Beispielsweise reagieren wir auf gerichtliche Verfahren oder vollstreckbare Aufforderungen von staatlichen Stellen und Gerichten zur Offenlegung von Daten, nachdem jede Anfrage sorgfältig geprüft wurde, um sicherzustellen, dass sie den anwendbaren Gesetzen entspricht.
Recherchen, durch die unsere Dienste für Nutzer verbessert werden und die für die Öffentlichkeit von Vorteil sind.
Wir verarbeiten beispielsweise Informationen zu
Ersuchen um Entfernung von Inhalten
aus unseren Diensten, um die Öffentlichkeit zu informieren, Recherchen zu ermöglichen und Transparenz in Bezug auf diese Ersuchen zu bieten.
Wenn dies zum Schutz Ihrer
lebenswichtigen Interessen
oder denen einer anderen Person erforderlich ist. Wir verarbeiten beispielsweise Daten, um sexuellen Missbrauch von Kindern im Internet zu erkennen und zu bekämpfen.
Wenn wir eine
rechtliche Verpflichtung
haben, zum Beispiel zur Aufbewahrung bestimmter Informationen zu Zwecken der Dokumentationspflicht oder zur Verarbeitung und Aufbewahrung von Informationen, um dabei zu helfen sicherzustellen, dass die Nutzer alt genug sind, um unsere Dienste zu nutzen.
Google-Dienste verknüpfen
Wenn Sie ein Nutzer in der EU sind, bieten wir Ihnen die Wahl, eine Verknüpfung zwischen bestimmten Google-Diensten beizubehalten. Weitere Informationen zu Ihren verknüpften Diensten und zum Verwalten Ihrer Auswahl finden Sie unter
Informationen zum GDM und zu Ihren verknüpften Diensten
.
Informationen über diese Datenschutzerklärung
Anwendungsbereich dieser Datenschutzerklärung
Diese Datenschutzerklärung gilt für alle Dienste, die von Google LLC und seinen
verbundenen Unternehmen
angeboten werden, einschließlich YouTube, Android und Dienste, die auf Websites Dritter bereitgestellt werden, wie Werbedienste. Diese Datenschutzerklärung gilt nicht für Dienste, für die gesonderte Datenschutzrichtlinien gelten und die die vorliegende Datenschutzerklärung nicht beinhalten.
Diese Datenschutzerklärung gilt nicht für
den Umgang mit Daten durch andere Unternehmen und Organisationen, die unsere Dienste bewerben,
Dienste, die von anderen Unternehmen oder Personen angeboten werden, einschließlich von ihnen angebotene Produkte oder Websites, die möglicherweise Google-Dienste beinhalten, für die die Erklärung gilt, sowie Produkte oder Websites, die Ihnen in Suchergebnissen angezeigt werden oder die über einen Link in unseren Diensten erreicht werden können
Änderungen an dieser Datenschutzerklärung
Wir ändern diese Datenschutzerklärung von Zeit zu Zeit. Wir werden Ihre Rechte im Rahmen dieser Datenschutzerklärung ohne Ihre ausdrückliche Zustimmung nicht einschränken. Wir geben immer das Veröffentlichungsdatum der letzten Änderungen an und bieten Ihnen Zugriff auf
archivierte Versionen
. Bei wesentlichen Änderungen weisen wir deutlicher auf diese hin. So werden Sie zum Beispiel bei bestimmten Diensten per E-Mail über eine Änderung der Datenschutzerklärung benachrichtigt.
Weitere Informationen zum Datenschutz
Google-Dienste
Die folgenden Datenschutzhinweise bieten zusätzliche Informationen zu manchen Google-Diensten:
Payments
Fiber
Gemini-Apps
Google Fi
Google Workspace for Education
Read Along
YouTube Kids
Mit Family Link verwaltete Google-Konten für Kinder unter 13 Jahren (in einigen Ländern gilt ein anderes Mindestalter für Google-Konten)
Family Link-Leitfaden zum Datenschutz für Kinder und Teenager
Erhebung von Sprach- und Audiodaten im Rahmen von Funktionen für Kinder in Google Assistant
Wenn Sie Mitglied einer Organisation sind, die Google Workspace oder Google Cloud Platform verwendet, erfahren Sie in den
Datenschutzhinweisen zu Google Cloud
, wie diese Dienste Ihre personenbezogenen Informationen erheben und verarbeiten.
Weitere hilfreiche Ressourcen
Die folgenden Links bieten hilfreiche Ressourcen, um weitere Informationen über unsere Praktiken und Datenschutzeinstellungen zu erhalten.
Ihr Google-Konto
verfügt über zahlreiche Einstellungen, mit denen Sie Ihr Konto verwalten können.
Der
Privatsphärecheck
führt Sie durch die wichtigsten Datenschutzeinstellungen für Ihr Google-Konto.
Im
Google Sicherheitscenter
erhalten Sie Informationen zu unseren integrierten Sicherheitsmaßnahmen und Datenschutzeinstellungen. Außerdem können Sie hier die Tools kennenlernen, mit denen Sie innerhalb Ihrer Familie Grundregeln für die Nutzung digitaler Onlinemedien aufstellen können.
In den
Google-Datenschutzinformationen für Jugendliche
finden Sie Antworten auf einige der uns am häufigsten gestellten Fragen zum Datenschutz
Der Abschnitt
Datenschutz & Nutzungsbedingungen
bietet weitere Hintergrundinformationen zu dieser Datenschutzerklärung und zu unseren Nutzungsbedingungen.
Unter
Technologien
finden Sie weitere Informationen zu folgenden Themen:
So verwendet Google Cookies
Die für
Werbung
verwendeten Technologien
Wie wir Daten von Websites oder Apps verwenden, auf bzw. in denen unsere Dienste genutzt werden
Wichtige Begriffe
Algorithmus
Ein Prozess oder Regelwerk, dem ein Computer beim Ausführen von Problemlösungsverfahren folgt.
Applikationsdaten-Cache
Ein Applikationsdaten-Cache ist ein Datenspeicher auf einem Gerät. Damit kann eine Webanwendung zum Beispiel ohne Internetverbindung ausgeführt oder die Leistung der Anwendung durch schnelleres Laden der Inhalte verbessert werden.
Browser-Webspeicher
Mithilfe des Browser-Webspeichers können Websites Daten in einem Browser auf einem Gerät speichern. Wenn der Speicher als "lokaler Speicher" verwendet wird, können Daten sitzungsübergreifend gespeichert werden. Dadurch sind sie auch nach dem Schließen und erneuten Öffnen des Browsers weiterhin abrufbar. Eine Technologie, die dies ermöglicht, ist HTML 5.
Cookies
Ein Cookie ist eine kleine Datei, die eine Zeichenkette enthält, die an Ihren Computer gesendet wird, wenn Sie eine Website aufrufen. Wenn Sie die Website das nächste Mal besuchen, kann diese anhand des Cookies Ihren Browser wiedererkennen. Cookies können Nutzereinstellungen und andere Informationen speichern. Ihr Browser lässt sich so konfigurieren, dass alle Cookies abgelehnt werden oder dass angezeigt wird, wenn ein Cookie gesendet wird. Einige Funktionen oder Dienste einer Website werden ohne Cookies möglicherweise nicht richtig ausgeführt. Lernen Sie mehr darüber,
wie Google Cookies verwendet
und wie Google Daten, einschließlich Cookies, verwendet,
wenn Sie die Websites oder Apps unserer Partner nutzen
Eindeutige IDs
Bei einer eindeutigen ID handelt es sich um eine Zeichenfolge, anhand derer ein Browser, eine App oder ein Gerät eindeutig identifiziert werden kann. Solche IDs haben eine unterschiedliche Verwendungsdauer und unterscheiden sich darin, ob sie durch den Nutzer zurückgesetzt werden können und wie der Nutzer auf sie zugreifen kann.
Eindeutige IDs werden zu verschiedenen Zwecken verwendet, etwa aus Sicherheitsgründen und zur Betrugserkennung, zum Synchronisieren von Diensten wie dem E-Mail-Posteingang oder zum Speichern von Einstellungen und Anbieten personalisierter Werbung. In Cookies gespeicherte eindeutige IDs dienen beispielsweise dazu, Websites die Darstellung von Browserinhalten in Ihrer bevorzugten Sprache zu ermöglichen. Ihr Browser lässt sich so konfigurieren, dass alle Cookies abgelehnt werden oder dass angezeigt wird, wenn ein Cookie gesendet wird. Weitere Informationen dazu,
wie Google Cookies verwendet
Auf anderen Plattformen als Browsern werden eindeutige IDs zur Erkennung eines bestimmten Geräts oder einer App auf diesem Gerät verwendet. Eine eindeutige ID wie die Werbe-ID wird beispielsweise verwendet, um Ihnen auf Android-Geräten relevante Werbung anzuzeigen. Dies können Sie in Ihren Geräteeinstellungen
verwalten
. Eindeutige IDs können auch vom Hersteller einem Gerät fest zugewiesen werden. Diese IDs werden gelegentlich auch als "Universally Unique ID" oder kurz "UUID" bezeichnet. Ein Beispiel hierfür ist die IMEI-Nummer eines Smartphones. Anhand dieser eindeutigen ID können wir etwa unseren Dienst an Ihr Gerät anpassen oder Geräteprobleme im Zusammenhang mit unseren Diensten analysieren.
Gerät
Ein Gerät ist ein Computer, mit dessen Hilfe auf Google-Dienste zugegriffen werden kann. Beispielsweise werden Desktop-Computer, Tablets, intelligente Lautsprecher und Smartphones als Geräte bezeichnet.
Google-Konto
Um einige unserer Dienste nutzen zu können, ist es erforderlich, ein
Google-Konto
zu erstellen und einige personenbezogene Daten (typischerweise Ihren Namen, Ihre E-Mail-Adresse und ein Passwort) anzugeben. Mithilfe dieser Kontoinformationen ist es möglich, Sie zu authentifizieren, wenn Sie auf Dienste von Google zugreifen, und Ihr Konto vor nicht autorisierten Zugriffen durch andere Nutzer zu schützen. Sie können Ihr Konto jederzeit über die Google-Kontoeinstellungen bearbeiten oder löschen.
IP-Adresse
Jedem Gerät, das mit dem Internet verbunden ist, wird eine Nummer zugewiesen. Diese wird als Internet Protocol(IP)-Adresse bezeichnet. Diese Nummern werden normalerweise in Blöcken zugewiesen, die bestimmten geografischen Gebieten zugeordnet sind. Anhand der IP-Adresse kann oftmals der Ort identifiziert werden, von dem aus sich das Gerät mit dem Internet verbindet.
Weitere Informationen dazu, wie wir Standortinformationen verwenden
Nicht-personenbezogene Daten
Das sind Nutzer-Informationen, die erfasst werden, sodass sie nicht länger auf individuell identifizierbare Nutzer verweisen können.
Personenbezogene Daten
Hierbei handelt es sich um Daten, die Sie uns zur Verfügung stellen und anhand derer Sie persönlich identifiziert werden können (z. B. Ihr Name, Ihre E-Mail-Adresse oder Zahlungsinformationen), oder sonstige Daten, die von Google mit Informationen dieser Art in Verbindung gebracht werden können, beispielsweise Informationen, die wir mit Ihrem Google-Konto verknüpfen.
Pixel-Tag
Ein Pixel-Tag wird auf einer Website oder innerhalb einer E-Mail-Nachricht platziert, um bestimmte Aktivitäten wie das Aufrufen von Websites oder das Öffnen von E-Mails zu erfassen. Pixel-Tags werden häufig in Kombination mit Cookies eingesetzt.
Sensible personenbezogene Daten
Hierbei handelt es sich um besondere Kategorien personenbezogener Daten wie etwa vertrauliche medizinische Informationen, die Zugehörigkeit zu einer bestimmten ethnischen Gruppe, politische oder religiöse Gesinnungen oder sexuelle Neigungen.
Serverprotokolle
Wie bei den meisten Websites zeichnen unsere Server automatisch Ihre Aufrufe unserer Websites auf. Diese „Serverprotokolle“ enthalten normalerweise Ihre Webanfrage, die IP-Adresse, den Browsertyp, die Browsersprache, das Datum und die Uhrzeit Ihrer Anfrage sowie ein oder mehrere Cookies, die Ihren Browser eindeutig identifizieren können.
Ein typischer Protokolleintrag für die Suche nach dem Begriff "Autos" sieht folgendermaßen aus:
123.45.67.89 - 25/Mar/2003 10:15:32 -
http://www.google.com/search?q=cars -
Chrome 112; OS X 10.15.7 -
740674ce2123e969
123.45.67.89
ist dabei die IP-Adresse, die der Internetanbieter dem Nutzer zuweist. Je nach Dienst kann dem Nutzer jedes Mal, wenn er eine Verbindung mit dem Internet herstellt, eine andere Adresse zugewiesen werden.
25/Mar/2003 10:15:32
sind das Datum und die Uhrzeit der Suchanfrage.
http://www.google.com/search?q=cars
ist die angeforderte URL einschließlich Anfrage.
Chrome 112; OS X 10.15.7
sind der verwendete Browser und das verwendete Betriebssystem.
740674ce2123a969
ist die eindeutige Cookie-ID, die diesem Computer beim ersten Besuch von Google zugewiesen wird. Hinweis: Cookies können von Nutzern gelöscht werden. Wenn der Nutzer seit dem letzten Aufruf von Google das Cookie vom Computer gelöscht hat, wird ihm beim nächsten Aufruf von Google auf dem entsprechenden Gerät erneut eine solche eindeutige Cookie-ID zugewiesen.
Verbundene Unternehmen
Ein verbundenes Unternehmen ist eine juristische Person, die zur Google-Unternehmensgruppe gehört, einschließlich der folgenden Unternehmen, die Dienstleistungen in der EU anbieten: Google Ireland Limited, Google Commerce Ltd, Google Payment Corp und Google Dialer Inc. Weitere Informationen zu den
Unternehmen, die Geschäftsdienstleistungen in der EU anbieten
Verweis-URL
Eine Verweis-URL (Uniform Resource Locator) ist die Information, die ein Webbrowser in der Regel an eine Ziel-Website übermittelt, wenn Sie auf einen Link zu der betreffenden Website klicken. Die Verweis-URL enthält die URL der letzten Website, die im Browser aufgerufen wurde.
Zusätzliche Informationen
Ähnliche Informationen im Zusammenhang mit Ihrer körperlichen oder psychischen Gesundheit
Wenn Sie von uns angebotene Fitnessprodukte und ‐Apps wie Fitbit, die Pixel Watch, Nest oder Google Fit verwenden, erheben wir Daten von Ihnen, z. B. Ihre Größe und Ihr Gewicht. Mithilfe dieser Apps und Geräte sammeln wir außerdem Daten wie Schlafrhythmus, Herzfrequenz, Hauttemperatur, verbrannte Kalorien und zurückgelegte Schritte.
Aktivitäten auf Websites und in Apps von Drittanbietern, die unsere Dienste nutzen
Websites und Apps, bei denen Google-Dienste wie Werbung und Analysen integriert sind, geben Daten an uns weiter.
Diese Daten werden unabhängig vom verwendeten Browser oder Browsermodus erhoben. Beispielsweise kann der Inkognitomodus in Chrome zwar dazu beitragen, dass andere Personen, die Ihr Gerät verwenden, nicht sehen können, welche Inhalte Sie aufgerufen haben. Websites und Apps von Drittanbietern, bei denen unsere Dienste integriert sind, können dennoch Daten an Google weitergeben, wenn Sie sie öffnen.
Hier finden Sie weitere Informationen
zu einigen der Optionen, mit denen Sie festlegen können, welche Daten weitergegeben werden, wenn Sie Websites und Apps öffnen oder nutzen, die Google-Dienste verwenden.
Aktivitäten in Google-Diensten
Wenn Sie in Ihrem Google-Konto angemeldet sind und Web- & App-Aktivitäten aktiviert sind, können Daten zu Ihren Aktivitäten auf Websites, in Apps und in Diensten von Google in den Web- & App-Aktivitäten Ihres Kontos gespeichert werden. Einige Aktivitäten können Informationen über den ungefähren Ort enthalten, an dem Sie sich bei der Nutzung des Google-Dienstes aufgehalten haben. Wenn Sie unter Verwendung eines ungefähren Orts nach etwas suchen, wird dafür ein Gebiet von mindestens drei Quadratkilometern verwendet. Alternativ wird der Ort erweitert, bis der Bereich den Standort von mindestens 1.000 Personen umfasst. So wird Ihre Privatsphäre besser geschützt.
In einigen Fällen werden Orte, an denen Sie in der Vergangenheit gesucht haben, möglicherweise dazu verwendet, einen relevanten Standort für Ihre Suche zu schätzen. Wenn Sie beispielsweise in Berlin nach Cafés suchen, zeigt Google bei zukünftigen Suchanfragen möglicherweise Ergebnisse für Berlin an.
Unter
Meine Aktivitäten
können Sie Ihre Web- & App-Aktivitäten ansehen und verwalten.
Android-Gerät mit Google-Apps
Android-Geräte mit Google-Apps sind Geräte, die von Google oder einem unserer Partner verkauft werden und umfassen Smartphones, Kameras, Fahrzeuge, Wearables und Fernseher. Diese Geräte nutzen Google Play-Dienste und andere vorinstallierte Apps. Dazu zählen Dienste wie Gmail, Maps, die Kamera- und Telefon-App Ihres Smartphones, die Sprachausgabe, die Tastatureingabe und Sicherheitsfunktionen. Weitere Informationen über Google Play-Dienste
finden Sie hier
.
Bereitstellung unserer Dienste
Im Folgenden finden Sie Beispiele dafür, wie wir Ihre Daten zur Bereitstellung unserer Dienste nutzen:
Wir verwenden die IP-Adresse Ihres Geräts, damit Sie die von Ihnen angeforderten Daten laden können, wie etwa ein YouTube-Video.
Wir verwenden eindeutige IDs, die in Cookies auf Ihrem Gerät gespeichert sind, um Sie als die Person zu authentifizieren, die auf Ihr Google-Konto zugreifen darf.
Fotos und Videos, die Sie in Google Fotos hochladen, werden verwendet, um Ihnen zu helfen, Alben, Collagen und andere Kreationen zu erstellen, die Sie mit anderen teilen können.
Weitere Informationen
Eine Flugbestätigung, die Sie per E-Mail erhalten, kann verwendet werden, um eine Check-in-Schaltfläche in Gmail zu erstellen.
Wenn Sie Dienstleistungen oder Artikel von uns kaufen, teilen Sie uns möglicherweise Informationen wie Ihre Lieferadresse oder Lieferanweisungen mit. Wir verwenden diese Informationen beispielsweise für die Verarbeitung, die Durchführung und die Lieferung Ihrer Bestellung sowie zur Bereitstellung des Supports für den Artikel oder die Dienstleistung, die Sie kaufen.
Bestimmte Google-Dienste
Beispielsweise können Sie
Ihren Blog
aus Blogger oder
eine Google-Website, die Ihnen gehört
, aus Google Sites löschen. Zusätzlich können Sie
Rezensionen
löschen, die Sie zu Apps, Spielen und anderen Inhalten im Play Store verfasst haben.
Bestimmte Partner
Beispielsweise gestatten wir Creatorn und Werbetreibenden, mit Messunternehmen zusammenzuarbeiten, um mithilfe von Cookies oder ähnlichen Technologien mehr über die Zielgruppe ihrer YouTube-Videos oder Werbeanzeigen zu erfahren. Ein weiteres Beispiel sind Händler auf unseren Shopping-Seiten, die mithilfe von Cookies ermitteln, wie viele Nutzer ihre Produkteinträge sehen.
Hier erhalten Sie weitere Informationen
zu diesen Partnern und zu deren Verwendung Ihrer Daten.
Cookies – Damit unsere Dienste ordnungsgemäß funktionieren
Wir verwenden beispielsweise ein Cookie namens "lbcs", mit dessen Hilfe sich eine große Zahl von Google Docs-Dokumenten in einem einzigen Browser öffnen lässt. Wird dieses Cookie blockiert, kann Google Docs nicht korrekt ausgeführt werden.
Weitere Informationen
Daten über Ihre Aktivitäten auf dieser Website mit Aktivitäten auf anderen Websites verknüpfen
Google Analytics nutzt eigene Cookies, also Cookies, die vom Google Analytics-Kunden gesetzt wurden. Bei der Verwendung unserer Systeme können Google Analytics-Kunden und Google über Google Analytics generierte Daten mit Drittanbieter-Cookies verknüpfen, die durch Besuche auf anderen Websites generiert wurden. Beispielsweise könnte ein Werbetreibender seine Google Analytics-Daten dazu verwenden, relevantere Werbung zu erstellen oder seinen Traffic genauer zu analysieren.
Weitere Informationen
Der für die Verarbeitung Ihrer Informationen zuständige Datenverantwortliche
Das ist das mit Google verbundene Unternehmen, welches für die Verarbeitung Ihrer Daten und die Einhaltung der anwendbaren Datenschutzgesetze verantwortlich ist.
der Öffentlichkeit
Wir verarbeiten beispielsweise Informationen zu
Ersuchen um Entfernung von Inhalten
aus unseren Diensten gemäß den Richtlinien von Google zur Entfernung von Inhalten oder gemäß anwendbarem Recht, um das betreffende Ersuchen zu prüfen sowie Transparenz zu gewährleisten, die Rechenschaftspflicht zu verbessern und Missbrauch und Betrug bei diesen Verfahren zu verhindern.
Dienste nutzen, um Anrufe zu tätigen und zu erhalten oder um Nachrichten zu senden und zu empfangen
Beispiele für diese Dienste sind:
Google Voice zum Tätigen und Empfangen von Anrufen, Senden von SMS und Verwalten der Mailbox
Google Meet zum Tätigen und Empfangen von Videoanrufen
Gmail zum Senden und Empfangen von E-Mails
Google Chat zum Senden und Empfangen von Nachrichten
Google Duo zum Tätigen und Empfangen von Videoanrufen und Senden und Empfangen von Nachrichten
Google Fi für einen Telefontarif
Dritte
Beispielsweise verarbeiten wir Ihre Daten, um Rechteinhabern Nutzungsstatistiken bereitzustellen, sie also darüber zu informieren, wie ihre Inhalte in unseren Diensten genutzt wurden. Wir könnten Ihre Daten auch dann verarbeiten, wenn Personen nach Ihrem Namen suchen und wir Suchergebnisse von Websites anzeigen, die öffentlich verfügbare Daten über Sie enthalten.
für die Öffentlichkeit von Vorteil sind
Wir verarbeiten beispielsweise Informationen zu
Ersuchen um Entfernung von Inhalten
aus unseren Diensten, um die Öffentlichkeit zu informieren, Recherchen zu ermöglichen und Transparenz in Bezug auf diese Ersuchen zu bieten.
Geeignete Sicherheitsmaßnahmen
Beispielsweise können wir Daten anonymisieren oder verschlüsseln, damit sie mit keinen anderen Daten über Sie verknüpft werden können.
Weitere Informationen
Geräte
Wir können beispielsweise Informationen von Ihren Geräten nutzen, um Ihnen bei der Entscheidung behilflich zu sein, welches Gerät Sie für die Installation einer App oder zum Ansehen eines Films verwenden sollten, die Sie bei Google Play gekauft haben. Diese Informationen verwenden wir außerdem zum Schutz Ihres Kontos.
Gerichtliches Verfahren oder vollstreckbares behördliches Ersuchen
Wie andere Technologie- und Kommunikationsunternehmen auch erhält Google regelmäßig Anfragen von staatlichen Behörden und Gerichten auf der ganzen Welt, in denen wir zur Offenlegung von Nutzerdaten aufgefordert werden. Die Achtung Ihrer Privatsphäre und die Sicherheit Ihrer gespeicherten Daten sind zwei wesentliche Aspekte, an denen wir uns bei der Frage orientieren, ob wir diesen rechtlichen Anfragen nachkommen. Unsere Rechtsabteilung prüft jede einzelne Anfrage unabhängig von ihrer Art. Häufig werden Anfragen abgelehnt, die zu allgemein gehalten sind oder bei denen das korrekte Verfahren nicht eingehalten wurde. Weitere Informationen finden Sie in unserem
Transparenzbericht
.
Gewährleisten und verbessern
Beispielsweise analysieren wir, wie Personen mit Werbung interagieren, um die Leistung unserer Werbeanzeigen zu verbessern.
Gewährleisten, dass unsere Dienste ordnungsgemäß funktionieren
Beispielsweise überprüfen wir fortlaufend, ob unsere Systeme ordnungsgemäß funktionieren, sodass Probleme erkannt werden können. Wenn wir feststellen, dass eine Funktion fehlerhaft ist, ermöglichen uns die vor dem Eintreten des Problems erfassten Aktivitätsdaten, das Problem schneller zu beseitigen.
Ihre Aktivitäten auf anderen Websites und in Apps
Diese Aktivitäten könnten durch die Nutzung von Google-Diensten entstehen. Beispiele dafür sind die Synchronisierung Ihres Kontos mit Chrome oder Besuche von Websites und Apps von Google-Partnern. Viele Websites und Apps arbeiten bei der Verbesserung ihrer Inhalte und Dienste mit Google zusammen. Beispielsweise können Websites unsere Werbedienste wie AdSense oder Analysetools wie Google Analytics verwenden oder andere Inhalte wie Videos von YouTube einbetten. Von diesen Produkten können Daten über Ihre Aktivitäten an Google weitergegeben werden. Je nach
Ihren Kontoeinstellungen
und den verwendeten Produkten können diese Daten mit Ihren personenbezogenen Daten verknüpft werden, zum Beispiel, wenn ein Partner Google Analytics in Verbindung mit unseren Werbediensten verwendet.
Weitere Informationen über die Datennutzung durch Google
, wenn Sie die Websites oder Apps unserer Partner verwenden
In deren Namen Werbung und Recherchedienste bereitstellen
Beispielsweise können Händler Daten von ihren Kundenkartenprogrammen hochladen, um Informationen zu diesen Programmen in die Such- oder Shopping-Ergebnisse aufzunehmen oder sich ein besseres Bild von der Leistung ihrer Werbekampagnen zu machen. Wir stellen Werbetreibenden nur zusammengefasste Berichte zur Verfügung, die keine Informationen über einzelne Personen preisgeben.
in unseren Diensten erhobene Daten verwenden
Je nach Ihren verfügbaren Einstellungen finden Sie im Folgenden Beispiele für die Verwendung der von uns in unseren Diensten erhobenen Daten:
Wenn Sie in Ihrem Google-Konto angemeldet sind und eine Suche auf Google durchführen, erscheinen neben Suchergebnissen aus dem öffentlichen Web auch relevante Informationen aus den Inhalten, die in anderen Google-Produkten wie Gmail oder Google Kalender vorhanden sind. Dazu zählen unter anderem der Status Ihrer gebuchten Flüge, Restaurant- und Hotelreservierungen oder Ihre Fotos.
Weitere Informationen
Wenn Sie mit jemandem über Gmail kommuniziert haben und diese Person zu einem Google Docs-Dokument oder einem Termin in Google Kalender hinzufügen möchten, wird die E-Mail-Adresse automatisch vervollständigt, sobald Sie mit der Eingabe des Namens beginnen. Diese Funktion vereinfacht das Teilen von Inhalten mit Freunden und Bekannten.
Weitere Informationen
Die Google App kann Daten nutzen, die Sie in anderen Google-Produkten gespeichert haben, um Ihnen, entsprechend Ihren Einstellungen, personalisierte Inhalte einzublenden. Wenn Sie beispielsweise in Ihren Web- & App-Aktivitäten Suchanfragen gespeichert haben, kann Ihnen die Google App Nachrichtenartikel und andere zu Ihren Interessen passende Informationen auf der Basis Ihrer Aktivitäten zeigen, wie z. B. Sportergebnisse.
Wenn Sie Ihr Google-Konto mit Google Home verknüpfen, können Sie über Google Assistant Ihre Daten verwalten und Dinge erledigen. So können Sie beispielsweise Ihrem Google Kalender Termine hinzufügen oder die Terminübersicht für einen bestimmten Tag aufrufen, Statusaktualisierungen zu einem gebuchten Flug abrufen oder Informationen wie Wegbeschreibungen an Ihr Smartphone senden.
Weitere Informationen
Wenn Sie ein Nutzer in der EU sind, wirken sich Ihre Entscheidungen zum Verknüpfen von Diensten darauf aus, wie bestimmte Google-Dienste die Daten dienstübergreifend verwenden können.
Informationen über Objekte in der Nähe Ihres Geräts
Wenn Sie die Standortdienste von Google unter Android nutzen, können wir die Leistung von Apps verbessern, die, wie Google Maps, Standortdaten benötigen. Wenn Sie den Standortdienst von Google nutzen, sendet Ihr Gerät über Sensoren wie den Beschleunigungsmesser, über nahe gelegene Mobilfunkmasten und über WLAN-Zugangspunkte, wie die MAC-Adresse und die Signalstärke, Informationen an Google. Diese Daten ermöglichen eine bessere Bestimmung Ihres Standorts. Den Google-Standortdienst können Sie in den Einstellungen Ihres Geräts aktivieren.
Weitere Informationen
Inhalte und Werbeanzeigen, die Sie sich ansehen und mit denen Sie interagieren
Beispielsweise erheben wir Daten zu Aufrufen und Interaktionen mit Werbeanzeigen, damit wir Werbetreibenden zusammengefasste Berichte bereitstellen können, aus denen hervorgeht, ob wir ihre Werbeanzeige auf einer Seite ausgeliefert haben und ob die Werbeanzeige von einem Nutzer gesehen wurde. Darüber hinaus können auch andere Interaktionen gemessen werden, etwa wie Sie Ihre Maus über eine Werbeanzeige bewegen oder ob Sie mit der Seite interagieren, auf der die Werbeanzeige eingeblendet wird.
löschen
Sie können beispielsweise, wie oben beschrieben, basierend auf dem anwendbaren Recht (einschließlich Datenschutzrecht) und unseren Richtlinien das
Entfernen von Inhalten aus bestimmten Google-Diensten beantragen
, einschließlich Inhalten, in denen sich möglicherweise Ihre Daten befinden.
Missbrauch erkennen
Wenn wir auf unseren Systemen Spam, Malware, illegale Inhalte (einschließlich
Darstellungen des sexuellen Missbrauchs und der Ausbeutung von Kindern
) und andere Formen von Missbrauch feststellen, die gegen unsere Richtlinien verstoßen, können wir Ihr Konto deaktivieren oder andere angemessene Maßnahmen ergreifen. Unter bestimmten Umständen melden wir den Verstoß auch den zuständigen Behörden.
Öffentlich zugängliche Quellen
Beispielsweise erheben wir Daten, die online oder in anderen öffentlichen Quellen verfügbar sind, um die KI-Modelle von Google zu trainieren sowie Produkte und Funktionen wie Google Übersetzer, Gemini-Apps und Cloud AI weiterzuentwickeln. Wenn Ihre Unternehmensinformationen auf einer Website erscheinen, können wir sie indexieren und in Google-Diensten anzeigen.
Orte, denen Sie ein Label hinzufügen, z. B. Ihr Zuhause oder Ihr Arbeitsplatz
Sie können wichtige Orte in Ihrem Google-Konto speichern, z. B. Ihr Zuhause oder Ihren Arbeitsplatz. Wenn Sie Ihre Privat- oder Arbeitsadresse festlegen, werden damit bestimmte Aktionen einfacher, etwa das Abrufen von Wegbeschreibungen oder Ergebnissen in der Nähe Ihrer Privat- oder Arbeitsadresse. Außerdem sehen Sie relevantere Werbung.
Sie können Ihre Privat- und Arbeitsadresse jederzeit in Ihrem
Google-Konto
bearbeiten oder löschen.
Partnerschaft mit Google
Es gibt mehr als zwei Millionen Partnerwebsites und -apps im Google-Werbenetzwerk.
Weitere Informationen
Personalisierte Suchergebnisse
Wenn Sie beispielsweise in Ihrem Google-Konto angemeldet sind und die Einstellungen für Web- & App-Aktivitäten aktiviert sind, erhalten Sie relevantere Suchergebnisse auf der Basis Ihrer früheren Suchaktivitäten und Aktivitäten in anderen Google-Diensten.
Weitere Informationen dazu erhalten Sie hier.
Auch wenn Sie abgemeldet sind, können Sie personalisierte Suchergebnisse erhalten. Wenn Sie dieses Maß an Personalisierung bei der Suche nicht wünschen, können Sie
privat suchen und surfen
oder die
personalisierte Suche in abgemeldetem Zustand
deaktivieren.
Personalisierte Werbung
Möglicherweise wird Ihnen auch personalisierte Werbung präsentiert, die auf den Daten des Werbetreibenden basiert. Wenn Sie beispielsweise auf der Website eines Werbetreibenden eingekauft haben, kann dieser die Daten über Ihren Besuch zum Einblenden von Werbeanzeigen nutzen.
Weitere Informationen
Personalisierung unserer Dienste
Beispielsweise können wir ein Google-Doodle auf der Startseite der Suche zeigen, das sich speziell auf einen feierlichen Anlass in Ihrem Land bezieht.
Personen, mit denen Sie online am häufigsten zu tun haben
Wenn Sie zum Beispiel beim Schreiben einer E-Mail eine Adresse in das Feld "Empfänger", "Cc" oder "Bcc" eingeben, schlägt Gmail Ihnen Adressen von Personen vor,
die Sie am häufigsten kontaktieren
.
Sensible Kategorien
Wenn wir Ihnen personalisierte Werbung präsentieren, so basiert diese auf Themen, von denen wir denken, dass Sie aufgrund Ihrer Aktivitäten daran interessiert sein könnten. Beispielsweise könnten wir Werbung für Themen wie "Kochen und Rezepte" oder "Flugreisen" einblenden. Wir verwenden jedoch nicht solche Themen und schalten nicht solche personalisierten Werbeanzeigen, die auf sensiblen Kategorien wie ethnischer Zugehörigkeit, Religion, sexueller Orientierung oder Gesundheit basieren.
Dasselbe verlangen wie auch von unseren Werbetreibenden
, die unsere Dienste nutzen.
Sensordaten von Ihrem Gerät
Ihr Gerät ist möglicherweise mit Sensoren ausgestattet, die zur genaueren Bestimmung Ihres Standorts und Ihrer Bewegungen verwendet werden können. Beispielsweise kann mithilfe eines Beschleunigungsmessers Ihre Bewegungsgeschwindigkeit erfasst werden und mit einem Gyroskop die Richtung festgestellt werden, in die Sie sich bewegen.
Weitere Informationen dazu, wie wir Standortinformationen verwenden
Server auf der ganzen Welt
Wir betreiben Rechenzentren
auf der ganzen Welt
, um Nutzern unsere Produkte ununterbrochen zur Verfügung stellen zu können.
Sicherheit und Zuverlässigkeit
Im Folgenden finden Sie Beispiele für die Nutzung Ihrer Daten zur Gewährleistung von Sicherheit und Zuverlässigkeit unserer Dienste:
Durch das Erheben und Analysieren von IP-Adressen und Cookiedaten können wir unsere Dienste durch automatisierte Mechanismen vor Missbrauch schützen. Dieser Missbrauch nimmt viele verschiedene Formen an, zum Beispiel das Senden von Spam an Gmail-Nutzer. Außerdem könnte Werbetreibenden durch betrügerisches Klicken auf Werbeanzeigen Geld gestohlen werden oder Inhalte durch das Starten eines Distributed-Denial-of-Service-Angriffs (DDoS) unterdrückt werden.
Mit der Funktion "Letzte Kontoaktivität" in Gmail können Sie feststellen, ob und wann eine andere Person ohne Ihr Wissen auf Ihre E-Mail zugegriffen hat. In dieser Funktion finden Sie Informationen zu den letzten Aktivitäten in Gmail, wie etwa die IP-Adressen, über die auf Ihre E-Mails zugegriffen wurde, sowie wo und wann der Zugriff erfolgt ist.
Weitere Informationen
Sprach- und Audiodaten
Sie können zum Beispiel entscheiden, ob Sie möchten, dass Google eine Audioaufnahme in Ihrem Google-Konto speichert, wenn Sie mit der Google Suche, Google Assistant und Google Maps interagieren. Wenn Ihr Gerät einen Befehl zur Aktivierung der Sprachsteuerung erkennt, beispielsweise „Hey Google“, zeichnet Google sowohl Ihre Stimme und Audio als auch einige Sekunden vor der Aktivierung auf.
Weitere Informationen
Synchronisation mit Ihrem Google-Konto
Ihr Chrome-Browserverlauf wird nur dann in Ihrem Konto gespeichert, wenn Sie in Chrome die Synchronisierung mit Ihrem Google-Konto aktiviert haben.
Weitere Informationen
Telefonnummer
Wenn Sie Ihrem Konto Ihre Telefonnummer hinzugefügt haben, kann diese abhängig von Ihren Einstellungen in Google-Diensten für unterschiedliche Zwecke verwendet werden. Beispielsweise kann Ihre Telefonnummer dazu genutzt werden, Ihnen zu helfen, wieder auf Ihr Konto zugreifen zu können, wenn Sie Ihr Passwort vergessen haben. Außerdem kann sie anderen Personen helfen, Sie zu finden und mit Ihnen Kontakt aufzunehmen. Schließlich kann sie verwendet werden, um für Sie relevantere Werbung einzublenden.
Weitere Informationen
Trends aufzuzeigen
Wenn viele Nutzer nach etwas Bestimmtem suchen, kann dies Aufschluss über aktuelle Trends geben. Google Trends analysiert Suchanfragen in der Google Websuche, um die Anzahl der Suchanfragen in einem bestimmten Zeitraum zu ermitteln, und veröffentlicht eine Zusammenfassung dieser Ergebnisse.
Weitere Informationen
Unsere Dienste verbessern
Beispielsweise können wir anhand von Cookies analysieren, wie Nutzer mit unseren Diensten interagieren. Diese Analyse kann uns helfen, unsere Produkte zu optimieren. So könnten wir zum Beispiel feststellen, dass Nutzern die Durchführung einer bestimmten Aufgabe zu lange dauert oder dass manche Schritte überhaupt nicht durchgeführt werden können. In diesem Fall können wir diese Funktion überarbeiten und das Produkt für alle verbessern.
unserer Nutzer
Beispielsweise gibt Google Daten zu Ersuchen um Entfernung von Inhalten aus unseren Diensten an Lumen weiter, um Missbrauch zu verhindern und die Transparenz und Rechenschaft in Bezug auf unsere Moderation von Online-Inhalten zu verbessern. Lumen erfasst und analysiert diese Ersuchen, um Forschung zu ermöglichen, mit deren Hilfe Internetnutzer ihre Rechte besser verstehen.
Weitere Informationen
Vor Missbrauch schützen
Beispielsweise können uns Informationen über Sicherheitsbedrohungen helfen, Sie zu informieren, wenn wir denken, dass Unbefugte Zugriff auf Ihr Konto erlangt haben (an diesem Punkt können wir Ihnen helfen, Maßnahmen zum Schutz Ihres Kontos zu ergreifen).
Werbung, die Sie besonders nützlich finden
Wenn Sie sich beispielsweise auf YouTube Videos zum Thema Backen ansehen, werden Ihnen beim Surfen im Web unter Umständen mehr Werbeanzeigen zu diesem Thema eingeblendet. Anhand Ihrer IP-Adresse können wir auch Ihren ungefähren Standort ermitteln, damit wir Werbung für Pizza-Lieferservices in der Nähe einblenden können, wenn Sie den Suchbegriff "Pizza" eingeben. Hier finden Sie weitere Informationen
über Werbung bei Google
und
warum Ihnen bestimmte Werbeanzeigen präsentiert werden
.
Zahlungsinformationen
Wenn Sie Ihrem Google-Konto eine Kreditkarte oder eine andere Zahlungsmethode hinzufügen, können Sie damit in allen unseren Diensten Artikel einkaufen, wie z. B. Apps im Play Store. Unter Umständen bitten wir Sie um weitere Informationen, wie eine Unternehmenssteuernummer, um Ihre Zahlung verarbeiten zu können. In manchen Fällen müssen wir Ihre Identität überprüfen und könnten Sie dafür nach Informationen fragen.
Wir können Zahlungsinformationen auch verwenden, um zu überprüfen, ob Sie die Altersbeschränkungen einhalten. Dies kann beispielsweise der Fall sein, wenn Sie ein falsches Geburtsdatum angegeben haben, das darauf schließen lässt, dass Sie für ein Google-Konto nicht alt genug sind.
Weitere Informationen
Google
Über Google
Datenschutz
Nutzungsbedingungen
Transparenz-Center
Eine Drop‑down-Liste, um die Sprache der Website zu ändern. Jede Option ist der Name einer Sprache. Es gibt insgesamt 65 Optionen.
Afrikaans
Bahasa Indonesia
Bahasa Melayu
Català
Čeština
Dansk
Deutsch
Eesti
English
English (India)
English (United Kingdom)
Español
Español (Latinoamérica)
Euskara
Filipino
Français
Français (Canada)
Gaeilge
Galego
Hrvatski
Isizulu
Íslenska
Italiano
Kiswahili
Latviešu
Lietuvių
Magyar
Malti
Nederlands
Norsk
Polski
Português (Brasil)
Português (Portugal)
Română
Slovenčina
Slovenščina
Srpski
Suomi
Svenska
Tiếng Việt
Türkçe
অসমীয়া
Ελληνικά
Български
ଓଡିଆ
Русский
Српски
Українська
‫עברית‬
‫اردو‬
‫العربية‬
‫فارسی‬
አማርኛ
मराठी
हिन्दी
বাংলা
ગુજરાતી
தமிழ்
తెలుగు
ಕನ್ನಡ
മലയാളം
ไทย
한국어
中文 (香港)
中文（简体中文）
中文（繁體中文）
日本語
Hauptmenü
Google-Apps
Sub-policy 5
https://www.linkedin.com/legal/privacy-policy:
Skip to main content
LinkedIn respects your privacy
LinkedIn and 3rd parties use essential and non-essential cookies to provide, secure, analyze and improve our Services, and to show you relevant ads (including
professional and job ads
) on and off LinkedIn. Learn more in our
Cookie Policy
.
Select Accept to consent or Reject to decline non-essential cookies for this use. You can update your choices at any time in your
settings
.
Accept
Reject
Privacy Policy
Effective September 18, 2024
LinkedIn's global Privacy Policy below applies worldwide. If you're located in the EU, EEA, UK, or Switzerland, you can review additional information that will apply to you in our
European Regional Privacy Notice
.
Your Privacy Matters
LinkedIn’s mission is to connect the world’s professionals to allow them to be more productive and successful. Central to this mission is our commitment to be transparent about the data we collect about you, how it is used and with whom it is shared.
This Privacy Policy applies when you use our Services (described below). We offer our users
choices
about the data we collect, use and share as described in this Privacy Policy,
Cookie Policy
, Settings and our
Help Center.
Choices
﻿
Settings
are available to Members of LinkedIn and Visitors are provided separate controls.
Learn More
.
Table of Contents
Data We Collect
How We Use Your Data
How We Share Information
Your Choices and Obligations
Other Important Information
Introduction
We are a social network and online platform for professionals. People use our Services to find and be found for business opportunities, to connect with others and find information. Our Privacy Policy applies to any Member or Visitor to our Services.
Our registered users (“Members”) share their professional identities, engage with their network, exchange knowledge and professional insights, post and view relevant content, learn and develop skills, and find business and career opportunities. Content and data on some of our Services is viewable to non-Members (“Visitors”).
We use the term “Designated Countries” to refer to countries in the European Union (EU), European Economic Area (EEA), and Switzerland. Members and Visitors located in the Designated Countries or the UK can review additional information in our
European Regional Privacy Notice
.
Services
This Privacy Policy, including our Cookie Policy applies to your use of our Services.
This Privacy Policy applies to LinkedIn.com, LinkedIn-branded apps, and other LinkedIn-branded sites, apps, communications and services offered by LinkedIn (“Services”), including off-site Services, such as our ad services and the “Apply with LinkedIn” and “Share with LinkedIn” plugins, but excluding services that state that they are offered under a different privacy policy. For California residents, additional disclosures required by California law may be found in our
California Privacy Disclosure
.
Data Controllers and Contracting Parties
If you are in the “Designated Countries”, LinkedIn Ireland Unlimited Company (“LinkedIn Ireland”) will be the controller of your personal data provided to, or collected by or for, or processed in connection with our Services.
If you are outside of the Designated Countries, LinkedIn Corporation will be the controller of (or business responsible for) your personal data provided to, or collected by or for, or processed in connection with our Services.
As a Visitor or Member of our Services, the collection, use and sharing of your personal data is subject to this Privacy Policy and other documents referenced in this Privacy Policy, as well as updates.
Change
Changes to the Privacy Policy apply to your use of our Services after the “effective date.”
LinkedIn (“we” or “us”) can modify this Privacy Policy, and if we make material changes to it, we will provide notice through our Services, or by other means, to provide you the opportunity to review the changes before they become effective. If you object to any changes, you may
close your account.
You acknowledge that your continued use of our Services after we publish or send a notice about our changes to this Privacy Policy means that the collection, use and sharing of your personal data is subject to the updated Privacy Policy, as of its effective date.
1. Data We Collect
1.1 Data You Provide To Us
You provide data to create an account with us.
Registration
To create an account you need to provide data including your name, email address and/or mobile number, general location (e.g., city), and a password. If you register for a premium Service, you will need to provide payment (e.g., credit card) and billing information.
You create your LinkedIn profile (a complete profile helps you get the most from our Services).
Profile
You have
choices
about the information on your profile, such as your education, work experience, skills, photo,
city or area
, endorsements, and optional
verifications
of information on your profile (such as verifications of your identity or workplace). You don’t have to provide additional information on your profile; however, profile information helps you to get more from our Services, including helping recruiters and business opportunities find you. It’s your choice whether to include
sensitive information
on your profile and to make that sensitive information public. Please do not post or add personal data to your profile that you would not want to be publicly available.
You may give other data to us, such as by syncing your calendar.
Posting and Uploading
We collect personal data from you when you provide, post or upload it to our Services, such as when you fill out a form, (e.g., with demographic data or salary), respond to a survey, or submit a resume or fill out a job application on our Services.
If you sync your calendars with our Services, we will collect your calendar meeting information to keep growing your network by suggesting connections for you and others, and by providing information about events, e.g. times, places, attendees and contacts.
You don’t have to post or upload personal data; though if you don’t, it may limit your ability to grow and engage with your network over our Services.
1.2 Data From Others
Others may post or write about you.
Content and News
You and others may post content that includes information about you (as part of articles, posts, comments, videos) on our Services. We also may collect public information about you, such as professional-related news and accomplishments, and make it available as part of our Services, including, as permitted by your settings, in notifications to others of
mentions in the news
.
Others may sync their calendar with our Services
Contact and Calendar Information
We receive personal data (including contact information) about you when others import or sync their calendar with our Services, associate their contacts with Member profiles, scan and upload business cards, or send messages using our Services (including invites or connection requests). If you or others opt-in to sync email accounts with our Services, we will also collect “email header” information that we can associate with Member profiles.
Customers and partners may provide data to us.
Partners
We receive personal data (e.g., your job title and work email address) about you when you use the services of our customers and partners, such as employers or prospective employers and applicant tracking systems providing us job application data.
Related Companies and Other Services
We receive data about you when you use some of the other services provided by us or our
Affiliates
, including Microsoft. For example, you may choose to send us information about your contacts in Microsoft apps and services, such as Outlook, for improved professional networking activities on our Services
1.3 Service Use
We log your visits and use of our Services, including mobile apps.
We log usage data when you visit or otherwise use our Services, including our sites, app and platform technology, such as when you view or click on content (e.g., learning video) or ads (on or off our sites and apps), perform a search, install or update one of our mobile apps, share articles or apply for jobs. We use log-ins, cookies,
device information
and internet protocol (“IP”) addresses to identify you and log your use.
1.4 Cookies and Similar Technologies
We collect data through cookies and similar technologies.
As further described in our
Cookie Policy
, we use cookies and similar technologies (e.g., pixels and ad tags) to collect data (e.g., device IDs) to recognize you and your device(s) on, off and across different services and devices where you have engaged with our Services. We also allow some others to use cookies as described in our Cookie Policy. If you are outside the Designated Countries, we also collect (or rely on others who collect) information about your device where you have not engaged with our Services (e.g., ad ID, IP address, operating system and browser information) so we can provide our Members with relevant ads and better understand their effectiveness.
Learn more
. You can
opt out
from our use of data from cookies and similar technologies that track your behavior on the sites of others for ad targeting and other ad-related purposes. For Visitors,
the controls are
here
.
1.5 Your Device and Location
We receive data through cookies and similar technologies
When you visit or leave our Services (including some plugins and our cookies or similar technology on the sites of others), we receive the URL of both the site you came from and the one you go to and the time of your visit. We also get information about your network and device (e.g., IP address, proxy server, operating system, web browser and add-ons, device identifier and features, cookie IDs and/or ISP, or your mobile carrier). If you use our Services from a mobile device, that device will send us data about your location based on your phone settings. We will ask you to opt-in before we use GPS or other tools to identify your precise location.
1.6 Communications
If you communicate through our Services, we learn about that.
We collect information about you when you communicate with others through our Services (e.g., when you send, receive, or engage with messages, events, or connection requests, including our marketing communications). This may include information that indicates who you are communicating with and when. We also use
automated systems
to support and protect our site. For example, we use such systems to suggest possible responses to messages and to manage or block content that violates our User Agreement or
Professional Community Policies
.
1.7 Workplace and School Provided Information
When your organization (e.g., employer or school) buys a premium Service for you to use, they give us data about you.
Others buying our Services for your use, such as your employer or your school, provide us with personal data about you and your eligibility to use the Services that they purchase for use by their workers, students or alumni. For example, we will get contact information for “
LinkedIn Page
” (formerly Company Page) administrators and for authorizing users of our premium Services, such as our recruiting, sales or learning products.
1.8 Sites and Services of Others
We get data when you visit sites that include our ads, cookies or plugins or when you log-in to others’ services with your LinkedIn account.
We receive information about your visits and interaction with services provided by others when you log-in with LinkedIn or visit others’ services that include some of our plugins (such as “Apply with LinkedIn”) or our ads, cookies or similar technologies.
1.9 Other
We are improving our Services, which means we get new data and create new ways to use data.
Our Services are dynamic, and we often introduce new features, which may require the collection of new information. If we collect materially different personal data or materially change how we collect, use or share your data, we will notify you and may also modify this Privacy Policy.
Affiliates
Affiliates are companies controlling, controlled by or under common control with us, including, for example, LinkedIn Ireland, LinkedIn Corporation, LinkedIn Singapore and Microsoft Corporation.
2. How We Use Your Data
We use your data to provide, support, personalize and develop our Services.
How we use your personal data will depend on which Services you use, how you use those Services and the choices you make in your
settings
. We may use your personal data to improve, develop, and provide products and Services, develop and train artificial intelligence (AI) models, develop, provide, and personalize our Services, and gain insights with the help of AI, automated systems, and inferences, so that our Services can be more relevant and useful to you and others. You can review LinkedIn's Responsible AI principles
here
and learn more about our approach to generative AI
here
.
Learn more
about the inferences we may make, including as to
your age and gender
and how we use them.
2.1 Services
Our Services help you connect with others, find and be found for work and business opportunities, stay informed, get training and be more productive.
We use your data to authorize access to our Services and honor your settings.
Stay Connected
Our Services allow you to stay in touch and up to date with colleagues, partners, clients, and other professional contacts. To do so, you can “connect” with the professionals who you choose, and who also wish to “connect” with you. Subject to your and their
settings
, when you connect with other Members, you will be able to search each others’ connections in order to exchange professional opportunities.
We use data about you (such as your profile, profiles you have viewed or data provided through address book uploads or partner integrations) to help others find your profile, suggest connections for you and others (e.g. Members who share your contacts or job experiences) and enable you to invite others to become a Member and connect with you. You can also opt-in to allow us to use your precise location or proximity to others for certain tasks (e.g. to suggest other nearby Members for you to connect with, calculate the commute to a new job, or notify your connections that you are at a professional event).
It is your choice whether to invite someone to our Services, send a connection request, or allow another Member to become your connection. When you invite someone to connect with you, your invitation will include your network and basic profile information (e.g., name, profile photo, job title, region). We will send invitation reminders to the person you invited. You can
choose
whether or not to share your own list of connections with your connections.
Visitors have
choices
about how we use their data.
Stay Informed
Our Services allow you to stay informed about news, events and ideas regarding professional topics you care about, and from professionals you respect. Our Services also allow you to improve your professional skills, or learn new ones. We use the data we have about you (e.g., data you provide, data we collect from your engagement with our Services and inferences we make from the data we have about you), to personalize our Services for you, such as by recommending or ranking relevant content and conversations on our Services. We also use the data we have about you to suggest skills you could add to your profile and skills that you might need to pursue your next opportunity. So, if you let us know that you are interested in a new skill (e.g., by watching a learning video), we will use this information to personalize content in your feed, suggest that you follow certain Members on our site, or suggest related learning content to help you towards that new skill. We use your content, activity and other data, including your name and photo, to provide notices to your network and others. For example, subject to your
settings
, we may notify others that you have updated your profile, posted content, took a
social action
, used a feature, made new connections or were
mentioned in the news
.
Career
Our Services allow you to explore careers, evaluate educational opportunities, and seek out, and be found for, career opportunities. Your profile can be found by those looking to hire (for a job or a
specific task
) or be hired by you. We will use your data to recommend jobs and show you and others relevant professional contacts (e.g., who work at a company, in an industry, function or location or have certain skills and connections). You can signal that you are
interested
in changing jobs and share information with recruiters. We will use your data to recommend jobs to you and you to recruiters. We may use automated systems to provide content and recommendations to help make our Services more relevant to our Members, Visitors and customers. Keeping your profile accurate and up-to-date may help you better connect to others and to opportunities through our Services.
Productivity
Our Services allow you to collaborate with colleagues, search for potential clients, customers, partners and others to do business with. Our Services allow you to communicate with other Members and schedule and prepare meetings with them. If your
settings
allow, we scan messages to provide “bots” or similar tools that facilitate tasks such as scheduling meetings, drafting responses, summarizing messages or recommending next steps.
Learn more
.
2.2 Premium Services
Our premium Services help paying users to search for and contact Members through our Services, such as searching for and contacting job candidates, sales leads and co-workers, manage talent and promote content.
We sell premium Services that provide our customers and subscribers with customized-search functionality and tools (including messaging and activity alerts) as part of our talent, marketing and sales solutions. Customers can export limited information from your profile, such as name, headline, current company, current title, and general location (e.g., Dublin), such as to manage sales leads or talent, unless you
opt-out
. We do not provide contact information to customers as part of these premium Services without your consent. Premium Services customers can store information they have about you in our premium Services, such as a resume or contact information or sales history. The data stored about you by these customers is subject to the policies of those customers. Other enterprise Services and features that use your data include
TeamLink
and
LinkedIn Pages
(e.g., content analytics and followers).
2.3 Communications
We contact you and enable communications between Members. We offer settings to control what messages you receive and how often you receive some types of messages.
We will contact you through email, mobile phone, notices posted on our websites or apps, messages to your LinkedIn inbox, and other ways through our Services, including text messages and push notifications. We will send you messages about the availability of our Services, security, or other service-related issues. We also send messages about how to use our Services, network updates, reminders, job suggestions and promotional messages from us and our partners. You may change your communication
preferences
at any time. Please be aware that you cannot opt out of receiving service messages from us, including security and legal notices.
We also enable
communications
between you and others through our Services, including for example
invitations
,
InMail
,
groups
and
messages
between connections.
2.4 Advertising
We serve you tailored ads both on and off our Services. We offer you choices regarding personalized ads, but you cannot opt-out of seeing non-personalized ads.
We target (and measure the performance of) ads to Members, Visitors and others both on and off our Services directly or through a variety of partners, using the following data, whether separately or combined:
Data collected by advertising technologies on and off our Services using pixels, ad tags (e.g., when an advertiser installs a LinkedIn
tag
on their website), cookies, and other device identifiers;
Member-provided information (e.g., profile, contact information, title and industry);
Data from your use of our Services (e.g., search history, feed, content you read, who you follow or is following you, connections,
groups
participation, page visits, videos you watch, clicking on an ad, etc.), including as described in Section 1.3;
Information from advertising
partners
, vendors and
publishers
; and
Information inferred from data described above (e.g., using job titles from a profile to infer industry, seniority, and compensation bracket; using graduation dates to infer age or using first names or pronoun usage to infer gender; using your feed activity to infer your interests; or using device data to recognize you as a Member).
Learn more
about the inferences we make and how they may be used for advertising.
Learn more
about the ad technologies we use and our advertising services and partners. You can learn more about our compliance with laws in the Designated Countries or the UK in our
European Regional Privacy Notice
.
We will show you ads called
sponsored content
which look similar to non-sponsored content, except that they are labeled as advertising (e.g., as “ad” or “sponsored”). If you take a social action (such as like, comment or share) on these ads, your action is associated with your name and viewable by others, including the advertiser. Subject to your
settings
, if you take a social action on the LinkedIn Services, that action may be mentioned with related ads. For example, when you like a company we may include your name and photo when their sponsored content is shown.
Ad Choices
You have choices regarding our uses of certain categories of data to show you more relevant ads. Member settings
can be found here
. For Visitors,
the setting is here
.
Info to Ad Providers
We do not share your personal data with any third-party advertisers or ad networks except for: (i) hashed IDs or device identifiers (to the extent they are personal data in some countries); (ii) with your separate permission (e.g., in a lead generation form) or (iii) data already visible to any users of the Services (e.g., profile). However, if you view or click on an ad on or off our Services, the ad provider will get a signal that someone visited the page that displayed the ad, and they may, through the use of mechanisms such as cookies, determine it is you. Advertising partners can associate personal data collected by the advertiser directly from you with hashed IDs or device identifiers received from us. We seek to contractually require such advertising partners to obtain your explicit, opt-in consent before doing so where legally required, and in such instances, we take steps to ensure that consent has been provided before processing data from them.
2.5 Marketing
We promote our Services to you and others.
In addition to advertising our Services, we use Members’ data and content for invitations and communications promoting membership and network growth, engagement and our Services, such as by showing your connections that you have used a feature on our Services.
2.6 Developing Services and Research
We develop our Services and conduct research
Service Development
We use data, including public feedback, to conduct
research
and development for our Services in order to provide you and others with a better, more intuitive and personalized experience, drive membership growth and engagement on our Services, and help connect professionals to each other and to economic opportunity.
Other Research
We seek to create economic opportunity for Members of the global workforce and to help them be more productive and successful. We use the personal data available to us to research social, economic and workplace trends, such as jobs availability and skills needed for these
jobs
and policies that help bridge the gap in various industries and geographic areas. In some cases, we work with trusted third parties to perform this research, under
controls
that are designed to protect your privacy. We may also make public data available to
researchers
to enable assessment of the safety and legal compliance of our Services. We publish or allow others to publish economic insights, presented as aggregated data rather than personal data.
Surveys
Polls and surveys are conducted by us and others through our Services. You are not obligated to respond to polls or surveys, and you have choices about the information you provide. You may
opt-out
of survey invitations.
2.7 Customer Support
We use data to help you and fix problems.
We use data (which can include your communications) to investigate, respond to and resolve complaints and for Service issues (e.g., bugs).
2.8 Insights That Do Not Identify You
We use data to generate insights that do not identify you.
We use your
data
to perform analytics to produce and share insights that do not identify you. For example, we may use your data to generate statistics about our Members, their profession or industry, to calculate ad impressions served or clicked on (e.g., for basic business reporting to support billing and budget management or, subject to your
settings
, for reports to advertisers who may use them to inform their advertising campaigns), to show Members' information about engagement with a
post
or LinkedIn
Page
, to publish visitor demographics for a Service or create demographic workforce insights, or to understand usage of our services.
2.9 Security and Investigations
We use data for security, fraud prevention and investigations.
We and our Affiliates, including Microsoft, may use your data (including your communications) for security purposes or to prevent or investigate possible fraud or other violations of the law, our
User Agreement
and/or attempts to harm our Members, Visitors, company, Affiliates, or others.
Social Action
E.g. like, comment, follow, share
Partners
Partners include ad networks, exchanges and others
3. How We Share Information
3.1 Our Services
Any data that you include on your profile and any content you post or social action (e.g., likes, follows, comments, shares) you take on our Services will be seen by others, consistent with your settings.
Profile
Your profile is fully visible to all Members and customers of our Services. Subject to your
settings
, it can also be visible to others on or off of our Services (e.g., Visitors to our Services or users of third-party search tools). As detailed in our
Help Center
, your settings, degree of connection with the viewing Member, the subscriptions they may have, their
usage of our Services
, access channels and search types (e.g., by name or by keyword) impact the availability of your profile and whether they can view certain fields in your profile.
Posts, Likes, Follows, Comments, Messages
Our Services allow viewing and sharing information including through posts, likes, follows and comments.
When you share an article or a post (e.g., an update, image, video or article) publicly it can be viewed by everyone and re-shared anywhere (subject to your
settings
). Members, Visitors and others will be able to find and see your publicly-shared content, including your name (and photo if you have provided one).
In a
group
, posts are visible to others according to group type. For example, posts in private groups are visible to others in the group and posts in public groups are visible publicly. Your membership in groups is public and part of your profile, but you can change visibility in your
settings
.
Any information you share through companies’ or other organizations’ pages on our Services will be viewable by those organizations and others who view those pages' content.
When you follow a person or organization, you are visible to others and that “page owner” as a follower.
We let senders know when you act on their message, subject to your
settings
where applicable.
Subject to your
settings
, we let a Member know when you view their profile. We also give you
choices
about letting organizations know when you've viewed their Page.
When you like or re-share or comment on another’s content (including ads), others will be able to view these “social actions” and associate it with you (e.g., your name, profile and photo if you provided it).
Your employer can see how you use Services they provided for your work (e.g. as a recruiter or sales agent) and related information. We will not show them your job searches or personal messages.
Enterprise Accounts
Your employer may offer you access to our enterprise Services such as Recruiter, Sales Navigator, LinkedIn Learning or our advertising Campaign Manager. Your employer can review and manage your use of such enterprise Services.
Depending on the enterprise Service, before you use such Service, we will ask for permission to share with your employer relevant data from your profile or use of our non-enterprise Services. For example, users of Sales Navigator will be asked to share their “social selling index”, a score calculated in part based on their personal account activity. We understand that certain activities such as job hunting and personal messages are sensitive, and so we do not share those with your employer unless you choose to share it with them through our Services (for example, by applying for a new position in the same company or mentioning your job hunting in a message to a co-worker through our Services).
Subject to your
settings
, when you use workplace tools and services (e.g., interactive employee directory tools) certain of your data may also be made available to your employer or be connected with information we receive from your employer to enable these tools and services.
3.2 Communication Archival
Regulated Members may need to store communications outside of our Service.
Some Members (or their employers) need, for legal or professional compliance, to archive their communications and social media activity, and will use services of others to provide these archival services. We enable archiving of messages by and to those Members outside of our Services. For example, a financial advisor needs to archive communications with her clients through our Services in order to maintain her professional financial advisor license.
3.3 Others’ Services
You may link your account with others’ services so that they can look up your contacts’ profiles, post your shares on such platforms, or enable you to start conversations with your connections on such platforms. Excerpts from your profile will also appear on the services of others.
Subject to your
settings
, other services may look up your profile. When you opt to link your account with other services, personal data (e.g., your name, title, and company) will become available to them. The sharing and use of that personal data will be described in, or linked to, a consent screen when you opt to link the accounts. For example, you may link your Twitter or WeChat account to share content from our Services into these other services, or your email provider may give you the option to upload your LinkedIn contacts into its own service. Third-party services have their own privacy policies, and you may be giving them permission to use your data in ways we would not. You may
revoke
the link with such accounts.
The information you make available to others in our Services (e.g., information from your profile, your posts, your engagement with the posts, or message to Pages)
may be available to them on other services
. For example, search tools, mail and calendar applications, or talent and lead managers may show a user limited profile data (subject to your
settings
), and social media management tools or other platforms may display your posts. The information retained on these services may not reflect updates you make on LinkedIn.
3.4 Related Services
We share your data across our different Services and LinkedIn affiliated entities.
We will share your personal data with our Affiliates to provide and develop our Services. For example, we may refer a query to Bing in some instances, such as where you'd benefit from a more up to date response in a chat experience. In regions outside the Designated Countries, we may also share your publicly-shared content (such as your public LinkedIn posts) with our Affiliates, including Microsoft, to provide or develop their services.
Where allowed
, we may combine information internally across the different Services covered by this Privacy Policy to help our Services be more relevant and useful to you and others. For example, we may personalize your feed or job recommendations based on your learning history.
3.5 Service Providers
We may use others to help us with our Services.
We use others to help us provide our Services (e.g., maintenance, analysis, audit, payments, fraud detection, customer support, marketing and development). They will have access to your information (e.g., the contents of a customer support request) as reasonably necessary to perform these tasks on our behalf and are obligated not to disclose or use it for other purposes. If you purchase a Service from us, we may use a payments service provider who may separately collect information about you (e.g., for fraud prevention or to comply with legal obligations).
3.6 Legal Disclosures
We may need to share your data when we believe it’s required by law or to help protect the rights and safety of you, us or others.
It is possible that we will need to disclose information about you when required by law, subpoena, or other legal process or if we have a good faith belief that disclosure is reasonably necessary to (1) investigate, prevent or take action regarding suspected or actual illegal activities or to assist government enforcement agencies; (2) enforce our agreements with you; (3) investigate and defend ourselves against any third-party claims or allegations; (4) protect the security or integrity of our Services or the products or services of our Affiliates (such as by sharing with companies facing similar threats); or (5) exercise or protect the rights and safety of LinkedIn, our Members, personnel or others. We attempt to notify Members about legal demands for their personal data when appropriate in our judgment, unless prohibited by law or court order or when the request is an emergency. We may dispute such demands when we believe, in our discretion, that the requests are overbroad, vague or lack proper authority, but we do not promise to challenge every demand. To learn more see our
Data Request Guidelines
and
Transparency Report
.
3.7 Change in Control or Sale
We may share your data when our business is sold to others, but it must continue to be used in accordance with this Privacy Policy.
We can also share your personal data as part of a sale, merger or change in control, or in preparation for any of these events. Any other entity which buys us or part of our business will have the right to continue to use your data, but only in the manner set out in this Privacy Policy unless you agree otherwise.
4. Your Choices & Obligations
4.1 Data Retention
We keep most of your personal data for as long as your account is open.
We generally retain your personal data as long as you keep your account open or as needed to provide you Services. This includes data you or others provided to us and data generated or inferred from your use of our Services. Even if you only use our Services when looking for a new job every few years, we will retain your information and keep your profile open, unless you close your account. In some cases we choose to retain certain information (e.g., insights about Services use) in a depersonalized or aggregated form.
4.2 Rights to Access and Control Your Personal Data
You can access or delete your personal data. You have many choices about how your data is collected, used and shared.
We provide many
choices
about the collection, use and sharing of your data, from deleting or correcting data you include in your
profile
and controlling the visibility of your
posts
to advertising
opt-outs
and
communication
controls. We offer you
settings
to control and manage the personal data we have about you.
For personal data that we have about you, you can:
Delete Data
: You can ask us to erase or delete all or some of your personal data (e.g., if it is no longer necessary to provide Services to you).
Change or Correct Data
: You can edit some of your personal data through your account. You can also ask us to change, update or fix your data in certain cases, particularly if it’s inaccurate.
Object to, or Limit or Restrict, Use of Data
: You can ask us to stop using all or some of your personal data (e.g., if we have no legal right to keep using it) or to limit our use of it (e.g., if your personal data is inaccurate or unlawfully held).
Right to Access and/or Take Your Data
: You can ask us for a copy of your personal data and can ask for a copy of personal data you provided in machine readable form.
Visitors can
learn more about how to make these requests here
. You may also contact us using the contact information below, and we will consider your request in accordance with applicable laws.
Residents in the
Designated Countries and the UK
, and
other regions
, may have additional rights under their laws.
4.3 Account Closure
We keep some of your data even after you close your account.
If you choose to close your
LinkedIn
account, your personal data will generally stop being visible to others on our Services within 24 hours. We generally delete closed account information within 30 days of account closure, except as noted below.
We retain your personal data even after you have closed your account if reasonably necessary to comply with our legal obligations (including law enforcement requests), meet regulatory requirements, resolve disputes, maintain security, prevent fraud and abuse (e.g., if we have
restricted
your account for breach of our
Professional Community Policies
), enforce our User Agreement, or fulfill your request to "unsubscribe" from further messages from us. We will retain de-personalized information after your account has been closed.
Information you have shared with others (e.g., through InMail, updates or group posts) will remain visible after you close your account or delete the information from your own profile or mailbox, and we do not control data that other Members have copied out of our Services. Groups content and ratings or review content associated with closed accounts will show an unknown user as the source. Your profile may continue to be displayed in the services of others (e.g., search tools) until they refresh their cache.
5. Other Important Information
5.1. Security
We monitor for and try to prevent security breaches. Please use the security features available through our Services.
We implement security safeguards designed to protect your data, such as HTTPS. We regularly monitor our systems for possible vulnerabilities and attacks. However, we cannot warrant the security of any information that you send us. There is no guarantee that data may not be accessed, disclosed, altered, or destroyed by breach of any of our physical, technical, or managerial safeguards. Please visit our
Safety Center
for additional information about safely using our Services, including
two-factor authentication
.
5.2. Cross-Border Data Transfers
We store and use your data outside your country.
We process data both inside and outside of the United States and rely on legally-provided mechanisms to lawfully transfer data across borders.
Learn more
. Countries where we process data may have laws which are different from, and potentially not as protective as, the laws of your own country.
5.3 Lawful Bases for Processing
We have lawful bases to collect, use and share data about you. You have choices about our use of your data. At any time, you can withdraw consent you have provided by going to settings.
We will only collect and process personal data about you where we have lawful bases. Lawful bases include consent (where you have given consent), contract (where processing is necessary for the performance of a contract with you (e.g., to deliver the LinkedIn Services you have requested) and “legitimate interests.”
Learn more
.
Where we rely on your
consent
to process personal data, you have the right to withdraw or decline your consent at any time and where we rely on legitimate interests, you have the right to object.
Learn More
. If you have any questions about the lawful bases upon which we collect and use your personal data, please
contact our Data Protection Officer here
.
If you're located in one of the Designated Countries or the UK, you can learn more about our lawful bases for processing in our
European Regional Privacy Notice
.
5.4. Direct Marketing and Do Not Track Signals
Our statements regarding direct marketing and “do not track” signals.
We currently do not share personal data with third parties for their direct marketing purposes without your permission.
Learn more
about this and about our response to “do not track” signals.
5.5. Contact Information
You can contact us or use other options to resolve any complaints.
If you have questions or complaints regarding this Policy, please first
contact LinkedIn
online. You can also reach us by
physical mail
. If contacting us does not resolve your complaint, you have more
options
. Residents in the
Designated Countries
and
other regions
may also have the right to
contact our Data Protection Officer here
or at
DPO@linkedin.com
. If this does not resolve your complaint, Residents in the Designated Countries and other regions may have more
options
under their laws.
Consent
Where we process data based on consent, we will ask for your explicit consent. You may withdraw your consent at any time, but that will not affect the lawfulness of the processing of your personal data prior to such withdrawal. Where we rely on contract, we will ask that you agree to the processing of personal data that is necessary for entering into or performance of your contract with us. We will rely on legitimate interests as a basis for data processing where the processing of your data is not overridden by your interests or fundamental rights and freedoms.